WHAT PEOPLE ARE SAYING ABOUT

 

WHY ARE WE THE GOOD GUYS?

 

One of the beacons in a politically dark world is the light cast by a
moral few who analyse and reveal how journalism works in the cause of
power. David Cromwell has pride of place in this company. Every member
of the public and every journalist with an ounce of scepticism about
authority should read his outstanding book.

John Pilger, journalist and documentary maker

 

Cromwell displays his unbending commitment to follow the facts wherever
they lead. Asks the questions about “our” leaders that polite society
and the mainstream media will not go near. An indispensable tool of
intellectual self defence.

David Miller, co-author of A Century of Spin, co-founder of Spinwatch,
Professor of Sociology at the University of Bath.

 

David Cromwell knows that media power works by acting on consciousness;
by shaping our individual sense of values, identity and belonging to
normalise the mores of the powerful. This creates the collective false
self of a ‘we’ that controls the hammer of violence, leaving more
violated empathy and senselessness in its wake. How do we wake up from
the frozen awareness of such psychic numbing? Understanding the drivers
and techniques of media power is a good starting point. This is what Why
Are We The Good Guys? sets out to do, and valiantly so.

Professor Alastair McIntosh, author of Soil and Soul

 

Propaganda is something they do; news what we do. They commit terror; we
seek to create stability. Our enemies are inhuman; we, only too human,
occasionally demonstrate our fallibility. David Cromwell brilliantly
exposes the daily lies our media feed us to reassure us that we are a
force for good in the world, while our governments, militaries and
corporations are free to rape and pillage weaker nations and the planet.
This book is an invaluable antidote to the conditioning that all those
living in the west are constantly subjected to.

Jonathan Cook, author of Disappearing Palestine

 

This book is truly essential reading, focusing on one of the key issues,
if not THE issue, of our age: how to recognise the deep, everyday
brainwashing to which we are subjected, and how to escape from it. This
book brilliantly exposes the extent of media disinformation, and does so
in a compelling and engaging way.Mark Curtis, author of Web of Deceit
and Unpeople

 

Part memoir, part media critique, Why Are We The Good Guys? is also an
eye-opening survey of“things they don’t want you to know.” If you’ve
ever been curious about Media Lens, Britain’s most radical media
monitoring group, co-founder David Cromwell explain show it came about
and produces examples of its polite but in-your-face approach to dealing
with journalists. A valuable account of an invaluable project.

Milan Rai, activist, co-editor of Peace News and author of War PlanIraq

 

 

Why Are
We The
Good Guys?

 

Reclaiming Your Mind From the
Delusions of Propaganda

 

Why Are
We The
Good Guys?

 

Reclaiming Your Mind From the
Delusions of Propaganda

 

David Cromwell

 

 

 

 

[]

 

Winchester, UK
Washington, USA

 

First published by Zero Books, 2012
Zero Books is an imprint of John Hunt Publishing Ltd., Laurel House,
Station Approach,
Alresford, Hants, SO24 9JH, UK
office1@jhpbooks.net
www.johnhuntpublishing.com
www.zero-books.net

For distributor details and how to order please visit the ‘Ordering’
section on our website.

Text copyright: David Cromwell 2012

ISBN: 978 1 78099 365 2

All rights reserved. Except for brief quotations in critical articles or
reviews, no part of thisbook may be reproduced in any manner without
prior written permission from the publishers.

The rights of David Cromwell as author have been asserted in accordance
with the Copyright,
Designs and Patents Act 1988.

A CIP catalogue record for this book is available from the British
Library.

Design: Stuart Davies

Printed and bound by CPI Group (UK) Ltd, Croydon, CR0 4YY

 

 

 

 

 

We operate a distinctive and ethical publishing philosophy in all areas
of our business, from our global network of authors to production and
worldwide distribution.

 

 

To all my teachers


Acknowledgements

 

I’d wanted to tackle a book like this for a long time, probably not even
being aware of the desire for many years. The book includes several
accounts of formative experiences, one from quite an early age, that had
me questioning the way society works. But I’m sure many people can
relate their own, much more impressive, personal examples. In a way,
that’s the point. It’s all too easy to be blind to the fact that many
people around us share similar experiences and scepticism about the
world presented to us by powerful politicians, business leaders and the
media.

The title of the book might seem needlessly provocative. Perhaps in the
wake of the war in Iraq, in particular, it challenges an assumption that
no longer holds so widely. Moreover, the title could be misconstrued as
another example of ‘West-bashing’ by someone who has benefited from some
of the freedoms and privileges that a reasonably comfortable Western
lifestyle can confer. And, of course, it should hardly need saying what
tremendous strides and achievements have been made over many centuries,
if not millennia, in this part of planet Earth.

But Why Are We The Good Guys? is intended as a small counterbalance to
the saturation coverage that, for all its admitted faults and
shortcomings, ‘the West’ is necessarily a force for good in the world. A
critical and honest appraisal of history and current events is a
prerequisite for the prospect of any future progress in human affairs;
not least in an era of seemingly endless wars, the ever-present risk of
global nuclear conflagration, and the onset of dangerous climate change.

This book would not exist without the encouragement, support and input
of many people. I would first like to thank Foske, Sean and Stuart. This
time you get top billing; it’s long overdue. The contribution of David
Edwards, stalwart pal and co-editor at Media Lens, has been invaluable;
not only in helping to shape material that has appeared under other
guises as media alerts or ‘Cogitations,’ but in providing daily fun and
stimulating exchanges as well. Who knew what a couple of pints would
lead to!

Since leaving my research job in September 2010 to work full-time on
Media Lens, I have been supported by the many kind individuals who
donate funds to the website. I’m deeply grateful to every single one of
you. Support also comes in other forms: the smart and funny people who
post on our message board and Facebook page, or email and Tweet us,
providing valued thoughts, cogent criticisms, gold-nugget media and book
quotes, and useful links to articles; some even send poems, songs and
cartoons.

Help, advice, suggestions, inspiration and encouragement have come from
too many people to list in full. But here are some of them: John Pilger,
Jonathan Cook, Harry Shutt, Edward Herman, David Peterson, Jeffery
Klaehn, Suleiman Sharkh, Oren Ben-Dor, Malcolm Levitt, Paul Davis, Gar
Alperovitz, Barton Bernstein, Tsuyoshi Hasegawa, Peter Koznick, Uday
Mohan, Laurence Lustgarten, Richard Keeble, Fairness and Accuracy In
Reporting, Scientists for Global Responsibility, David Smith, Gerry
Gold, Paul Feldman, Martin Hart-Landsberg, David Harvey, Adam Blackmore,
Kris Temple, Dave Merrington, Glen of League 1 Minus 10, Noam Chomsky,
James Hansen, Amena Saleem, Olly Maw, Marianne McKiggan and Mark Levene.
I’d also like to thank all the journalists who responded to my emails.
Whether in the trenches, the bunker or manning the fort, Light-Fingered
Fred has been a valiant support. Special mentions to Mum and Bobby, Dad
and Eileen, Kenneth, Hilary, Eòghan, Ciaran, Imke and Piet, and all
members of the McFadyen clan and its various offshoots. Ginger Joe and
Felix have been welcome distractions. The early-morning gang of swimmers
at the Jubilee Sports Centre deserve recognition too. As does Ed Jackson
for dragging me off to the occasional gig and Matt Jones for our joint
explorations of various eateries. I’d also like to thank everyone
involved with Southside AFC as well as my former colleagues at the
National Oceanography Centre in Southampton. And thank you to all the
teachers and lecturers who’ve taught and encouraged me over the years.
As you will see in Chapter 9, I am very grateful to all those involved
in my medical evacuation from RRS Discovery Cruise 227 in 1997 – whether
at sea, on land or in the air – the hospital operation and recovery
period in Vigo, Spain, and then a safe return home. Finally, thank you
to John Hunt Publishing and Zero Books for being bold enough to publish
Why Are We The Good Guys?

Humble and abject apologies if you feel you should have been mentioned
and haven’t. Please twist my arm and make me promise to include you next
time. Finally, a heartfelt thanks to you, the reader, for picking up
this book.


The Golden Rule of State Violence

 

  In discussion of international relations, the fundamental principle is
  that ‘we are good’ – ‘we’ being the government, on the totalitarian
  principle that state and people are one. ‘We’ are benevolent, seeking
  peace and justice, though there may be errors in practice. ‘We’ are
  foiled by villains who can’t rise to our exalted level.

  Noam Chomsky¹

 

A defining feature of state power is rhetoric about a ‘moral’ or
‘ethical’ role in world affairs. Errors of judgement, blunders and
tactical mistakes can, and do, occur. But the motivation underlying
state policy is fundamentally benign; democratic governments try to do
good, or at least as little harm as possible. Reporters and
commentators, trained or selected for professional ‘reliability,’ tend
to slavishly adopt this prevailing ideology.

So, for example, on the ten-year anniversary of the 9/11 attacks, an
editorial in the Independent on Sunday gushed about ‘Bush’s desire to
spread democracy as an end in itself.’² It had been, the paper said,
‘the germ of a noble idea.’ There had also been ‘an idealism’ about
Blair’s support for Bush. The regret was that the execution of the
righteous vision had been ‘naive, arrogant and morally compromised by
torture and the abrogation of the very values for which the US-led
coalition claimed to fight.’

But, by late 2011, we had Nato’s ‘successful’ mission in Libya, with
tens of thousands killed and its leader Gaddafi brutally deposed, to
help wipe the slate clean. The paper wrote that ‘the deserts of North
Africa… turned out to be more fertile soil for democracy than could have
been imagined.’ Libya was the great cause ‘where the idea of liberal
intervention could be rescued and to an extent redeemed from the
terrible mistake of Iraq.’

Note that the invasion-occupation of Iraq was described merely as a
‘mistake.’ In fact, many people, including then UN Secretary-General
Kofi Annan and numerous specialists in international law, have stated
that the invasion of Iraq was ‘illegal,’ a war of aggression. This is
deeply significant and with terrible historical resonance. The
prosecutors at the Nuremberg trials after the Second World War declared
that the launching of a war of aggression is ‘the supreme international
crime.’

As Noam Chomsky, the US linguist and political writer, often reminds his
audiences, the crime was defined clearly by Justice Robert Jackson,
Chief of Counsel for the United States, at Nuremberg: ‘An “aggressor,”
Jackson proposed to the Tribunal in his opening statement, is a state
that is the first to commit such actions as “[i]nvasion of its armed
forces, with or without a declaration of war, of the territory of
another State….” No one, even the most extreme supporter of the
aggression, denies that Bush and associates did just that.’³

Chomsky continues: ‘We might also do well to recall Jackson’s eloquent
words at Nuremberg on the principle of universality: “If certain acts in
violation of treaties are crimes, they are crimes whether the United
States does them or whether Germany does them, and we are not prepared
to lay down a rule of criminal conduct against others which we would not
be willing to have invoked against us.”’

The principle seems obvious, yet is routinely buried or ignored by
Western politicians and the corporate media today.

Meanwhile, the horrendous murder of the Iraqi civilian Baha Mousa by
British soldiers was, said the Independent on Sunday, ‘a reminder of how
much the Iraq war tarnished Britain’s reputation abroad.’ The
implication was that Britain’s ‘reputation’ is at root decent, and only
occasionally ‘tarnished.’ The paper concluded: ‘there is a hope that
Britain, with a more realistic understanding of its capability, could
regain some of the ethical role in the world that it lost after its
mistaken response to 9/11.’

Again, we note the rhetoric about ‘mistakes’ committed, not crimes. And
how accurate is it to proclaim Britain’s ‘ethical role in the world’?

In several powerful books, based on careful research of formerly secret
UK government documents, historian Mark Curtis has laid bare the
motivations and realpolitik of British foreign policy. Ethics and
morality are notable in these internal state records by their absence.
Curtis observes: ‘a basic principle is that humanitarian concerns do not
figure at all in the rationale behind British foreign policy. In the
thousands of government files I have looked through for this and other
books, I have barely seen any reference to human rights at all. Where
such concerns are evoked, they are only for public-relations purposes.’⁴

But the myth of benevolence must be maintained, even to the extent of
active deception of the British public: ‘in every case I have ever
researched on past British foreign policy, the files show that ministers
and officials have systematically misled the public. The culture of
lying to and misleading the electorate is deeply embedded in British
policy-making.’⁵

Chomsky often cites a definition of terrorism from a US army manual as:
‘the calculated use of violence or threat of violence to attain goals
that are political, religious, or ideological in nature. This is done
through intimidation, coercion, or instilling fear.’⁶ By this
definition, the major source of international terrorism is the West,
notably the United States.

As for Britain, Curtis writes in Web of Deceit: ‘The idea that Britain
is a supporter of terrorism is an oxymoron in the mainstream political
culture, as ridiculous as suggesting that Tony Blair should be indicted
for war crimes. Yet state-sponsored terrorism is by far the most serious
category of terrorism in the world today, responsible for far more
deaths in many more countries than the “private” terrorism of groups
like Al Qaida. Many of the worst offenders are key British allies.
Indeed, by any rational consideration, Britain is one of the leading
supporters of terrorism in the world today. But this simple fact is
never mentioned in the mainstream political culture.’⁷

In a more recent book, Secret Affairs, Curtis notes on the basis of
extensive research that Britain has long colluded with radical Islamic
groups, including terrorist organisations, in pursuance of ‘national
interests’ abroad. Both Labour and Conservative governments have
connived with these forces, sometimes funding and training them, in
order to promote specific foreign policy objectives. Such secretive
government collusion constitutes ‘desperate attempts to maintain
Britain’s global power in the face of increasing weakness in key regions
of the world, being unable to unilaterally impose their will and lacking
other local allies. Thus the story is intimately related to that of
Britain’s imperial decline and the attempt to maintain influence in the
world.’⁸

In Unpeople, Curtis estimates the number of deaths in the post-WW2
period for which Britain bears significant responsibility, whether
directly or indirectly. He tabulates mortality estimates for all the
wars and conflicts in which Britain participated or otherwise played a
significant role; for example, in covert operations or diplomatic
support for other governments’ violence. The examples include: Malaya
(1948-1960), Kenya (1952-1960), the Shah’s regime in Iran (1953-1979),
Indonesian army slaughters (1965-1966), the Indonesian invasion of East
Timor (1975), US aggression in Latin America (1980s), the Falklands War
(1982), the bombing of Yugoslavia (1999), the invasion of Afghanistan
(2001) and the invasion of Iraq (2003).

As Curtis acknowledges, estimates of deaths in any conflict often vary
widely and he does not pretend to be offering a fully scientific
analysis. But erring on the side of caution, he arrives at a figure of
around ten million deaths in the post-WW2 period for which Britain bears
‘significant responsibility.’ Of these, Britain has ‘direct
responsibility’ for between four and six million deaths. These are
shocking figures, and essentially unmentionable in corporate news and
debate.⁹

But then, one of the golden rules propping up the required
self-deception of the West’s fundamental goodness is that whenever
violence is inflicted by the state it is only in retaliation for
violence perpetrated by our enemies. This is straight out of George
Orwell’s Nineteen Eighty-Four. The US writer Edward Herman explains:
‘[An] important doublespeak device for rationalizing one’s own and
friendly terrorism is to describe it as “retaliation” and
“counter-terror.” The trick here is arbitrary word assignment: that is,
any violence engaged in by ourselves or our friends is ipso facto
retaliation and counter-terrorism; whatever the enemy does is terrorism,
irrespective of facts.’¹⁰ We might say, then, that the golden rule of
state violence is: terrorism is what they do, and counter-terrorism is
what we do. As Orwell himself observed in his essay, ‘Notes on
Nationalism’: ‘Actions are held to be good or bad, not on their own
merits, but according to who does them, and there is almost no kind of
outrage – torture, the use of hostages, forced labour, mass
deportations, imprisonment without trial, forgery, assassination, the
bombing of civilians – which does not change its moral colour when it is
committed by “our” side.’¹¹

The notion is so pervasive in news reporting that it is virtually
invisible, like the oxygen breathed by the journalist; it is simply
taken for granted. Even raising the topic for discussion in mainstream
circles is beyond the pale, as this book will show.

Two Classroom Experiments

From an early age we learn not to express views that are ‘extreme.’ This
was something I first consciously encountered at the age of nine when
the teacher organised a mock election in the classroom in my then
hometown of Barrhead in Scotland. I suppose the purpose of the lesson
was to learn something about what passes for democracy. In the version
of democracy that we are all used to, every five years or so we enter a
voting booth and choose a politician from the mostly narrow choice of
political parties presented to us in general elections. We then let the
victor get on with ruling over us until the next time the parties want
our votes. In the meantime, powerful industries and business investors
spend considerable sums of money in secretive lobbying; persuading,
cajoling and needling politicians to pursue policies that are, in
effect, corporate welfare programmes. Corporations and banks receive
huge public subsidies and bailouts, while the rest of us are largely
left to the cold biting winds of ‘market’ economics. It’s socialism for
the rich, and capitalism for the rest of us.

Of course, I didn’t know all that at the time of the classroom
experiment. But I did feel in my bones that somehow the interests of the
poor were being neglected.¹² I also had some rather ill-defined notions
that pollution, endangered species and diminishing world resources were
causes for concern. I was not at all convinced that the government
would, or could, ever sort things out. It was 1971 and, until the
previous year, we’d had six years of Labour in government with Harold
Wilson as prime minister. We now had a Tory government, led by Ted
Heath, that was probably worse. Even a nine-year-old could see this. As
for the Liberals, I didn’t know much about them. But they didn’t seem
very exciting or particularly relevant.

So what about the Scottish Nationalists? They had something going for
them, I thought. After all, I was proud to be Scottish. All those great
inventors, engineers, scientists, writers and patriots – Robert the
Bruce, William Wallace, Robert Burns; even Celtic manager Jock Stein who
had led the ‘Lisbon Lions’ to European Cup victory in 1967, the first
British team to do so. We also had some of the most beautiful scenery in
the world – I didn’t need to travel, I just knew this – which meant that
I felt so much more Scottish than British. We shouldn’t, I felt, be
‘ruled from Westminster.’ So it had to be a vote for the SNP, surely?

Well, no. I also felt faintly offended by twee visions of Scottishness:
the shortbread-tin image of tartan, Scottish country dancing and whisky
(clearly, I was still too young to touch, never mind appreciate, the
stuff). Obviously that was the skewed image for public consumption
abroad. But was Scottish ‘pride’ necessarily a good thing anyway? And
what did it mean to be ‘patriotic’? I wasn’t sure. Moreover, I could
never quite figure out where the SNP stood on the political spectrum.
Were they a bit conservative (both small and capital ‘C’), or were they
a bit left-wing? I couldn’t quite decide. And I don’t think they could
either.

That was long ago. Despite a modicum of sensible SNP policies today –
opposition to the Trident ‘nuclear deterrent,’¹³ and trying to ensure
access to health, further education and elderly care for all – there’s
certainly no danger of anyone confusing them with a genuinely
progressive party with policies tackling the roots of societal injustice
and environmental crisis; a party that would seriously challenge the
established order of power in the world.

So it was a tough call. However, I was aware of at least one other
possible option for my vote: Communist. My dad was something of an
activist. He used to stand on the proverbial street corner, selling
copies of the Daily Worker in the days before it was called the Morning
Star. I say ‘street corner’; but when we lived in Cumbernauld, the town
where I spent the majority of my childhood and youth, the ‘street
corner’ was the intersection of two walkways inside the monstrous
shopping mall of Cumbernauld town centre. To my young mind, this
building was like a giant spaceship; a vision of future life in Britain
with Cumbernauld at the vanguard. Others have since disagreed and given
the town centre the unenviable Carbuncle Award, also known as the ‘Plook
on the Plinth’ award; not once, but twice.¹⁴ In 2001, the Carbuncle
judges described the concrete town centre as a ‘rabbit warren on
stilts.’ They said it was ‘soulless and inaccessible, something like
Eastern Europe before the wall came down.’¹⁵ It may be a measure of a
sad childhood that a Saturday visit to Cumbernauld town centre was
frequently one of the highlights of my week!¹⁶

But back to my Daily Worker-selling, rabble-rousing father. In case all
this makes him out as some kind of ancient relic, he was only about 35
at this time. Before going to Glasgow University as a mature student,
and then becoming a secondary-school geography teacher following
post-graduate teacher training, he had been a telephone engineer at
various telephone exchanges in and around Glasgow, including Maryhill,
Scotstoun and Clydebank. They weren’t all Communists in that
environment, and my dad got a fair amount of mostly good-natured ribbing
from his workmates for his decidedly left-wing proclivities. But
certainly there was an element of banter and trade unionism and, here’s
a dirty word, comradeship that is perhaps coming back into fashion these
days.

Dad had plenty of left-wing and Communist pamphlets, magazines and books
around the house. My mum, a practising Catholic, put up with this
reasonably enough from what I recall. In any case, she’d already
promised the local parish priest before getting married that any
children would be brought up as Catholics: a prior condition, then, of
‘mixed marriages’! (Dad was a nominal Protestant having been raised to
attend the Church of Scotland, although ever less frequently through his
teenage years.) My younger brother, Kenneth, and I were thus brought
into the Catholic fold of ‘left-footers.’

So there was an interesting mix of Catholic and Communist, or certainly
left-wing, influences at home, including varied reading material –
books, magazines, socialist and Communist pamphlets and leaflets,
Catholic catechisms, the occasional copy of the weekly Scottish Catholic
Observer and every Sunday’s Church missive with local notices and a
message from the parish priest. Dad had the inevitable The Ragged
Trousered Philanthropists by Robert Tressell which I read when I was
about fourteen, a few years after the classroom election (which we’ll
return to in a moment). From the Daily Worker and left-wing brochures I
learned something of the Cold War: that the Americans and the Soviets
were engaged in a foolhardy arms race, with the US superior in almost
every category. But I didn’t know then that Communism would turn out to
be a ‘failed social experiment,’ as the public would be told following
the 1989 fall of the Berlin Wall. I also heard about the horrors of
Stalin, the gulags, the Soviet ‘crackdowns’ in Hungary in 1956 and in
Czechoslovakia in 1968, and about the lack of freedom of dissent and
free speech. But I didn’t believe that Communism or socialism had to
mean all of that. I had heard, too, about the struggles of working class
people in ‘Red Clydeside’; about James Maxton, Willie Gallacher and John
Maclean, and about the depression years of the 1920s and 1930s.

At least some of this had started to impinge upon my nine-year-old
consciousness. So when I sat in that classroom, contemplating which
party’s name I should scribble on the blank piece of paper, I didn’t
hesitate very long before choosing ‘Communist.’ Bear in mind that this
was a Catholic school. Not only that but my teacher was an
old-fashioned, but not old, former nun. Oblivious to what would happen,
I folded over the piece of paper with my vote on it and passed it to the
front where the teacher was sitting. I could see her there, adding up
the totals for each party. Did she pause and frown at one particular
slip of paper? Maybe that’s my memory adding detail for dramatic effect.
It only took a few minutes to gather the results before, in her
self-appointed role as election officer, she read them out.

If I recall correctly, there was a narrow Labour win over the Scottish
Nationalists, with the Tories and the Liberals catching a few votes
each. But what really consumed the teacher’s attention, disgust even,
was that there had been a vote cast, and she could barely bring herself
to say it, for the Communist party. She demanded to know who had cast
this clearly anomalous and heretical vote; no secret ballots here! I
meekly raised my hand. She gave me a surprised and yet steely look. I,
one of her most diligent and bright pupils, had seemingly betrayed her.

‘This is outrageous! How could you possibly vote Communist?’

I shifted uneasily in my seat. She didn’t wait for an answer.

‘I think we’ll have to discount this vote.’

She sighed.

‘Fortunately, it doesn’t matter as it doesn’t affect the outcome. Labour
won.’

From then on, I would be tarnished in her eyes as a troublemaker. She
composed herself and proceeded with her post-election analysis.

‘So, this is an example of what your parents do every five years or so
in an election, and what you will be doing….’

I grew up in a household, then, where there was often a copy of the
Morning Star lying around, as well as the tabloid Daily Record. By the
late 1970s, my parents – well, my dad most likely – had ditched the
crappy Record in favour of the Glasgow Herald as it was called then,
before ‘Glasgow’ was dropped to boost the notion of it as a national
paper. I could see from quite early on in my life that there were
different takes on the way the press would report, or not report, and
analyse ‘the news.’

A later formative episode occurred in secondary school when, as a
15-year-old, I wrote an English homework essay that was based heavily on
a Morning Star editorial column. The paper’s editorial was a staunch and
eloquent defence of improved labour conditions, strong trade unions and
the right to strike. And no doubt there were some choice observations in
there about ‘class war’ between the capitalist bosses and the exploited
workers. I treated the homework as a private experiment to see how
radical views would be received by ‘authority’; well, my English
teacher. I was pleasantly surprised when he awarded the essay 30 marks
out of a total of 35, which was very high coming from him. But he added
a telling remark in red ink: ‘cogently, if extremely argued.’ To me, the
editorial and my essay had been underpinned by a perfectly rational
analysis. But for the teacher – who was generally a good, inspirational
teacher it has to be said – such analysis was ‘extreme.’ That made me
chuckle and I’ve never forgotten it.

A Shock to the System

When I was in the sixth and final year of secondary school – a Catholic
school, as ever – I somehow got involved in a discussion with my physics
teacher about Northern Ireland. It was 1979. There had just been yet
more violence. I don’t recall whether it had been perpetrated by the
IRA, unionist extremists or British forces. Whatever was the spur for
the classroom political discussion, veering away that day from
electromagnetism, Newtonian dynamics and atomic theory, I remember being
stunned when the teacher asserted that the British used intimidating and
abusive methods against the Catholic population of the province,
extending even to targeted assassinations. There was just one other
pupil in the class; a grand total of two doing Sixth Year Studies in
physics that year. I’m not sure who was the more flabbergasted. About
all I could manage in reply was a weak, ‘How do you know?’ The teacher
responded: ‘I lived in Northern Ireland for several years. These things
were simply well known locally.’

Perhaps one of the most infamous cases of British violence in Northern
Ireland is Bloody Sunday, the killing of thirteen people by soldiers
during a peaceful civil rights march in Derry on 29 January 1972. Seven
of the dead were teenagers. In all, twenty-seven people were shot. An
inquiry into the events, the Widgery Tribunal, was widely criticised as
a ‘whitewash.’ The subsequent Saville Inquiry began in 1998 and dragged
on until 2010 amid controversy about its rising costs estimated at more
than £400 million.¹⁷ The final report vindicated the relatives who had
campaigned for years to clear the names of those who were killed, some
of whom were shot as they attempted to flee. Prime Minister David
Cameron told the House of Commons that the army killings were
‘unjustified and unjustifiable.’

Primary blame was affixed to the soldiers on the ground. But Niall Ó
Dochartaigh, lecturer in political science and sociology at the National
University of Ireland, Galway, pointed out that senior military
commanders, in particular General Sir Robert Ford who’d planned the
disastrous security operation that day, had ‘got off extraordinarily
lightly.’

Ó Dochartaigh continued: ‘Saville has done an extraordinary job in his
primary task of forensically examining the details of individual
shootings, but his analysis of the politics of Bloody Sunday is open to
question. The story of high-level responsibility has yet to be told.’¹⁸

I was aware of Bloody Sunday and had a vague memory of being appalled by
reports of that day in 1972. The event was portrayed in the media and in
subsequent mainstream debate as a tragic aberration. So the notion that
British forces, whether soldiers or intelligence networks, were involved
in a systematic campaign of intimidation, even terror, in Northern
Ireland was a shock. It was an early experience that made me question:
are we really the good guys here?

The Marshall Plan: Myth and Actuality

And then, of course, someone will pop up with a counter example;
something that demonstrates that actually Western states can and do make
huge gestures of benevolence. A classic case is the Marshall Plan, the
post-WW2 ‘rescue package’ implemented by the US government, ostensibly
to restore the devastated economies and infrastructure of Europe. The
offer of aid was made to all of Europe, even including those parts under
Russian occupation. I had always taken on trust this portrayal of
Washington’s selfless generosity. It was not until later years that I
learned that it was another instance of propaganda seeping into the
classroom and the media.

Walt Whitman Rostow, an economist who worked on implementing the
Marshall Plan, and who later played a key role in the US war against
Vietnam, stated that the plan was actually part of an ‘offensive’ which
aimed ‘to strengthen the area still outside Stalin’s grasp.’¹⁹ William
Clayton, Undersecretary of State for Economic Affairs, raised fears in
December 1947 that if Washington did not provide such aid, ‘the Iron
Curtain would then move westward at least to the English Channel.’²⁰
While the Marshall Plan had still been under discussion, Clayton had
stated that ‘we will hold in our hands the powerful weapon of
discontinuance of aid if contrary to our expectations any country fails
to live up to our expectations.’²¹ Chester Bowles, chief of the Economic
Stabilization Bureau, was candid: ‘The real argument for the Marshall
Plan is a bolstering of the American system for future years.’²²

US historian Garry Wills notes the ‘anti-Soviet dynamics of the Marshall
Plan’ which were spelled out by the new US National Security Council in
the first year of its operations: ‘By forcing the Russians either to
permit the satellite countries [i.e. the countries behind the Iron
Curtain, such as Czechoslovakia, Poland, and Hungary] to enter into a
relationship of economic collaboration with the west of Europe, which
would inevitably have strengthened east-west bonds and weakened the
exclusive orientation of these countries toward Russia, or to force them
to remain outside the structure of collaboration, at heavy economic
sacrifice to themselves, we placed a severe strain on the relations
between Moscow and the satellite countries, and undoubtedly made more
awkward and difficult [the] maintenance by Moscow of its exclusive
authority in the satellite capitals… The disaffection of Tito [in the
Soviet satellite Yugoslavia], to which the strain caused by the ERP
[Economic Recovery Program; i.e. the Marshall Plan] problem undoubtedly
contributed in some measure, has clearly demonstrated that it is
possible for stresses in the Soviet-satellite relations to lead to a
real weakening and disruption of the Russian domination.’²³

With the postwar ascendancy of the US in global affairs, America was now
flexing its muscles as part of its ‘special relationship’ with the
United Kingdom, the former seat of imperial power. The Marshall Plan was
a crucial political ace as part of this global muscle-flexing. In
Washington, the British Embassy was informed ‘that Britain’s socialism
[sic] could stand in the way of the loan… Congress was greatly concerned
to establish that US dollars weren’t going to be used to bolster up a
red dictatorship or, equally perverse, to subsidise welfare measures [in
Britain].’ The British Consul General Frank Evans reported that he
‘could not but be depressed by the violent dislike and distrust manifest
by these men towards the British experiment in social democracy.’²⁴ US
pressure was exerted on UK policy; in particular, to abandon any further
reforms such as nationalisation. In July 1947, the US Ambassador said
bluntly: ‘It would help the US obtain from congress the help which the
United Kingdom required if it were made clear that there would be no
further nationalisation of great industries in this country.’²⁵ In June
1948, the Foreign Office recommended that the nationalisation of iron
and steel should be postponed if not abandoned for the sake of
‘Anglo-American relations.’²⁶

Not much of this is ever mentioned today.

Chomsky puts the Marshall Plan in context: ‘Of the $13 billion of
Marshall Plan aid, about $2 billion went right to the U.S. oil
companies. […] If you look at the rest of the aid, very little of the
money left the United States. It just moved from one pocket to another.
The Marshall Plan aid to France just about covered the costs of the
French effort to reconquer Indochina. So the U.S. taxpayer wasn’t
rebuilding France. They were paying the French to buy American weapons
to crush the Indo-Chinese. And they were paying Holland to crush the
independence movement in Indonesia.’²⁷

After the Second World War, the US had control of half the world’s
wealth and unrivalled global power. As Chomsky notes: ‘Planners were
naturally well aware of the enormous disparity of power, and intended to
keep it that way.’ The basic policy was laid out in a major state
document in 1948 by the respected statesman George Kennan, the chair of
the State Department policy planning staff. The overriding goal was to
maintain the ‘position of disparity’ separating the US’s enormous wealth
from poverty elsewhere. Kennan advised that: ‘We should cease to talk
about vague and… unreal objectives such as human rights, the raising of
the living standards, and democratization,’ and must ‘deal in straight
power concepts,’ not ‘hampered by idealistic slogans’ about ‘altruism
and world-benefaction.’²⁸

Chomsky comments that: ‘It was well understood that the “idealistic
slogans” were to be displayed prominently when addressing others,
including the intellectual classes, who were expected to promulgate
them.’ He adds: ‘The plans that Kennan helped formulate and implement
took for granted that the US would control the western hemisphere, the
Far East, the former British empire (including the incomparable energy
resources of the Middle East), and as much of Eurasia as possible,
crucially its commercial and industrial centers. These were not
unrealistic objectives, given the distribution of power.’

In exploring issues to do with US politics and international affairs, I
would learn over the years that Chomsky would typically put matters in
similarly clear and comprehensible terms.

Bad News from the Middle East

I’d like to introduce one further issue that opened my eyes and ears to
the fundamental question of Western ‘benevolence,’ and thus to
systematic distortions and contortions in public debate. The issue is
the Middle East and, in particular, the Israel-Palestine conflict.

Trying to understand the tangled web of Israel and Palestine from
mainstream media reports is a bit like trying to grasp climate dynamics
by watching daily weather forecasts. Superficially, there is often lots
of action to report; but little knowledge is conveyed about the
underlying forces or relevant background. No wonder the public routinely
feels confused, bored and even irritated by media coverage of this most
‘intractable’ problem. No wonder so many people might feel, ‘Nothing
will ever change’; and ‘They’ll always be killing each other over
there.’

I recall the storm of controversy that erupted in 1988 over a political
cartoon printed in the Daily Camera, a local newspaper in Boulder,
Colorado, where I was living at the time. The cartoon consisted of two
panels. In the left-hand panel, a Nazi storm-trooper was brutally
beating a Jewish man in the street of a German town in the pre-war
1930s. In the right-hand panel, an Israeli soldier in the present day
was brutally beating a Palestinian man in the occupied territories,
either Gaza or the West Bank. The paper was promptly inundated with
complaints from people who were aghast that the cartoon supposedly
depicted a ‘moral equivalence’ between Nazi Germany and Israel. The
cartoonist and the newspaper were denounced. But a counterwave of
letters then arrived in support, some pointing out the tragic irony that
an oppressed people had now become oppressors.

Was the cartoon indeed offensive or was it making a valid point in
graphically strong terms? I was bemused by the vehemence of the debate,
but also frustrated that my knowledge of the relevant issues was weak.
Perhaps this was unsurprising; years of corporate media consumption had
befuddled a still-young brain. So much relevant information had been,
and remains, missing from what passes for mainstream debate.

Consider that a decade earlier, in 1978, a US Joint Chiefs of Staff
memorandum had listed three strategic objectives for the United States
in the Middle East: ‘to assure continuous access to petroleum resources,
to prevent an inimical power or combination of powers from establishing
hegemony and to assure the survival of Israel as an independent state in
a stable relationship with contiguous Arab states.’ According to Kenneth
Pollack, who was President Clinton’s adviser in the National Security
Council on policy towards Iraq, these goals ‘have guided US policy ever
since.’²⁹

Little of this realpolitik breaches the barricades of corporate news
coverage.³⁰ And British media reporting is routinely biased in favour of
the West’s major ally in the region, Israel.

In 2011, Greg Philo and Mike Berry of the Glasgow University Media Group
published an in-depth analysis of media coverage of the Middle East and
the impact this reporting has on public opinion. Titled More Bad News
From Israel, it is the largest study of its kind ever undertaken. The
authors showed clearly that there are major biases in the way
Palestinians and Israelis are represented in the media, including how
casualties, and the motives and rationales of the different parties
involved, are depicted. In follow-up interviews with viewers and
listeners, the study also revealed the extraordinary differences in
levels of public knowledge and understanding of the conflict. It is
significant that gaps in public understanding often reflect the
propaganda generated by Israel and its many influential supporters in
the West. Indeed, Philo and Berry’s work exposed the ‘success of the
Israelis in establishing key elements of their perspective and the
effect of these being relayed uncritically in media accounts.’³¹

As we will see throughout the book you are now reading, news bulletins
are riddled by elite-friendly value assumptions and judgements; never
more so, perhaps, than in reports from the Middle East. Philo and Berry
noted that the standard news framework here is: ‘that peace may be found
in the comings and goings of world leaders and that their priority is to
urgently secure peace, rather than to pursue more narrowly defined
concerns such as national interests or political support at home.’³²

To highlight this distorted news framing, Philo and Berry cited numerous
instances of false media ‘balance.’ Thus, on Independent Television
(ITV) News, two journalists were having a discussion in which one
referred to ‘the even-handedness which has characterised American
diplomacy in the Middle East.’ The second journalist, similarly deluded,
expanded on the theme: ‘the Americans have long maintained that the only
way they have any influence in the Middle East is to be a relatively
neutral, honest broker.’³³ Likewise, on the BBC1 lunchtime news, then
President Clinton was referred to as having a long history of ‘trying to
bring permanent peace to the Middle East.’³⁴

One ITV news bulletin spoke of ‘Israeli determination’ in the ‘fight
against terror,’ a standard description used across corporate news that
we are supposed to swallow unthinkingly.³⁵

But no correspondent or newsreader has likely ever said that ‘the
Israeli attacks have reinforced the determination of Palestinian
fighters to defend their land against Israeli terror.’ Nor do we hear
Palestinian attacks being described as sending ‘a tough message to the
Israelis to end military rule.’ By contrast, an Israeli attack using the
latest in high-tech bombs and missiles was portrayed blandly on BBC
Radio 4 as ‘the Israelis are sending the toughest possible message to
the Palestinians.’³⁶

Philo and Berry undertook an in-depth analysis of BBC and ITV news
coverage of Operation Cast Lead, the 2008-2009 Israeli attack on Gaza.
On 27 December 2008, Israel had launched a massive series of assaults on
the densely-populated strip of Palestinian land with F-16 fighter jets,
Apache helicopters and unmanned drones. Attacks with tanks and ground
troops followed. Twenty-two days later, the total number of Palestinian
dead was estimated by B’Tselem, the Israeli human rights group, as
1,389.³⁷ The death toll included 318 children. Ten Israeli soldiers were
also killed, four of them in ‘friendly fire’ incidents. During the
attacks, Israeli forces had repeatedly bombed schools, medical centres,
hospitals, ambulances, UN buildings, power plants, sewage plants, roads,
bridges and civilian homes.

The researchers recorded, transcribed and analysed over 4,000 lines of
broadcast news text from both BBC and ITV reports on Operation Cast
Lead. ‘The most striking feature of the news texts,’ said Philo and
Berry, ‘is the dominance of the Israeli perspective, in relation to the
causes of the conflict.’³⁸

Specifically, they noted that the Israeli themes of ‘ending the rockets’
fired from Gaza by Hamas into Israel, the ‘need for [Israel’s] security’
and to ‘stop the smuggling of weapons’ (by Hamas into Gaza) received a
total of 316.5 lines of text from the BBC. Other Israeli propaganda
messages, such as the need to ‘hit Hamas’ and that ‘Hamas and terrorists
are to blame,’ received 62 lines on BBC News. The total for Israeli
explanatory statements on the BBC was 421.25. This compared with a much
lower total for Hamas/Palestinian explanations of just 126.25. In ITV
News coverage, there were over 302 lines relating to Israeli explanatory
statements but just 78 for Hamas/Palestinian.

But even these 126.25 BBC and 78 ITV lines of ‘explanations’ of the
Palestinian perspective lacked substance: ‘the bulk of the Palestinian
accounts do not explain their case beyond saying that they will
resist.’³⁹ What was almost non-existent were crucial facts about ‘how
the continuing existence of the blockade affects the rationale for
Palestinian action and how they see their struggle against Israel and
its continuing military occupation.’⁴⁰

For the Palestinians, then, the military occupation of their lands and
the crushing blockade of Gaza are utterly central to the ‘conflict.’ But
on BBC News there were just 14.25 lines referring to the occupation and
only 10.5 on the ending of the siege/ blockade. ITV News had 12.25 lines
on ending the siege/blockade and a single line about the occupation. The
bias is glaring.

Instead of adequately explaining the Palestinian viewpoint, BBC and ITV
news heavily reflected Israeli propaganda: ‘The dominant explanation for
the attack [Operation Cast Lead] was that it was to stop the firing of
rockets by Hamas. The offer that Hamas was said to have made, to halt
this in exchange for lifting the blockade (which Israel had rejected),
was almost completely absent from the coverage.’⁴¹

In short, news coverage of the brutal assault was skewed by the Israeli
perspective, perpetuating ‘a one-sided view of the causes of the
conflict by highlighting the issue of the rockets without reporting the
Hamas offer,’ and by burying rational views on the purpose of the
attack: namely the Israeli desire to inflict collective punishment on
the Palestinian people.⁴²

Philo and Berry also analysed BBC news coverage of the Israeli attack of
31 May 2010 on the Gaza flotilla, during which nine peace activists were
killed on the Turkish ship, MV Mavi Marmara. As with Operation Cast
Lead, the reporting showed pro-Israeli bias and distortion. Both BBC and
ITV news made extensive use of Israeli-edited footage of the attack.
Philo and Berry noted that the BBC coverage was ‘more problematic’
because ‘in its description of the events and their sequence, it
highlight[ed] and at times clearly adopt[ed] the Israeli perspective.’
The main BBC news reporting ‘move[d] towards clear identification with
the Israeli account of events.’⁴³

On 5 June 2010, press reports noted that five of the people on the Mavi
Marmara had been shot either in the back of the head or the back by the
Israelis. None of the BBC news programmes monitored by the Glasgow
University Media Group reported this. But the main BBC news did find
space the following day to report on pictures from a Turkish newspaper
showing Israeli soldiers ‘disarmed and beaten.’

As Philo and Berry observed: ‘Let us imagine a different situation in
which a controversial event occurred on the West Bank. Would the TV news
routinely employ footage supplied by the Palestinians, with captions
saying for example, “Israeli soldiers shoot unarmed civilians”? Would
they do so if the Israelis were denying the validity of the sequence of
events? The use of Israeli edited material in this case is indicative of
the legitimacy accorded to them, rather than to Palestinian sources.’⁴⁴

In classic academic understatement, Philo and Berry concluded: ‘It is
difficult in the face of this to see how the BBC can sustain a claim to
be offering balanced reporting.’⁴⁵

The BBC Ponders Another Moral Issue

On the BBC television news, the pulsing theme tune sets the tone: the
world is a serious place and we, the BBC, are here to give it to you
straight. The computer-animated intro, featuring the Earth encompassed
by transmitted signals, together with the high-tech news studio,
proclaim impeccable credentials.⁴⁶ The newscaster – Huw Edwards, Fiona
Bruce, perhaps Emily Maitlis or Nick Owen – looks directly into the
camera with the requisite degree of gravitas. The message is clear: ‘You
can trust us. We have no agenda. This is the BBC. This is The News.’

The dramatic packaging allows propaganda to slip through in digestible
chunks. And it is a diet that, like the soma in Aldous Huxley’s Brave
New World, promotes mass adherence to state ideology. We are fed myths
that our governments are essentially well-intentioned; that powerful
investors, banks and corporations promote ‘free trade’ and ‘open
markets’ while providing responsibly for society’s wants and needs; that
state-corporate policies and practices constitute human ‘progress’; and
that, in any case, no serious or credible alternatives exist.

Anyone can spot the propaganda with a modicum of vigilance while
watching the news.

For example, take a BBC News at Ten report on 19 June 2011 about the
deaths of nine Libyans, including two babies, killed in a Nato air raid.
The Nato killings were presented in the headlines as what the Libyan
government ‘says’ happened. In his piece, Middle East editor Jeremy
Bowen repeated the party line: ‘Nato’s mandate is to protect civilians.’

Three days later, Bowen reported the brutal consequences of yet another
Nato air attack, with fifteen dead including at least three children and
two women.

Over footage of the bombed house, Bowen said: ‘It [Nato] says close
monitoring showed it was a command centre. The family say it was their
home.’ Then Bowen continued with the following astonishing remarks: ‘Was
a decision taken that killing civilians here would save others
elsewhere?’ And: ‘The deaths here raise the moral question at the heart
of the Nato mission in Libya. Its mandate is to protect civilians. So is
it ever justifiable to kill them?’

Imagine a BBC correspondent asking of Al-Qaeda or the Taliban: ‘Was a
decision taken that killing civilians here would save lives elsewhere?’
It simply would not happen. When Bowen was challenged by a Media Lens
reader, the BBC editor replied: ‘It’s always worth pondering moral
issues.’⁴⁷

But the moral ‘pondering’ was from the perspective of one side only: the
one armed with the most powerful, state-of-the-art weaponry invading yet
another country that is opposing Western interests.⁴⁸ The BBC News
audience was clearly expected to identify with Nato. After all, these
were ‘our’ forces out there ‘protecting civilians.’ But not only that,
we were asked to assume that there was a moral basis to Nato’s killing.
Again, just try to imagine the same ‘pondering’ by a BBC correspondent
from the perspective of officially-decreed enemies.

Helen ‘The Hidden’ Boaden

‘In each decade, from its inception to the present day, the BBC bears
the scars of its entanglements with those in power.’⁴⁹

These were the remarkable opening words delivered in a grandiose speech
by the BBC’s news director Helen Boaden.

In support of her claim, Boaden cited several examples including prime
minister Anthony Eden’s accusation during the Suez crisis in the 1950s
of the BBC ‘giving comfort to the enemy.’ And, in the 1990s, ‘[the
BBC’s] John Simpson found himself under attack for his supposedly
“biased reports” about the impact of NATO bombing on Belgrade.’

‘It is the journalists’ job to hold power to account,’ she continued,
‘to shine light in dark places.’ This is indeed what journalists keep
telling us. Without a hint of irony, Boaden continued to wax lyrical:
‘To hold power to account – we have to tell the truth as we see it, to
the people who need it, independent of government and commercial
interests. But we must do so freely and fairly, and in a genuine spirit
of inquiry. And if you ask the questions of those in power – you must be
prepared to answer them – and to acknowledge your own mistakes.’

Readers may well scratch their heads at this proclaimed BBC willingness
to answer questions and acknowledge mistakes. Because the BBC’s own
record, as documented by Media Lens in over ten years of media alerts
and two books, displays the very opposite.⁵⁰ Boaden tried to pre-empt
the public howls of laughter and derision:

  ‘It’s just a fact of life that e-mails mean that, these days, viewers
  can complain – or even praise us, perhaps! – more easily than they
  could in the past.

  ‘It is hard to strike a balance between allowing all-comers to
  complain and making the process unduly restrictive.

  ‘It means the system can be preyed on by interest groups, or
  individuals with an obsessive interest, or those with the time and
  resources to pursue an agenda of their own.

  ‘Sometimes, when people complain about a lack of impartiality, they
  are simply trying to impose their version of the truth on us.

  ‘It can be difficult for us, or unpleasant.’

 

In fact, Boaden was so scrupulous about accountability that she once
changed her email address to evade questions and complaints, as the
Independent reported in a media diary item titled, ‘Helen the hidden’:
‘Don’t bother emailing complaints to BBC head of news Helen Boaden. She
was at the launch evening for the Reuters Institute for the Study of
Journalism in Oxford last Monday night. Discussion turned to protest
groups and lobbying outfits which email their views to senior editors.
Boaden’s response: “Oh, I just changed my email address.” So much for
the Beeb being accountable.’⁵¹

Even the former BBC chairman Lord Grade described his experience of
complaining to the BBC as ‘grisly’ due to a system he said was
‘absolutely hopeless.’⁵² What hope for the rest of us mere mortals?

As someone with ‘an obsessive interest’ in truthful news reporting, and
with the ‘time and resources’ to pursue this demented ‘agenda,’ I
challenged Boaden as follows:⁵³

  You said that:

  ‘In each decade, from its inception to the present day, the BBC bears
  the scars of its entanglements with those in power.’

  However, what followed was a rather selective and debatable list.

  Here is some of what you missed:

  The BBC was founded by Lord Reith in 1922 and immediately used as a
  propaganda weapon for the Baldwin government during the General
  Strike, when it was known by workers as the “British Falsehood
  Corporation.” During the strike, no representative of organised labour
  was allowed to be heard on the BBC. Ramsay McDonald, the leader of the
  opposition, was also banned.

  In their highly respected study of the British media, Power Without
  Responsibility, James Curran and Jean Seaton wrote of ‘the continuous
  and insidious dependence of the Corporation [the BBC] on the
  government.’⁵⁴

  John Pilger has reported:

  ‘Journalists with a reputation for independence were refused BBC posts
  because they were not considered “safe.”’⁵⁵

  In 2003, a Cardiff University report found that the BBC ‘displayed the
  most “pro-war” agenda of any broadcaster’ on the Iraq invasion.⁵⁶ Over
  the three weeks of the initial conflict, 11% of the sources quoted by
  the BBC were of coalition government or military origin, the highest
  proportion of all the main television broadcasters. The BBC was less
  likely than Sky, ITV or Channel 4 News to use independent sources, who
  also tended to be the most sceptical. The BBC also placed least
  emphasis on Iraqi casualties, which were mentioned in 22% of its
  stories about the Iraqi people, and it was least likely to report on
  Iraqi opposition to the invasion.

  On the eve of the invasion of Iraq, Andrew Burgin, the press officer
  for the Stop The War Coalition, told Media Lens:

  ‘Representatives of the coalition have been invited to appear on every
  TV channel except the BBC. The BBC have taken a conscious decision to
  actively exclude Stop the War Coalition people from their programmes,
  even though everyone knows we are central to organising the massive
  anti-war movement.’⁵⁷

  In a speech at New York’s Columbia University, John Pilger commented:

  ‘We now know that the BBC and other British media were used by MI6,
  the secret intelligence service. In what was called “Operation Mass
  Appeal,” MI6 agents planted stories about Saddam Hussein’s weapons of
  mass destruction – such as weapons hidden in his palaces and in secret
  underground bunkers. All these stories were fake.’⁵⁸

  In truth, the BBC’s relationship with the establishment was accurately
  summarised long ago, in a single diary entry made by Lord Reith:

  ‘They know they can trust us not to be really impartial.’⁵⁹

  I hope you will respond, please.

 

Almost inevitably, the reply was a standard brush-off, sent by someone
in the BBC Press Office: ‘As I am sure you will appreciate, Helen
receives a very large volume of correspondence so it is not always
possible for her to correspond with individuals directly.’⁶⁰

The BBC regularly churns out a diet of pre-digested pabulum that props
up power. As Aldous Huxley wrote, these doses of soma dished out to the
people construct ‘a quite impenetrable wall between the actual universe
and their minds.’⁶¹ The consequences for humanity of media propaganda
have proven calamitous and, as the world slides ever-further into the
abyss of catastrophic climate change, could yet be terminal.

‘A Brilliant Act of Hypnosis’

It is only by reading behind the issues – whether the Middle East, the
global economy, environmental destruction – so fleetingly and
confusingly presented in news bulletins, press articles and conventional
debate, that real understanding begins to dawn. We need to seek out
so-called ‘alternative’ media: non-mainstream books, websites, email
lists; and directly access reports by the United Nations, human rights
groups such as Amnesty, green organisations and other campaigning
sources. But this also generates a shocking sense of how distorted is
‘mainstream’ news coverage and discussion. And the distortion is
systematic: it tilts heavily towards the perspective of powerful
interests. It favours the elite view of Downing Street, Whitehall, the
White House, the Pentagon, big corporations, investors and bankers; not
the ground-level view of marginalised communities, people struggling
just to survive, the poor, or those unfortunates in the crosshairs of
Western firepower.

We need to be aware of what John Pilger calls ‘the violent, ruthless
nature of a whole political culture’ that hides ‘behind its democratic
façade,’ and recognise ‘the scale of our own indoctrination in its
messianic assumptions, described by Harold Pinter as a “brilliant, even
witty, highly successful act of hypnosis.”’⁶²

Pilger continues: ‘While popular culture in Britain and America immerses
the Second World War in an ethical bath for the victors, the holocausts
arising from Anglo-American dominance of resource-rich regions are
consigned to oblivion. […] These true stories are told in declassified
files in the Public Record Office, yet represent an entire dimension of
politics and the exercise of power excluded from public consideration.
This has been achieved by a regime of uncoercive information control,
from the evangelical mantra of advertising to soundbites on BBC news and
now the ephemera of social media.’

This book presents several of the most vital issues today – sometimes
shocking, always eye-opening – which made me question the assumption
that we are the good guys; and I give pointers as to what can be done to
change things for the better.

One final important point for now: the ‘we’ should be queried at all
times in news and commentary. Who is ‘we’? When the BBC reports Obama,
Cameron, Brown, Blair or Bush saying that ‘we’ have brought ‘stability’
to Yugoslavia or Afghanistan or Iraq or Libya or (insert the name of any
country ‘we’ have ever invaded), what is really being said? All too
often, viewers, readers and listeners are asked, even impelled, to
identify with the ‘we’ that resides in power, sitting in the Cabinet,
the White House or the plush offices of corporate executives.

Many people do, of course, recognise that this is a false equation that
is being foisted upon the public. The powerful ‘we’ that so often
dominates the news agenda does not, in fact, represent the best
interests of the majority of the population, nor the best interests of a
sustainable planet. It is my hope that the following chapters will allow
you to see why it is entirely reasonable and proper to doubt the
propaganda from on high, challenge power and dare to ask the question:
Why are we the good guys?


Shoring up the Edifice of Benign Power

 

  The ruling classes have in their hands the army, money, the schools,
  the churches and the press. In the schools they kindle patriotism in
  the children by means of histories describing their own people as the
  best of all peoples and always in the right. Among adults they kindle
  it by spectacles, jubilees, monuments, and by a lying patriotic press.

  Leo Tolstoy¹

 

The Origins of Media Lens

In 1997, I started emailing the letters pages of the ‘quality’ British
press; in particular, the Independent and the Guardian. I can no longer
recall whether there was a specific trigger for this one-man
letter-writing campaign. For years I’d been a supporter of Greenpeace,
Friends of the Earth, Amnesty International and other traditionally
regarded ‘good causes.’ For the most part, I was the archetypal armchair
activist, diligently paying my membership subscriptions, making the
occasional extra donation, and avidly reading the various newsletters
and magazines that popped regularly through the letter box. I was,
however, active in a local Amnesty group when I lived in Groningen in
the Netherlands from 1989 to 1993. I was then working for Shell as an
exploration geophysicist. Despite processing copious quantities of
seismic data from both land and sea, I had a zero per cent success rate
in helping to locate any hydrocarbon prospects. After a few years, I
became disillusioned with working for a big company, particularly the
more I’d learned about its questionable record on human rights and the
environment, and I wanted to get back into scientific research. Also,
I’d met someone I wanted to settle down with and I didn’t want to
subject her to following me around the world, uprooting every three or
four years in a sequence of Shell career assignments. So when the
opportunity arose,² I bailed out and returned to the UK before Shell
could post me to Nigeria, Oman, Malaysia or any other country where
Shell was ‘assisting’ in ‘developing’ that nation’s resources. But
during my four years in Groningen, with a passable knowledge of Dutch, I
was able to help others in the local Amnesty group fine-tune their
letters in English, with much of the focus on campaigning against the
death penalty in Florida.

A seed for writing letters to push for political and social change was
certainly planted then. When I moved back to the UK at the end of 1993,
I decided to become active in the local Green party in Southampton. I
met some good folk but it could be dispiriting to attend regular
meetings at which eight or nine would represent a massive turnout. I
stood as a Green candidate in local council elections, polling at best a
few hundred votes and always coming last. Because I enjoyed writing and
scouring the newspapers, I volunteered to become the press officer for
the local branch of the party. Our big success was undoubtedly helping
to get Caroline Lucas elected in 1999 as Green member of the European
Parliament for the south of England. I also represented the Green party
at a public inquiry, making the case against expansion of Southampton’s
port facilities at Dibden Bay, an important area for wildlife and
environmental protection bordering the New Forest. In 2004, the
government rejected the proposed port expansion by Associated British
Ports. (In 2009, ABP launched another, still ongoing, attempt to build a
container terminal on Dibden Bay by 2021.) After a few years of Green
party activism, however, I had grown tired of party politics. I had also
seen the futility of bringing about radical change simply by electing
politicians to parliament and local councils that are endlessly hobbled
by state and corporate power; not least, because media ‘debate’ about
policies and issues is so trivial, narrow and distorted.

All of these factors came together to motivate my modest attempts to
target the press with radical analysis: just for fun and out of
curiosity, not with any expectation of creating a revolution! I enjoyed
the challenge of honing a brief letter that would make a compelling case
– to my mind – about the environment, economics or foreign affairs and
see whether it might appear in the paper in the following few days.
During a particularly good spell, I reached a hit rate of about one in
four successes. Not hugely successful then! Tiring of the experiment,
and becoming frustrated at the lack of space to develop longer
arguments, after a couple of years I then turned my hand to freelance
journalism with 800 or 1000-word comment pieces, even occasionally news
stories, and approached the same newspapers. The hit rate dropped
alarmingly to almost zero.

However, I was quite fortunate with one sympathetic commissioning
editor, Ron Anderson, at the Herald in Glasgow. In fact, thanks to Ron,
I even managed to place what were likely the first articles in the
Scottish press warning about the Multilateral Agreement on Investment, a
secretive proposal in the mid-late 1990s for international ‘investor
rights’ promoted by the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development. Happily, the corporate attempts to push through the MAI
failed, following a concerted campaign mounted by environment and social
justice groups.³ The campaign even helped pave the way for the so-called
‘anti-capitalist’ protests in Seattle in 1999 and subsequent
international summits, as well as the present-day Occupy movement.

But it soon became clear to me that incisive, persistent and probing
news coverage of vital topics – notably global economics, climate change
and ‘our’ wars – was paltry, to say the least. This wasn’t a total
surprise. When I was growing up, as mentioned in the previous chapter, I
encountered left-wing publications, in particular the Morning Star, and
I knew already that what I saw there was hardly mirrored in corporate
press and television news reports.

There was no single realisation, eureka moment or epiphany that led me
to see the fundamentally biased nature of the media; an insight that
undoubtedly many others share today. For me, it was the cumulative
effect of a constellation of factors over many years, including my
upbringing and being exposed to ‘dissident’ views; living in Colorado in
1988, a year of highly unusual weather patterns in North America, and
encountering the first major scientific accounts warning of
human-induced climate change (see Chapter 5); experiencing life inside a
large oil corporation; and trying to raise awareness of crucial issues
as a freelance journalist, but hitting a brick wall.

I could see that there were vital connections that were not being made
in corporate news media, whether wilfully or not. There was next to
nothing on the relationship between the corporate drive for ‘free trade’
and climate change; between consumerist consumption in the rich North
and poverty in the South (and, in fact, in much of the North as well);
between loss of biodiversity and unsustainable development; and between
all those issues and the structure and performance of the news media
that were clearly failing to perform their duty as a neutral conduit to
the world ‘out there.’

The letters to the press weren’t enough for me; nor were the – regularly
rejected – freelance news and comment pieces. And environmental and
party political activism no longer cut it for me. I decided that the
best way to find out about the state of the world, and why it wasn’t
being reported, was to do my own research – as best I could – and write
a book about it.⁴

It became obvious that the media had to be a central theme of such a
book. I had just read The Compassionate Revolution by David Edwards
which was, and remains, one of the best nonfiction books I had ever
read.⁵ Its compelling mix of politics and Buddhism, to which I’d been
attracted since coming across a second-hand copy of Fritjof Capra’s The
Tao of Physics in a bookshop in Boulder in 1988, was powerful. David
also had experience of working in the corporate business world. We were
the same age and, fortuitously, he lived just along England’s south
coast from me in Bournemouth. It was clear that I had to meet this man.

David was then working from home for a small non-profit organisation,
the International Society for Ecology and Culture, who gave me his
telephone number. Taking a deep breath – this was the first published
author I’d ever approached, after all – I gave him a call. Thankfully,
he turned out to be friendly and easy to chat with. He even kindly
agreed to look over a draft chapter I had written on the media for my
book, Private Planet. We met up shortly afterwards in a Bournemouth pub.
A few such meetings later and the seed of Media Lens was planted. It was
David’s idea that there should be something in this country like the
US-based Fairness and Accuracy In Reporting. FAIR had been challenging
distortions, omissions and elite bias in the US media since 1986. I
already had a modest website for my book, Private Planet. Why not
another website for our joint media activism?

David has always had a talent for coming up with great titles; his first
book is called Free To Be Human. He suggested ‘Media Lens’ with a
strapline of ‘correcting for the distorted vision of the corporate
media.’ We found someone to put the site together – Phil Chandler, later
succeeded by Olly Maw – and in July 2001, we started issuing regular
media alerts to a small band of family and friends. Very soon, with the
terrorist attacks of 11 September 2001, we could see before our eyes how
the ‘mainstream’ media constantly bolstered the perspective of Western
power, enabling the subsequent invasions of Afghanistan (October 2001)
and Iraq (March 2003). It was a horribly fascinating experience to watch
the symbiosis of media and government power in action.

But by now this was nothing new to us. Both David and I had already been
appalled by a similar process of media-state collusion that had been
crushing the people of Iraq under the brutal decade-long sanctions
regime administered by the United Nations. This almost entirely
overlooked episode in recent world history was a major motivation for
the start of Media Lens.

The Unreporting of the West’s Genocide in Iraq

As the 10th anniversary of devastating United Nations economic sanctions
against Iraq approached on 6 August 2000, it was clear that even the
liberal press was sweeping the matter under the carpet. If the
government propaganda merchants in Washington and London did not care to
mention the dreadful suffering of the Iraqi people then news journalists
could convince themselves that (a) it was not happening; (b) even if it
was happening, it couldn’t be important.

By 1999, according to the United Nations Children’s Fund (UNICEF), over
half a million children under the age of five had died for want of
adequate medication, food or safe water supplies.⁶ In all, the sanctions
likely contributed to the deaths of over one million Iraqis.⁷ But
throughout, Washington and London argued that the UN embargo had to
remain in force to prevent Iraq from ‘threatening its neighbours.’ For
how long? Perhaps ‘until the end of time,’ said then President Clinton,
‘or as long as he [Saddam] lasts.’⁸ The suffering of the Iraqi people
was all Saddam’s fault, a message repeatedly rattled off by the Clinton
and Blair administrations, and echoed by media professionals.

But it was the West that was destroying ‘an entire generation,’ warned
Hans von Sponeck in resigning his post as head of the UN’s ‘oil for
food’ programme on 31 March 2000. Under this humanitarian initiative,
Baghdad sold oil to buy food, medicine and other supplies. After a
36-year career in the UN, von Sponeck left when it became clear that the
programme was ‘wholly inadequate’ to prevent the deterioration of the
country’s infrastructure. Even the people’s ‘minimum needs’ were not
being met, in contravention of the UN’s own charter.⁹

Von Sponeck was no lone bureaucrat with an axe to grind. Denis Halliday,
von Sponeck’s predecessor in Baghdad, had resigned in 1998 and he was
even more forthright: ‘We are in the process of destroying an entire
society. It is as simple and terrifying as that. It is illegal and
immoral.’¹⁰ He told John Pilger: ‘I had been instructed to implement a
policy that satisfies the definition of genocide: a deliberate policy
that has effectively killed well over a million individuals, children
and adults.’¹¹

Halliday was scathing of the paltry nature of the UN’s humanitarian
initiative: ‘Of the $20 billion that has been provided through the oil
for food programme, about a third, or $7 billion, has been spent on UN
“expenses,” reparations to Kuwait and assorted compensation claims. That
leaves $13 billion available to the Iraqi government. If you divide that
figure by the population of Iraq, which is 22 million, it leaves some
$190 per head of population per year over 3 years – that is pitifully
inadequate.’¹²

Critics of the UN sanctions continued to warn that the modern state of
Iraq was being destroyed. Pilger noted: ‘According to UNICEF, Iraq in
1990 had one of the healthiest and best-educated populations in the
world; its child mortality rate was one of the lowest. Today, it is
among the highest on earth.’¹³ Humanitarian supplies were routinely put
on hold by the UN sanctions committee in New York. The official reason?
‘Suspected dual use’ – in other words, of possible use in both civilian
and military applications. The supplies included medical equipment,
vaccines and painkillers such as morphine, supposedly all considered to
be potential raw materials for ‘weapons of mass destruction.’ And then
there were the proscribed agricultural supplies, water pumps, safety and
fire-fighting equipment; even wheelbarrows. All clearly lethal
implements in the wrong hands.

When the media was challenged to pursue these matters – these are huge
crimes against humanity, after all – they reacted with irritation:
‘We’ve already covered the issue. We did an article a few months ago.’
That was the response I received in 2000 when I attempted to interest
several British newspapers about the ongoing scandal using the ‘news
hook’ of a well-attended public meeting in London with major speakers –
including von Sponeck, Halliday, Pilger, Tony Benn and George Galloway.
David Edwards, who had also been at the meeting and who had similarly
been rebuffed by a number of newspapers, noted of the media: ‘The main
extraordinary unwritten rule is: thou shalt not question what we do!
Because, perhaps even unconsciously, they know that they are so totally
open to criticism, so compromised, self-deceived and deceiving, that
they cannot risk any probing or examination.’¹⁴

And so hardly anyone in the corporate media was brave enough to pursue
the issue that would, by rights, have destroyed the self-serving image
of benign Western power.¹⁵ Somehow, the resignations of two senior UN
diplomats provoked by the ongoing destruction of Iraq raised no more
than a brief murmur amongst broadcasters and journalists. The matter was
then quietly dropped and government propaganda on Iraq once again
swamped the airwaves and newsprint. Why was this?

The Propaganda Model and the Price of Iraq

There is, of course, no conspiracy. It is more subtle, powerful and
pervasive than that; just as Edward Herman and Noam Chomsky demonstrated
in their classic 1988 book, Manufacturing Consent, in which they
introduced the ‘propaganda model’ of the news media. The model basically
describes the normal workings of market forces in the media industry –
the requirement to satisfy the constraints and priorities of rich
advertisers and corporate owners, for example. But the model also
factors in the reluctance in the media, bordering on fear, to confront
political and business elites. Stir in, too, lashings of lustful
journalistic longings to be included in the higher circles of power. ‘Mr
President, Foreign Secretary, Defence Minister – speak to me, please.
Me, me, me!’ Most journalists love having direct access to the corridors
of power. ‘According to sources inside the Cabinet…’, ‘It is understood
that the Prime Minister feels that…’, and so on. Norman Podhoretz, an
American neoconservative commentator, once giddily recalled attending a
state dinner at the White House that ‘included not a single person who
was not visibly and absolutely beside himself with delight to be
there.’¹⁶ It is no wonder that John Pilger, a distinguished exception,
describes the majority of his professional colleagues in the media as
‘the essential foot soldiers in any network devoted to power and
propaganda.’¹⁷

But powerful interests do not rely solely on a network of complacent
journalists. The military establishment also has its own pro-active spin
doctors. Martin Howard, the intriguingly titled ‘director of news’ at
the UK Ministry of Defence, diligently waged a bizarre propaganda war in
support of repeated illegal British and American bombing of Iraq well
before the officially declared start of the Iraq war in 2003. Howard’s
remit seemingly included the scouring of the letters pages of the
British press for anti-Nato sentiments. He would then respond with the
full force of his position, likely being published every single time. I
used to watch out for them. One contribution in the Independent in 2000
defended the US and the UK patrols of the ‘no-fly’ zones which were set
up, he said, to protect northern Kurds and southern Shiites.¹⁸ However,
while UN resolutions had indeed called for the protection of Iraqi
minorities, there was no stipulation for military enforcement of the
zones, as claimed by Howard in justification of bombing runs that
regularly killed and maimed Iraqi civilians.

Even the pro-establishment New York Times reported that ‘no United
Nations resolutions created the restricted [‘no-fly’] zones.’¹⁹ This did
not stop the ‘restricted’ zones growing in size over the years. When
President Clinton ordered missile attacks against Iraq on 3 and 4
September 1996, he admitted during his weekly radio address, ‘I ordered
the attacks in order to extend the no-fly zone.’²⁰ This was done
unilaterally, without authorisation from the UN: customary practice for
the US.

In writing to the Independent, spin doctor Howard claimed that British
or American aeroplanes were not responsible for the deaths, reported in
the same newspaper, of several Iraqis on 17 May 2000. ‘Nato planes
weren’t flying that day,’ he claimed, as the reporter could have
determined if only ‘he had bothered to check’ with Howard.²¹ Of the 300
Iraqis that had been killed, and another 800 injured, in the 18 months
of intense bombings since December 1998, Howard had nothing to say. He
went on to proclaim support for UN security council resolutions. Yet he
omitted any mention of UN resolution 687, paragraph 14, which called for
regional disarmament as the basis for reducing Iraq’s arsenal of
weapons.

The truth is that by arming Iraq’s neighbours in the Middle East, the
West was contravening the same UN resolution which it used to maintain
arguments for sustaining economic sanctions against Iraq. Peter
Hinchcliffe, former British ambassador to Kuwait, and like Howard an
enthusiastic revisionist of the facts, regurgitated in the British press
the US and UK government propaganda line that, courtesy of the UN’s oil
for food programme, Saddam ‘could have chosen to feed the Iraqi people
(and treat them).’²² Never mind that once UN expenses and reparations to
Kuwait and big business had been creamed off, the ‘pitifully inadequate’
sum of $190 was left per head of population per year, as we saw above.²³
As UNICEF warned, the sanctions were killing up to 200 children under
the age of five every day. But even on a ‘slow news day,’ the US and
British public were left uninformed of what their governments were doing
in their name. Journalists call this surreal and deadly state of affairs
‘maintaining professionalism.’

It was Pilger’s disturbing documentary, Paying the Price: Killing the
Children of Iraq, broadcast on ITV in March 2000, which did more than
anything else to galvanise the British public. The Foreign Office were
reportedly shaken by the massive outcry that the UK was complicit in one
of the greatest human rights abuses in recent times.

Robin Cook, then the Foreign Secretary, told Pilger that he would defend
the sanctions publicly ‘at any place and any time.’²⁴ The journalist
asked Cook to name a venue and date of the Foreign Secretary’s choosing.
But the debate never happened.²⁵

It’s worth noting that the title of Pilger’s documentary came from an
apparent verbal slip made by Bill Clinton’s Secretary of State,
Madeleine Albright. When asked on the American news programme 60 Minutes
if the death of more than half a million children was a price worth
paying, she replied, ‘We think the price is worth it.’²⁶ Worth what
exactly? Presumably keeping Saddam in check; or destroying his hold on
power.

The tragic irony was that Saddam was a tyrant of the West’s own making.
By brutally suppressing the Kurds and the Shia Muslims in the 1980s,
Saddam provided ‘political stability’ and ‘market opportunities’ in Iraq
to the benefit of Western strategic and corporate interests. But when he
invaded Kuwait in August 1990, threatening the oil-dependent United
States, he had to be punished. George Bush Senior later admitted that
the Gulf War was all about ‘access to energy resources’ and the threat
to ‘our way of life.’²⁷

And still the bombing of Iraq continued, virtually unreported in the
Western media. When US bombing raids resumed on Iraq in December 1998,
around the time of President Clinton’s impeachment over the Monica
Lewinsky sex scandal, the public was told it was under ‘enhanced rules
of engagement.’ Little was said about what that meant. By 2000, the
number of combat missions flown over Iraq by US and British forces was
already greater than those flown over Yugoslavia in the ‘humanitarian’
intervention of 1999. Hundreds of Iraqi civilians had been killed. After
years of debilitating sanctions, bombing and thorough weapons
inspections, Iraq had no nuclear, chemical or biological capability
left, said former UN weapons inspector Scott Ritter. Saddam, he
emphasised, represented ‘zero threat.’²⁸ If the corporate media had
given at least as much weight to such informed views, rather than the
propaganda emanating from the Bush and Blair governments, then war may
have been averted. Instead, the illegal invasion of Iraq has likely led
to over one million deaths in Iraq, millions of wounded and refugees,
further destabilised the Middle East and the wider world, and increased
the likelihood of future terrorist attacks on Western targets.²⁹

Burying Unpeople and Inconvenient Facts

Not long before the 10^(th) anniversary of the UN sanctions on Iraq,
there had been a brouhaha about Norman Finkelstein’s book The Holocaust
Industry which had exposed the profits and abuses derived from the
sufferings of the Jews, and the many other victims, of the Nazi period.
Finkelstein pointed to an uncomfortable truth: ‘Crimes of official
enemies such as the Khmer Rouge bloodbath in Cambodia, the Soviet
invasion of Afghanistan, the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait, and Serbian
ethnic cleansing in Kosovo recall The Holocaust; crimes in which the US
is complicit do not.’³⁰

Columnist Natasha Walter addressed the issue tentatively in the
Independent, within the rather rigid parameters appropriate to the ‘free
press.’ She wrote, accurately, ‘that Americans – and the British are the
same – would rather wring their hands over the Holocaust than over their
own crimes against humanity.’³¹ The implication was that such crimes –
slavery and colonialism, for example – all belonged to the distant past.
In the present era, however, we were to believe that the United States,
with Britain in a loyal supporting role, is the defender of freedom
against tyrants the world over.

But, as we saw earlier, not only did the cruel UN sanctions on Iraq
constitute an ongoing US/UK-driven holocaust, it was routinely denied or
ignored by Western elites. There is also the hidden holocaust that
extends beyond the historical genocide of native American peoples and
the historical enslavement of black people in the US. Millions of people
have died, and many more millions condemned to lives of misery and
torture, as a result of US interventions in the Philippines, Korea,
Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, Guatemala, Chile, Brazil, Kosovo, Iraq and
elsewhere.³² For example, the US and the UK actively supported Suharto’s
bloody coup in Indonesia in 1965-1966 during which over a million people
were killed. The support persisted beyond Indonesia’s brutal invasion of
East Timor in 1975, which resulted in around 200,000 deaths. As
mentioned in Chapter 1, the British historian Mark Curtis estimates
conservatively that Britain alone bears ‘direct responsibility’ for the
deaths of 4-6 million people worldwide since 1945.³³

But these are inconvenient facts which obscure the West’s self-image as
the good guys. Since the Second World War, ‘the West’ has increasingly
come to mean, in effect, powerful state, political and business
interests. The question of just how benign are the great Western powers,
with their proud notions of democracy, fair play and respect for law and
order, simply does not arise. Politicians and privileged commentators
relentlessly proclaim ‘our’ virtues, in defiance of the documentary
record. The required Orwellian feat of doublethink is impressive.

Our political leaders, and most media commentators and intellectuals,
have managed to convince themselves that the rich and powerful societies
of the West really do uphold freedom, democracy and human rights. Yet
all around lies evidence to the contrary, including the corpses of
‘unworthy’ victims of abusive Western power: in Iraq, Serbia, Southeast
Asia, Latin America and elsewhere. Mark Curtis coined the Orwellian term
‘unpeople’ to describe them.³⁴

Consider the example of the Gulf War desert massacre in 1990-1991.
General Norman ‘Stormin‘’ Schwarzkopf admitted that at least 100,000
Iraqi soldiers were killed. Many of them died not on the battlefield,
but while fleeing in retreat. This took place during the infamous Basra
road ‘turkey shoot’ of Saddam’s coerced and demoralised conscript army
of mostly Kurds and Shia: the same oppressed minorities for which
Western leaders professed concern. Many Iraqi soldiers were buried alive
in trenches by US forces using armoured bulldozers.³⁵ Consider too the
dreadful toll of Iraqi civilian deaths in the intense bombing campaign
in the first Gulf War. According to American and French intelligence
reports, over 200,000 died.³⁶ All of this was barely mentioned at the
time, even on the BBC and in the ‘quality’ press, and is now all but
forgotten.

How can we reconcile these ghastly facts with the widespread belief in
the essential goodness of our ‘liberal-democratic West’? We cannot. ‘Our
boasted civilisation,’ said the writer Jack London, ‘is based upon
blood, soaked in blood, and neither you nor I nor any of us can escape
the scarlet stains.’³⁷ Far from living in a benign society, we are
actually living under a monstrous system that promotes power and profit
above concern for justice and life.

The depiction of reality presented in this book is such a disturbing
notion that perhaps many would rather reject it outright than question
the patriotic propaganda we are fed daily by the media. But then, as
George Orwell once wrote, ‘If liberty means anything at all, it means
the right to tell people what they do not want to hear.’³⁸ Then again,
many people know in their bones that something is deeply wrong with the
picture of the world that is being portrayed by the corporate media.

A Strange Encounter with the Former Foreign Secretary

A few days after the terrorist attacks of 11 September 2001, I was
waiting for my flight home from Heathrow to Glasgow when I encountered
an alleged war criminal walking around freely. It was Robin Cook, the
former British foreign secretary and then-leader of the House of
Commons. Iraq, Serbia and East Timor had all been subjected to his
foreign policy with an alleged ‘ethical dimension.’³⁹

Mr Cook was, I assume, waiting to check in for his flight back to his
home constituency of Livingston in Scotland for the weekend. Resisting
the temptation to make a citizen’s arrest, I introduced myself politely
and told him, ‘You bear a heavy responsibility for the plight of
children in Iraq.’ Hardly missing a beat, he responded: ‘Don’t we all?’
and turned away. Despite feeling a bit awkward with people starting to
look on, I persisted: ‘According to senior UN officials who resigned
from their posts in Baghdad, economic sanctions are responsible for the
deaths of more than 500,000 Iraqi children under the age of five.’

Mr Cook turned back to me. His response was familiar Foreign Office
propaganda: ‘there are no economic sanctions’; flows of ‘food and
medicine are not blocked by the West’; Saddam Hussein has ‘19 billion
dollars in a New York bank account’; Saddam has ‘imported 10,000 bottles
of whisky.’ All of these statements were deceptions that had already
been exposed by authoritative UN officials, credible non-governmental
organisations and a tiny handful of diligent activists and reporters.⁴⁰

That Cook continued to propagate such disinformation, and believe in it
utterly, as was clear from our face to face exchange, was cognitive
dissonance of the highest order. The White Queen in Lewis Carroll’s
Through the Looking-Glass could believe six impossible things before
breakfast. Cook was apparently able to believe a multitude of impossible
things before and after every meal of the day.

As we saw above, Denis Halliday, the former UN Assistant
Secretary-General, had resigned from his Baghdad post as coordinator of
the UN humanitarian oil for food programme in September 1998. In David
Edwards’s interview with him in March 2000, Halliday had pointed out
that the shortage of food and medical supplies in Iraq was the direct
responsibility of Washington and London:

  ‘They have deliberately played games through the Sanctions Committee
  with this programme for years – it’s a deliberate ploy. For the
  British Government to say that the quantities involved for vaccinating
  kids are going to produce weapons of mass destruction, is just
  nonsense.

  ‘That’s why I’ve been using the word “genocide,” because this is a
  deliberate policy to destroy the people of Iraq. I’m afraid I have no
  other view at this late stage.’⁴¹

 

‘Denis Halliday is wrong,’ retorted Robin Cook when I reminded him of Mr
Halliday’s views. Several air travellers were by now watching intently
from the sidelines. A part of my mind was wondering whether Cook had
official minders who would now muscle in. Could I even be arrested if I
continued to make a nuisance of myself?

Cook went on: ‘I was foreign secretary. I know what the facts are.’ My
reply, that UN officials who had been based in Baghdad would surely have
a better grasp of the facts, went unanswered as a bystander – possibly a
minder – intervened to tell Cook that it was his turn to check in. The
desperation of Cook to deny his role in massive human rights abuses in
Iraq was pitiful to see; not that I had expected any different. I was
left a bit shaken by the encounter and I moved away with a heavy heart
to catch my own flight. Still, I had at least confronted him when given
the chance.

The Economist magazine had pointed out in 2000 that: ‘If, year in, year
out, the UN were systematically killing Iraqi children by air strikes,
Western governments would declare it intolerable, no matter how noble
the intention: They should find their existing policy [of sanctions]
just as unacceptable.’⁴² We might reasonably dispute that weasel phrase,
‘how noble the intention’; but the message was clear enough: stop
killing Iraqi children.

As for subsequent moves by the UN Security Council to switch to ‘smart
sanctions,’ a repackaged policy to ‘streamline’ the totally inadequate
oil-for-food ‘humanitarian programme,’ this generated deep scepticism
amongst those with knowledge on the ground. According to an officer with
a high-profile aid agency who had requested anonymity, smart sanctions
‘won’t improve life for the ordinary Iraqi. It will be a dole, a handout
to Iraq as a whole. It will do nothing to tackle the real issue – how to
stimulate the internal economy and allow civil society to come back.’⁴³

Halliday and his successor, Hans von Sponeck, observed that: ‘The UK and
the US, as permanent members of the [UN] council, are fully aware that
the UN embargo operates in breach of the UN covenants on human rights,
the Geneva and Hague conventions and other international laws.’⁴⁴

That Britain may be harbouring criminal politicians responsible for
appalling crimes against humanity – and, indeed, that these criminals
are our political leaders past and present – is almost by definition an
unthinkable thought, at least in ‘respectable’ circles.

And yet, consider the standard view of the media expressed by Andrew
Marr, then the BBC’s political editor: ‘If people don’t know about power
and let their attention wander completely, then those in power will take
liberties. And the only way to keep the huge power of the market and the
political elites in some kind of check is through an informed, active
and occasionally difficult citizenry. And this, in turn, needs
public-sphere journalism, even if it doesn’t always realise it.’⁴⁵

The implication of Marr’s virtuous but deluded statement is that
‘public-sphere journalism’ already serves, more or less, to keep in
check ‘the huge power of the market and the political elites.’ If so,
then public-sphere journalism is essentially blind to the thirteen-year
period (1990-2003) of genocidal sanctions in Iraq, as well as the
illegality of the 2003 invasion, the criminality of numerous US bombings
and drone attacks against people in Afghanistan and Pakistan, and
staunch US-UK support for the brutal Israeli occupation of Palestinian
territories.

Building on a high-profile newspaper career, capped by his editorship of
the Independent, Marr went on to deploy his public-sphere journalism at
the BBC where he reported in 2001: ‘A few years ago we were very worried
about human rights in Chechnya – we’re not any more.’⁴⁶ To put it more
bluntly: a ‘crude deal’ had been struck between Blair and Putin in
Moscow: Britain would cast a blind eye over Russian atrocities in
Chechnya in exchange for Russian support for the Bush-Blair
international ‘war against terrorism.’ But even this grotesque quid pro
quo did not stack up. Blair’s government had consistently turned its
back on Chechnyan victims from the very start.

This is all part of a bigger picture of the West’s role in condoning and
promoting terror around the world. Since the Second World War, as Edward
Herman has noted, such a policy has been ‘used regularly to create
governments of terror that quickly opened their doors to foreign
investment and kept labor markets as “flexible” as the transnationals
and IMF [International Monetary Fund] might desire.’⁴⁷

And it’s all supported by a largely uncritical media. In Herman’s words:
‘the propaganda system works extremely well, providing Big
Brother-quality results under a system of “freedom.”’⁴⁸

When Untruths Prevail, Catastrophes May Ensue

‘Our nation has rid the world of thousands of terrorists, destroyed
Afghanistan’s terrorist training camps, saved a people from starvation,
and freed a country from brutal oppression.’ Thus proclaimed President
George W. Bush in his State of the Union address on 29 January 2002.⁴⁹

That the US ‘saved a people from starvation’ was a view given short
shrift by international aid agencies. ‘We are getting increasingly
frustrated with the promises of the international community,’ said
Christopher Stokes of Médecins Sans Frontières. ‘All the talk of world
leaders, donor countries and international organizations of their
commitment to the Afghan people, translates into little for many people
in remote areas. In northern Afghanistan, a new disaster is in the
making and can only be averted by immediate and unrestrained action.’⁵⁰

If the public had known of the immensity and immediacy of the ongoing
Afghan tragedy, somehow overlooked by the corporate media, then perhaps
action would have been forthcoming. Around this time, Media Lens and our
readers had been asking the BBC why it had given minimal coverage to the
starvation and deaths of hundreds of thousands of Afghan civilians – not
enemies, but innocent bystanders like the victims of September 11 –
given that our government bore considerable responsibility for their
suffering. We never received a serious answer. Instead, in its robotic
replies, the BBC restated its supposed commitment to ‘open-mindedness,
fairness and a respect for truth.’⁵¹ Sadly, such a response is typical
of a corporate media system which is not genuinely accountable, much
less responsible, to the public.

Around this time, BBC adverts were declaring: ‘Honesty, integrity – it’s
what the BBC stands for.’ More realistically, John Pilger referred to
‘the subliminal pressures applied by organisations like the BBC, whose
news is often selected on the basis of a spurious establishment
“credibility.”’⁵² Where this basis is lacking – for example, where the
establishment is embarrassed by mass suffering for which it bears real
responsibility – then such news cannot be credible and so is not
selected for public dissemination.

Given the BBC’s potential vulnerability to informed criticism of its
abysmal record,⁵³ one might imagine that an alert journalist would have
some good, penetrating questions to ask on being granted a major
interview with the BBC’s director-general. But when Louise Jury, the
Independent’s media correspondent, interviewed Greg Dyke in 2002 she was
more concerned with Dyke’s ‘disdain’ for the ‘dull beige-brown’ carpet
in his office than with the BBC’s power-friendly performance in
reporting the terrorist attacks of September 11 and subsequent events.⁵⁴
Also off-limits was the reality that while the BBC may not be supported
by corporate advertising,⁵⁵ it does have to compete in a fiercely
competitive, corporate-shaped marketplace where dissident views are
systematically squeezed out.

The result of all this was explained by Pilger when I interviewed him
for Red Pepper magazine: ‘[The BBC’s] terms of reference are so narrow
and so integrated into a consensus view that it is a form of propaganda.
The way the news agendas are presented is simply an extension of an
established, almost accredited, point of view.’⁵⁶

As we saw above, a tragic case of media failure was its distorted
coverage of the UN sanctions against Iraq, a cruel punishment that was
imposed and maintained with unbending enthusiasm by the US and its
British ally. As former UN diplomat Denis Halliday said: ‘I’m very
disappointed with the BBC. The BBC has been very aggressively in favour
of sanctions.’⁵⁷ Needless to say, this is a view that never made it on
to the BBC news.

The underlying reason for such dangerous views being marginalised was
provided by Stuart Hood, a former BBC Television Controller, when he
explained that ‘impartiality’ is to be understood as ‘the acceptance of
that segment of opinion which constitutes parliamentary consensus.’⁵⁸
But, as Dan Hind notes in his book, The Return of the Public: ‘In such
circumstances balance and impartiality reliably favour’ those who have
‘secured some degree of power already. In a society where wealth and
power are distributed very unevenly the doctrine of balance will tend to
favour those already favoured while making this bias seem both natural
and just. Necessarily, too, balance will marginalize information that
would strengthen calls for changes to the structure of power.’⁵⁹

Many honourable BBC professionals, and other journalists, do their best
within the constraints of a globalised political and economic system
that makes honest reporting all but impossible. However, it is important
to illuminate the systematic bias of compromised reporting which
promotes the subordination of people and planet to profit. As the
humanist and dissident thinker Erich Fromm wrote: ‘To be naive and
easily deceived is impermissible, today more than ever, when the
prevailing untruths may lead to a catastrophe because they blind people
to real dangers and real possibilities.’⁶⁰

‘The Price Has Been Worth It,’ Once Again

The context missing from news reports on Iraq after the 2003 invasion
was that the massive invasion-occupation of that country was part of a
decades-old US strategy of maintaining credibility and generating fear
around the world in the face of its awesome power. In the 1980s,
President Ronald Reagan’s planners had warned Europe that if they did
not join Washington’s ‘war on terror’ with proper enthusiasm, ‘the crazy
Americans’ might ‘take matters into their own hands.’⁶¹

In the 1990s, President Bill Clinton’s Strategic Command (STRATCOM)
advised that ‘part of the national persona we project’ should be as an
‘irrational and vindictive’ power, with some elements ‘potentially “out
of control.”’⁶² The US threat to use nuclear weapons in Iraq, raised by
Donald Rumsfeld as Bush Jr’s Defense Secretary, was certainly part of
the US’s useful projection of an ‘out of control’ persona. One report in
the Independent claimed that a six-page ‘doctrine’ (sic), titled the
‘National Strategy to Combat Weapons of Mass Destruction,’ called for
‘pre-emptive action against potential enemies’ including a ‘readiness to
launch a nuclear strike against a foe threatening to use weapons of mass
destruction against America or its forces.’⁶³

In re-declaring a never-ending ‘war against terror,’ with Afghanistan
torn and bleeding in phase one and the sights set on Iraq in phase two,
Bush Jr was performing his required role. The UK media was a central
element in portraying to the British public the illusion of Blair as a
benevolent figure of moral and political authority, struggling to do
‘the right thing.’ ‘Putting the world to rights: a busy day in Downing
Street,’ proclaimed a headline in the Independent. Blair, we were told,
‘spent much of yesterday advancing the cause of world peace with a
series of high-profile Downing Street guests.’⁶⁴ That the incumbent
British prime minister ought to have been on trial for war crimes in
Kosovo, Afghanistan and Iraq went unsaid. Leading British politicians
are shielded from such uncomfortable truths by a faithful retinue of
mainstream journalists and commentators; and, for the most part, by an
educated elite in academia for whom any deviation from the guiding
principle of basic British decency and goodwill is all too often
inconceivable.

But there are brave and welcome exceptions to the norm. The academically
unembedded Mark Curtis is unafraid to note that: ‘The concept of
Britain’s basic benevolence is, however, unsustainable in view of the
historical and contemporary facts of the real world.’ Curtis continues:
‘the basic political and economic priorities of the leading Western
states – especially Britain and the United States, the two leading
Western powers of the postwar period – are fundamentally in
contradiction with the grand principles assumed to be generally
consistent with foreign policy.’⁶⁵

As Curtis rightly observes: ‘Since 1945, rather than occasionally
deviating from the promotion of peace, democracy, human rights and
economic development in the Third World, British (and US) foreign policy
has been systematically opposed to them, whether the Conservatives or
Labour (or Republicans or Democrats) have been in power. This has had
grave consequences for those on the receiving end of Western policies
abroad.’⁶⁶ John Pilger notes: ‘An accounting of the sheer scale and
continuity and consequences of American imperial violence is our élite’s
most enduring taboo.’⁶⁷

At best, uncomfortable facts can only be hinted at, such as when a BBC
report referred to Henry Kissinger as ‘one of the United States’ best
known statesmen [who] was seen by some as tainted not only by his
business dealings, but also by his involvement in murky periods of the
country’s history.’⁶⁸ Ordering the secret bombings of Cambodia, with
600,000 civilians killed according to CIA estimates, counts as no more
than ‘involvement’ in a ‘murky period’ of history.

Senior BBC managers and editors do not have to be told to support the
government’s most crucial agenda items; it comes naturally to them,
otherwise they would never have been filtered into their comfortable,
elevated, establishment-friendly positions. (Or, on the very rare
occasion when they overstep the mark, as Gavyn Davies and Greg Dyke
discovered following Andrew Gilligan’s revelations of government ‘sexing
up’ of WMD propaganda, they are made to pay the price.) Hence, the BBC
Radio 4 Today programme could give top billing in January 2003 to a
dubious claim that Iraq was preparing to use chemical weapons should the
US invade. Unsigned handwritten ‘documents,’ presented to the BBC by the
Iraqi National Coalition, an opposition group supposedly with extensive
ties to Iraqi armed forces, formed the basis for this ‘news story.’⁶⁹

Predictably, the documents ‘were seized on by Downing Street as showing
that President Saddam was preparing to use chemical weapons in the event
of war and that he was not complying with UN resolutions.’⁷⁰ Later in
the day, the BBC appeared to have backed off a little, with diplomatic
correspondent Bridget Kendall noting in an online news report that the
group that had ‘provided these documents has vested interests in seeing
Saddam Hussein undermined, so it is very difficult to assess whether we
should believe the documents.’ She added that ‘the timing of their
release is significant at a time when the United States and the UK are
trying to win over opinion to their approach to the Iraq crisis.’⁷¹

The belated sceptical tone was welcome, but the desired effect had
already been conveyed by the extensive airtime devoted to the initial
story by the agenda-setting Today programme: maintaining the level of
fear in Britain and thus helping to facilitate a war on Iraq; a war that
had nothing to do with disarming the country of alleged weapons of mass
destruction, and everything to do with control of, and access to, oil
resources and oil profits, strengthening Western control in the region,
and demonstrating to the world at large that the US would not tolerate
any threats to its power.

Meanwhile, real news that might have seriously exposed this Western
agenda may have been quietly noted in passing, but rarely received the
extensive coverage that establishment-friendly news agendas constantly
demand. Witness the virtual burying of the revelations that, on the eve
of war, UN teams investigated the sites of Blair’s infamous dossier of
Iraq’s WMD and discovered nothing untoward.

One tiny passage at the end of an article by Richard Norton-Taylor in
the Guardian dealt with the investigated sites: ‘The government,
meanwhile, said yesterday that UN inspectors had visited all the sites
mentioned in its intelligence-backed dossier but had not found “any
signs” of weapons of mass destruction. Nor were there any signs of
“programmes for their production at the sites,” Mike O’Brien, the
Foreign Office minister, told the Labour MP Harry Cohen.’ The last word
was given to the government interpretation of this exposure of its
utterly fraudulent dossier: namely, the ludicrous suggestion given by
O’Brien ‘that, given the advance publicity the government gave to the
sites, “it is not entirely surprising that the inspectors failed to
uncover any evidence.”’⁷² This fits a pattern of deception and lies that
had been going on for years.

When confronted with its systematic failure to help the British licence
payer make sense of the real world, BBC news managers would reply
gravely that ‘it is absolutely the BBC’s role to be the objective and
calm voice, reporting what we know to be fact and exploring the various
viewpoints involved’;⁷³ and that the BBC will ‘air a full range of
views.’⁷⁴ The BBC’s relentless mirroring of government statements about
the supposed threat of Iraq was, presumably, ‘reporting what we know to
be fact.’ The very few dissident words broadcast by Tony Benn, George
Galloway or the occasional peace activist, were all but drowned out in
the vast amounts of air-time devoted to the warmongering deceptions of
Tony Blair, Donald Rumsfeld and Jack Straw. This gross imbalance
constituted ‘air[ing] a full range of views.’ Broadcasting a tiny
handful of skewed debates or news ‘analysis’ programmes such as
Panorama, represented ‘exploring the various viewpoints involved.’

In December 2011, President Obama declared an official end to the war in
Iraq at a ceremony at Andrews Air Force Base in Maryland. As Obama
looked on approvingly, General Lloyd Austin, the top US commander in
Iraq, declared: ‘What our troops achieved in Iraq over the course of
nearly nine years is truly remarkable. Together with our coalition
partners and corps of dedicated civilians, they removed a brutal
dictator and gave the Iraqi people their freedom.’ As writer Joseph
Kishore noted: ‘Field Marshal Göring could not have put it better in
speaking of the “liberation” of Poland.’⁷⁵

The US Secretary of Defense Leon Panetta declared that the invading
troops had achieved ‘ultimate success.’ They had been a ‘driving force
behind the remarkable progress’ in Iraq and they could proudly leave the
country ‘secure in knowing that your sacrifice has helped the Iraqi
people begin a new chapter in history, free from tyranny and full of
hope for prosperity and peace.’⁷⁶ Later, speaking of the human cost of
the war, he said, ‘I think the price has been worth it.’⁷⁷ There was a
haunting echo here of Madeleine Albright’s justification for the deaths
of half a million young Iraqi children under UN sanctions.

As the US troops flew home, BBC news bulletins made passing reference to
the ‘tens of thousands’ of Iraqis who had been killed, a gross
underestimate of the true death toll that likely exceeds one million.⁷⁸

After the huge propaganda campaign founded on lies and deceptions about
Iraq, media professionals have seemingly learned nothing about the
responsibility of journalists. Indeed, as Iran replaces Iraq in the
crosshairs of Western firepower, it is clear that very little has
changed. The media is once again on hand to channel fear-mongering
propaganda emanating from Washington and London.

With very few exceptions, news editors, reporters and commentators have
been complicit in promoting the West’s ‘war on terror’ of the early
21^(st) century. So how would news editors and journalists respond when
challenged about this? We’ll find out in the next chapter.


How to Cover Your Tracks After Promoting War

 

  The evidence suggests we have no need for a mea culpa. We did our job
  well.

  David Mannion, Head of Independent Television News¹

 

All the Apocryphal Stories Fit to Print

In 2004, both the New York Times and the Washington Post admitted
amplifying US government propaganda in the run-up to the 2003 invasion
of Iraq. While this self-criticism passed over much that mattered, it
was nevertheless significant.

The New York Times editors wrote: ‘We have found a number of instances
of coverage that was not as rigorous as it should have been. In some
cases, information that was controversial then, and seems questionable
now, was insufficiently qualified or allowed to stand unchallenged.
Looking back, we wish we had been more aggressive in re-examining the
claims as new evidence emerged – or failed to emerge.’² Chris Hedges, a
New York Times foreign correspondent at the time, was more blunt: ‘the
entire paper enthusiastically served as a propaganda machine for the
impending invasion of Iraq.’³

‘We are inevitably the mouthpiece for whatever administration is in
power,’ said Karen DeYoung, a former assistant managing editor of the
Washington Post, who covered the pre-war diplomacy. ‘If the president
stands up and says something, we report what the president said.’ And if
contrary arguments are put ‘in the eighth paragraph, where they’re not
on the front page, a lot of people don’t read that far.’⁴ Media critic
Mike Whitney summed up the paper’s failings starkly: ‘The apocryphal
stories that appeared on the front page of the Post were the basis for
an illegal invasion and countless deaths.’⁵

Dan Rather, who was the CBS news anchor for 24 years, told John Pilger
in an interview for the documentary The War You Don’t See, broadcast on
ITV in December 2010: ‘There was a fear in every newsroom in America, a
fear of losing your job… the fear of being stuck with some label,
unpatriotic or otherwise.’ Rather said that the Iraq war made
‘stenographers out of us’ by printing and broadcasting the government
propaganda that had been fed to them. He said that if journalists had
questioned the deceptions that led to the Iraq war, instead of
amplifying them, the invasion would not have happened. Pilger added:
‘This is a view now shared by a number of senior journalists I
interviewed in the US.’⁶

It is revealing to compare all of the above with the responses from a
British media that often assumes it is far more honest and open than the
American media. In fact, two major studies of television coverage, one
by Cardiff University and the other by the Media Tenor research
institute, showed that BBC News overwhelmingly reflected the government
line and downplayed reports of civilian suffering. The Cardiff study
even found that the BBC had ‘displayed the most “pro-war” agenda of any
broadcaster.’⁷ Media Tenor placed the BBC and America’s CBS at the
bottom of a league of Western broadcasters in the time they allotted to
opposition to the invasion.⁸

Rageh Omaar reported the war for BBC News from Baghdad, where he
described the arrival of the invading troops as ‘a liberation.’ In 2010,
four years after he had left the BBC, he told John Pilger: ‘I didn’t
really do my job properly. I’d hold my hand up and say that one didn’t
press the most uncomfortable buttons hard enough.’⁹ With admirable
frankness, he described BBC news coverage as ‘a giant echo chamber’ for
military propaganda.

David Miller, a social scientist and a co-founder of SpinWatch.org,
noted: ‘There have been no apologies at all from UK broadcasters for
relaying as fact (not just as “reports”) the lies about WMD,
uncritically reporting the preposterous stories about connections
between Iraq and al-Qaeda, or the supposed “humanitarian mission” of the
US and UK. […] In fact BBC managers have fallen over themselves to
grovel to the government in the aftermath of the Hutton whitewash. When
will any of the BBC journalists who reported the [fictitious] “Scud”
[Iraqi missile] attacks apologise? When will their bosses apologise for
conspiring to keep the anti war movement off the screens? Not any time
soon.’¹⁰

Over a year after the invasion of Iraq, I challenged senior editors in
the British media about their Iraq coverage as part of a Media Lens
investigation.

The Observer: ‘Yes, We Read the Paper, Old Friend’

Roger Alton, then editor of the Observer, responded: ‘I think our
reporting on Iraq was exceptionally fair. Journalism is by definition a
first draft of history. It is rough and ready, people doing their best
under trying circumstances often.’ Alton, who went on to become editor
of the Independent then executive editor of The Times, continued: ‘We
faithfully reported claim and counter claim in the build up to Iraq.
With exceptional journalists like Peter Beaumont, Jason Burke, and Ed
Vulliamy our news, feature and commentary coverage was fair, thorough
and unbiased.’¹¹

But far from being ‘exceptionally fair,’ the Observer did next to
nothing to challenge, and much to boost, government propaganda on Iraq.
It failed to critically appraise the supposed threat of Saddam Hussein,
to report the success of the 1991-1998 UN weapons inspections, and to
investigate the real reasons for USUK aggression towards Iraq. As
Guardian journalist Nick Davies noted in his book Flat Earth News, the
Observer even suppressed a report that was submitted repeatedly by Ed
Vulliamy to his editors in which he revealed that the CIA knew the WMD
story was a lie.¹²

In late 2002, Media Lens noted that former UN Assistant
Secretary-General Denis Halliday had never been so much as mentioned in
the Observer. In January 2003, as war loomed on the horizon, the
Guardian and Observer mentioned Iraq in 760 articles. These are some of
the mentions of key search terms that Media Lens found:

-   Iraq and Bush, 283 mentions.
-   Iraq and Blair, 292.
-   Iraq and [Jack] Straw, 79.
-   Iraq and [Colin] Powell, 67.
-   Iraq and [Donald] Rumsfeld, 40.
-   Iraq and [Dick] Cheney, 17.
-   Iraq and [Richard] Perle, 3.

By contrast, Media Lens also found these mentions for major anti-war
voices:

-   Iraq and [Tony] Benn, 11 mentions.
-   Iraq and [George] Galloway, 10.
-   Iraq and [Harold] Pinter, 5.
-   Iraq and [Scott] Ritter, 4.
-   Iraq and [Noam] Chomsky, 4.
-   Iraq and [John] Pilger, 2.
-   Iraq and [Denis] Halliday, 0.
-   Iraq and [Hans] von Sponeck, 0.
-   Iraq and [Milan] Rai¹³, 0.

These leading voices for peace, at a time of massive public opposition
to war, totalled 36 mentions out of 760 mentions of Iraq: less than US
Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld alone received. In 2003, out of
12,357 Guardian and Observer articles mentioning Iraq, Denis Halliday
received 2 mentions; Hans von Sponeck, 5; Scott Ritter, 17.

Of course, these figures do not constitute an in-depth statistical
analysis of the contents of the newspaper over the period in question –
that would likely require a PhD thesis – but they are indicative of the
skewed balance of coverage. So while the views of Denis Halliday and
Hans von Sponeck were almost totally blanked by the Observer, pro-war
writers like Nick Cohen were given free rein: ‘I look forward to seeing
how Noam Chomsky and John Pilger manage to oppose a war which would end
the sanctions they claim have slaughtered hundreds of thousands of
children who otherwise would have had happy, healthy lives in a prison
state (don’t fret, they’ll get there).’¹⁴

The Observer editor sent this exasperated reply to an email from an
83-year-old veteran of the Second World War who had expressed his
opposition to the West’s crushing of Iraq which had been enabled by
biased media coverage: ‘This is just not true… it’s Saddam who’s killing
all the bloody children, not sanctions. Sorry.’¹⁵

The Observer lost its credibility with many people when it published a
pro-war editorial in January 2003. Readers were told that a US-UK
‘motive for displacing Saddam is the danger he poses to the wider
world,’ and that: ‘Legitimacy is fundamental to the values of Western
powers. Wherever possible, we make law, not war, and where war is
unavoidable, we observe the law in its conduct.’¹⁶

As John Pilger noted: ‘Pretending to wring its hands, the paper
announced it was for attacking Iraq… The paper that stood proudly
against [UK Prime Minister] Eden on Suez [when Britain, France and
Israel invaded Egypt in 1956] is but a supplicant to the warmongering
Blair, willing to support the very crime the judges at Nuremberg deemed
the most serious of all: an unprovoked attack on a sovereign country
offering no threat. Not a word in the Observer‘s editorial mentioned the
great crime committed by the British and American governments against
the ordinary people of Iraq.’¹⁷

Observer journalist David Rose wrote major investigative articles
linking Saddam Hussein to al-Qaeda and to the anthrax attacks in
America. To his credit, Rose later commented in the Evening Standard
that he looked ‘back with shame and disbelief’ at his support for the
invasion.¹⁸ Rose was also interviewed by John Pilger in the documentary,
The War You Don’t See. Rose told Pilger:

    ‘I can make no excuses… What happened [in Iraq] was a crime, a crime
    on a very large scale…’

  “Does that make journalists accomplices?” Pilger asked Rose.

  ‘Yes… unwitting perhaps, but yes.’

 

Such welcome candour was missing when Observer columnist Andrew Rawnsley
dismissed reservations about the war as casualties continued to mount
after US troops had taken over Baghdad. In a piece headed, ‘The voices
of doom were so wrong,’ he said: ‘Yes, too many people died in the war.
Too many people always die in war. War is nasty and brutish, but at
least this conflict was mercifully short. The death toll has been
nothing like as high as had been widely feared. Thousands have died in
this war, millions have died at the hands of Saddam.’¹⁹

The Observer‘s editors were repeatedly challenged by readers about the
paper’s shocking lack of balance. Responses were invariably curt or
dismissive, systematically ignoring the rational arguments presented.
Thus, Ben Summerskill, then assistant editor of the Observer, wrote to
one Media Lens reader: ‘I just don’t think medialens has even studied
the Observer – all the evidence is not – so am astounded that they
assume to lecture other people about what’s in it.’²⁰ Editor Roger Alton
occasionally resorted to colourful abuse in his own replies to readers:
‘What a lot of balls… do you read the paper old friend?… “Pre-digested
pablum [sic] from Downing Street…” my arse. Do you read the paper or are
you just recycling garbage from Medialens?’²¹

However, from inside the Observer, a journalist, who naturally asked to
remain anonymous, indicated to Media Lens that all was not quite as the
editor would have us believe: ‘Your media alerts and website have
afforded me great solace and insight over the last eighteen months –
making me feel less alone and more angry as the wretched failure of the
“fourth estate” to hold our “leaders” to account becomes increasingly
apparent.’²²

ITN: Nothing to Apologise For

When I asked David Mannion, head of Independent Television News (ITN),
whether they had conducted a self-examination of Iraq coverage, he told
me: ‘We already have and the evidence suggests we have no need for a mea
culpa. We did our job well.’ In a follow-up email on the same day, he
added: ‘Thank you for your interest and I can assure you we will remain
self critical and vigilant.’²³

Mannion’s response is an intriguing case study in deluded
self-satisfaction. ITN’s thin coverage of the effect of the UN’s
genocidal sanctions on Iraq, for example, was consistently presented
from the standpoint of power. As the media drumbeat for an attack on
Iraq grew louder and louder, David Edwards, my co-editor at Media Lens,
armed himself with a video recorder, immense patience, and copious cups
of tea. Over many months, from the build-up to the invasion and beyond,
he transcribed propaganda nuggets from the many news programmes he
monitored and taped. For example, on the issue of UN sanctions, ITN
reporter John Draper demonstrated his compliance with government
deception when he reported: ‘The idea now is targeted or “smart”
sanctions to help ordinary people while at the same time preventing the
Iraqi leader from blaming the West for the hardships they’re suffering.
Ministers say Saddam Hussein has eleven thousand million dollars for
food, but which he’s holding back because of the sanctions regime.’²⁴

Draper and ITN thus took a powerful and well-founded accusation from UN
diplomats, aid agencies and human rights groups – that Washington and
London were primarily responsible for the deaths of over one million
Iraqi civilians – and attributed it to a hate figure with no
credibility, namely Saddam Hussein. The intended result was that the
truth could be dismissed as nonsense.

ITN’s Washington correspondent, Robert Moore, concluded an August 2002
report by referring to Bush’s urgent need to make a decision on whether
to attack Iraq: ‘As Dick Cheney, his vice president warned, Iraq may
soon be armed with a nuclear weapon.’²⁵

As is clear now, and as informed commentators knew at the time, Cheney’s
comment was a sickening distortion of the truth. But, tragically, there
seemed no prospect of Moore, or anyone else at ITN, ever seeking a
hidden agenda behind Cheney’s ludicrous claims; or of examining the
likelihood that Washington had already decided to launch a war against
that devastated country for ulterior geostrategic motives that had
nothing to do with WMD.

In a damning report, British academics Glen Rangwala and Dan Plesch
revealed the reality hidden by our media: ‘[T]here is strong evidence
that the Prime Minister committed his support to President Bush for an
invasion of Iraq in 2002. He did this in the knowledge that the US
administration had already decided to oust Saddam Hussein, regardless of
any progress on the issue of Iraq’s weapons.’²⁶

Rangwala and Plesch added: ‘The only way in which the British government
recognised that it could justify an invasion of Iraq would be to use the
United Nations weapons inspectors to provide a pretext for an invasion.
The evidence indicates that the Prime Minister recognised that the work
of UNMOVIC [the UN Monitoring, Verification and Inspection Commission]
to verify Iraq’s disarmament would not be allowed to substitute for an
invasion.’²⁷

Compare this with the Observer’s propaganda version of events at the
time: ‘Mr Blair’s doughty battle to keep pressure focused on Saddam
Hussein and to ensure that any action taken has the widest support
possible is the correct stance. He is risking his premiership on his
vision of an international order that is just and legitimate… Even his
critics should acknowledge the remarkable leadership he is
exhibiting.’²⁸

Consider also an ITN report in December 2002, with the invasion rapidly
approaching. Newsreader Katie Derham began by declaring: ‘Saddam Hussein
has lied to the United Nations and the world is one step closer to a war
with Iraq. That’s the message from America tonight, as the UN’s chief
weapons inspector admitted there’s nothing new in Saddam’s weapons
dossier. The White House confirmed a short while ago that President Bush
is now ramping up towards an attack.’

Derham handed over to Bill Neely, international editor, who referred to
the Iraqi weapons dossier and asked, ‘What’s missing?’ Neely answered:
‘Iraq doesn’t account for hundreds of artillery shells filled with
mustard gas that inspectors know it had. Iraq said in the past it had
lost them!’²⁹

The sarcasm replaced any sense of a need to question if these missing
artillery shells were seriously being proposed as a reason for launching
a war. There appeared to be no need to question whether use of these
weapons, described by arms inspectors as battlefield weaponry of minimal
importance, might be deterred by the US’s 6,144 nuclear warheads. When
eleven empty artillery shells were found in an Iraqi bunker in January
2003, an ITN expert declared: ‘The real smoking gun, of course, would be
if one of those shells was still found to contain a chemical mixture.’³⁰

A single shell containing a chemical mixture would presumably constitute
a ‘smoking gun’ legitimising war. Speaking under a banner graphic
reading, ‘Timetable to War,’ ITN newsreader Nicholas Owen said: ‘It
seems the question is no longer if we’ll attack Iraq, but when and how.
So what happens next? What’s the timetable to war?’

ITN presumably saw its role as simply reporting what our leaders had
decided, rather than questioning a war of aggression that was both
profoundly immoral and illegal. Robert Moore in Washington declared:
‘The bottom line here at the White House, certainly, President Bush
believes that Saddam Hussein has missed his final opportunity to save
his regime.’

Throughout the build-up to war on Iraq, ITN, like the other
broadcasters, relentlessly channelled the deceptions of US and UK
government spokespeople. The views of former generals and military
experts were sought out vigorously and given a prominent platform. By
way of fraudulent ‘balance,’ journalists turned to the same Iraqi
politicians they had demonised for over a decade as a gang of liars and
cut-throat murderers: ‘a rogue’s gallery of the world’s most wanted
men,’ as ITN’s Nicholas Owen described them.³¹ By contrast, serious and
credible voices challenging government propaganda, those who offered
authentic balance to the likes of Bush, Blair, Powell and Straw, were
ignored routinely by ITN and other media.

Following the invasion and the first phase of the US-led warfare, ITN’s
John Irvine demonstrated impressive power-friendly wishful thinking: ‘A
war of three weeks has brought an end to decades of Iraqi misery.’³² ITN
correspondent Mike Nicholson could barely contain himself as US troops
toppled a statue of Saddam Hussein: ‘They’ve covered his face in the
Stars and Stripes! This gets better by the minute… Ha ha, better by the
minute.’³³ That same month, ITN correspondent Tim Rogers was happy to
pass on the good news that the Americans ‘have no long-term ambitions in
Iraq.’³⁴

In September 2003, ITN political editor Nick Robinson, who now performs
the same state-friendly role on the BBC, described how ‘hundreds of
[British] servicemen are risking their lives to bring peace and security
to the streets of Iraq’³⁵; a goal they had pursued by illegally invading
the country under the umbrella of a ‘Shock and Awe’ aerial bombardment.

Time and again, ITN journalists unthinkingly presented the ‘coalition’
version of reality as the only version worthy of attention.

Independent on Sunday: A True Guardian of Power

The Independent on Sunday (IoS) did take a somewhat critical line
towards the war. Indeed, along with the Daily Mirror, the IoS was
unusual in its willingness to challenge US-UK government propaganda on
Iraq. Following the invasion, a front-page IoS editorial asked pointedly
of Iraq’s alleged WMD: ‘So where are they? In case we forget, distracted
by the thought of thousands of dead Iraqi civilians, looted museums and
gathering political chaos, the proclaimed purpose of this war, vainly
pursued by Britain and the US through the United Nations, was to disarm
Saddam Hussein and to destroy weapons of mass destruction deemed a
menace to the entire world.’³⁶

The critical tone suggested the government was at last being taken to
task by the media for its criminal actions. In reality, apart from
excellent articles by Robert Fisk and a brief interlude when the IoS
published John Pilger, the paper consistently reported from within a
framework of propaganda assumptions common to all mainstream media.

Tellingly, the IoS made no attempt to fit the invasion of Iraq into the
consistent and heavily documented pattern of self-interested Western
intervention around the globe. This intervention has been driven, not by
humanitarian motives, but by the need to secure and protect resources
and markets, and by the need to install compliant pro-Western
governments that subordinate domestic interests to the priorities of
Western business. Like the rest of the media, the IoS reported as if
this pattern does not exist, or does not matter.

Much propaganda simply consists in presenting the officially approved
version of the truth as reality, as in this IoS editorial: ‘The “war
against terrorism,” rather than the destructive war against Iraq, should
have been at the top of George W. Bush and Tony Blair’s agenda.... Last
week’s revelation that a suicide bomber in Tel Aviv was British is a
reminder to Mr Blair that he should prioritise the struggle to contain
international terrorism.’³⁷

The IoS took for granted that the world’s leading terrorist state, the
US, really is waging a war ‘to contain international terrorism.’ Imagine
the IoS suggesting that a US cruise missile strike on Sudan or Serbia
was ‘a reminder to Mr Blair that he should prioritise the struggle to
contain international terrorism.’

In 1999, the Washington Post reported US Air Force Lt.-Gen. Michael
Short’s explanation of Nato strategy at the height of its bombing of
Serbia: ‘If you wake up in the morning and you have no power to your
house and no gas to your stove and the bridge you take to work is down
and will be lying in the Danube for the next 20 years, I think you begin
to ask, “Hey, Slobo, what’s this all about? How much more of this do we
have to withstand?” And at some point, you make the transition from
applauding Serb machismo against the world to thinking what your country
is going to look like if this continues.’³⁸ As the US-based media
watchdog Fairness and Accuracy in Reporting commented, this was a
military strategy that involved ‘attacking civilian targets… to
terrorize the population in the hope that the Serbian public would turn
against its government and pressure [Slobodan] Milosevic to
capitulate.’³⁹

An IoS editorial declared in June 2002: ‘The Prime Minister, to his
credit, has so far shown caution, wanting to give diplomacy a chance.’
Blair was praised for acting as a brake on George Bush and his
warmongering advisers: ‘Fortunately, Mr Bush’s deeds in the 15 months
since the terrorist attacks have been more measured than his sometimes
intemperate language. He overruled his most hawkish advisers, choosing
to deal with Saddam Hussein through the UN.’⁴⁰

This was a charade; and obviously so even at the time.⁴¹ The US
determination to conquer Iraq for its own ends was woefully
misrepresented by the IoS: ‘Let us hope that this conflict is short, for
the sake of the troops and the Iraqi civilians. Let us hope also that
the aftermath is handled with much greater skill and sensitivity than
the clumsy and confused build-up to an unnecessary war.’⁴²

The comment was couched in the standard media presumption of
benevolence; the US-UK prelude to war was ‘clumsy and confused,’ rather
than criminal, cynical and immoral.

One IoS editorial in 2004 was entitled, ‘A little bit of candour and
humility needed, Mr Blair.’ The paper declared: ‘the Prime Minister ends
the political season on an unexpected high. At last he has achieved a
clumsy form of closure over the decision to go to war in Iraq, turning
attention to domestic policy and the next election.’⁴³

Recall that this lamentable psychobabble referred to the criminal
invasion and slaughter, by that point, of tens of thousands of Iraqis by
a rogue leader who, together with George Bush, had lied and deceived his
way to war.

The IoS went on to suggest that Blair had ‘on balance, a record of
modest progress.’ What was required from Blair now was more ‘candour and
humility.’ Perhaps what Chechens needed from Russia’s Vladimir Putin was
more candour and humility. Perhaps Palestinians needed the same from
Israel’s leaders. On and on, the IoS, deemed one of the country’s most
honest newspapers, followed this same, deceptive, power-friendly script.

In the summer of 2003, while the blood-soaked Blair was still in power,
an IoS editorial suggested: ‘The Prime Minister must face the Hutton
inquiry and answer its questions with the openness and transparency on
which he so prides himself. Only then will he regain the trust of the
British people that he has so recklessly squandered.’⁴⁴

Is this really all that should have been demanded of a leader
responsible for launching a brutal war on a manifestly fraudulent
pretext?

Michael Williams, then deputy editor of the IoS, replied as follows when
I challenged him about his paper’s inadequate performance on Iraq:

  You will appreciate that we are journalists here producing a small
  newspaper which endeavours to cover everything from the weather to the
  crossword to the daily news to a full sports and arts agenda. You
  misread us if you think we are engaged in a process of dialectics! You
  are welcome to give me a call at around 12.15 next Tuesday, and while
  I’m happy to talk in general about how we produce the Independent on
  Sunday, I won’t get involved in a debate on the Gulf War.⁴⁵

 

I responded on behalf of Media Lens:

  What you mildly caricature as ‘a process of dialectics’ is, more
  seriously, a focus on unbalanced and distorted media reporting and
  analysis; a public service that we carry out for free, and which is
  much appreciated by thousands of readers in the UK and around the
  world. Because mainstream media failed to expose government propaganda
  and deceptions for what they were – when it was timely and crucial to
  do so, and despite copious counter-evidence and authoritative
  commentary that the mainstream chose to ignore or marginalise (as
  documented at www.medialens.org) – Blair was able to lead this country
  into an illegal and immoral war. Your paper did have examples of good
  coverage and strong editorials at the time, but virtually always
  within a conventional and skewed reporting framework (e.g. taking as
  read the benign intent of UK foreign policy) that is not supported by
  a dispassionate appraisal of the historical and current record.

  Instead, the ‘process of dialectics’ we saw and read every day in
  mainstream media directly contributed to the deaths of at least 37,000
  Iraqi civilians between March-October 2003 alone (as well as many
  members of the ‘coalition’ forces and countless Iraqi conscripts),
  according to an Iraqi survey that was reported by
  english.aljazeera.net on July 31 [2004], but given – as far as I can
  see – precisely zero coverage by your paper and other UK mainstream
  media.

  If you are not prepared to defend your paper’s coverage of Iraq, then
  perhaps you could tell me who in the IoS offices would be, please?⁴⁶

 

There were no further replies from the Independent on Sunday.

Head of BBC TV News: ‘Always Happy to Debate’

BBC News, famously ‘impartial’ and ‘balanced,’ was a major willing
accomplice in the propaganda war. Much of this has been documented in
the Media Lens books, Guardians of Power and Newspeak in the 21^(st)
Century.⁴⁷

Roger Mosey, then head of BBC TV news, responded to my challenge for the
BBC to provide a mea culpa to the British public:

  There have actually been a number of academic studies into our
  coverage of the Iraq War, but the overall point I’d make is that it
  isn’t quite as current myth would have it. Have a look, for instance,
  at the Newsnight Special just before the start of the war:
  http://www.bbc.co.uk/pressoffice/pressreleases/stories/2003/02_february/07/blair_transcript.shtml

  But this wasn’t alone: we did a whole Iraq Day across BBC1 before the
  conflict began which also examined the kind of issues you raise.⁴⁸

 

I responded to Mosey:⁴⁹

  Many thanks for taking the time and trouble to respond – much
  appreciated.

  Re: the Newsnight Special, we did an extensive analysis of [the Jeremy
  Paxman interview with Tony Blair] at Media Lens (www.medialens.org).
  You can see the relevant media alerts of 10 and 11 February 2003
  archived under ‘media alerts’ at our website.

  Although Jeremy Paxman valiantly tackled Tony Blair on the usual
  deceit that Saddam threw out the weapons inspectors in 1998 (perhaps
  Jeremy did so partly because he had been deluged with emails on
  exactly this point by Media Lens readers in advance), the interview
  failed dismally on a number of counts.

  For example, quoting from part one of our alert:

  How often have [BBC viewers and listeners] seen or heard a discussion
  describing the extent of the success of Unscom inspections between
  1991-98? […] In fact the remarkable truth is that the 1991-98
  inspections ended in almost complete success. Scott Ritter, chief UN
  arms inspector at the time, insists that Iraq was ‘fundamentally
  disarmed’ by December 1998, with 90-95% of its weapons of mass
  destruction eliminated. Of the missing 5-10%, Ritter says: ‘It doesn’t
  even constitute a weapons programme. It constitutes bits and pieces of
  a weapons programme which in its totality doesn’t amount to much, but
  which is still prohibited.’ (War On Iraq, Scott Ritter and William
  Rivers Pitt, Profile Books, 2002, p. 24)

  Of nuclear weapons capability, Ritter says: ‘When I left Iraq in 1998…
  the infrastructure and facilities had been 100% eliminated. There’s no
  doubt about that. All of their instruments and facilities had been
  destroyed. The weapons design facility had been destroyed. The
  production equipment had been hunted down and destroyed. And we had in
  place means to monitor – both from vehicles and from the air – the
  gamma rays that accompany attempts to enrich uranium or plutonium. We
  never found anything.’ (Ibid., p. 26)

  One might think that this would be vital information for interviewers
  like Paxman now when Blair, Straw and co are declaring war regrettably
  essential to enforce Iraqi disarmament. Instead, these central facts
  have been simply ignored by our media – as far as the public is
  concerned Iraq did not cooperate between 1991 and 1998. In a recent
  Panorama documentary, for example, Jane Corbin said merely of the
  1991-98 Unscom inspectors, ‘their mission ended before they completed
  their task.’ (Panorama, Chasing Saddam’s Weapons, BBC1, 9 February
  2003)

  Ritter, the most outspoken whistleblower, was not interviewed by BBC
  TV News or Newsnight ahead of the war. When asked why Newsnight had
  failed to interview such an important source, editor George Entwistle
  answered: ‘I don’t particularly have an answer for that; we just
  haven’t.’ (Interview with David Edwards, 31 March 2003) By contrast,
  Newsnight ‘just had’ interviewed war supporters like Ken Adelman,
  Richard Perle and James Rubin endlessly in the run-up to the invasion
  and subsequently.

  I note your Guardian article of 27 July (‘The BBC was no cheerleader
  for war’). You emphasise that ‘news is an account of the world as it
  is and not as we want it to be.’ But whose account of the ‘world as it
  is’? Which perspective is given prominence? Who makes the news?
  Richard Sambrook [then BBC director of news] replied to a Media Lens
  reader who had pointed out that BBC coverage accepts without question
  that the US and UK ‘coalition’ is attempting to bring peace and
  democracy to Iraq: ‘We report what is said by Tony Blair and George
  Bush,’ Sambrook replied, ‘because they have power and responsibility
  and their own sources of intelligence.’ (Email from Richard Sambrook
  to Media Lens reader, 9 July 2003)

  How ironic that comment appears now, post-Hutton and post-Butler.⁵⁰

  Also, Mr Sambrook dodged the viewer’s challenge that the BBC
  consistently assumes and portrays US/UK foreign policy as
  fundamentally sincere, benign and well intentioned, despite a mountain
  of evidence to the contrary. Why was it ‘balanced’ and ‘responsible’
  to report and disseminate official warnings with little challenge of
  the supposed ‘threat’ posed by Iraq, day after day in the run-up to an
  invasion? Was this not, in fact, deeply irresponsible, given the
  plausibility of the contradictory view, now vindicated, and given the
  subsequent deaths of tens of thousands of civilians and conscript
  soldiers in Iraq? Where is the extensive BBC coverage – any BBC
  coverage – of the Iraqi survey that the civilian death toll now
  exceeds 37,000? See:
  http://english.aljazeera.net/NR/exeres/66E32EAF-0E4E-4765-9339-594C323A777F.htm

  Given that Bush and Blair have shown themselves to be untrustworthy
  and irresponsible, even ignoring or overruling the advice of their own
  intelligence services, should not the BBC now show extreme caution in
  propagating their views and pronouncements? The problem is that
  reporting official propaganda is not in fact reporting, as veteran US
  journalist David E. Hendrix observes: ‘Reporting a spokesman’s
  comments is not reporting; it’s becoming the spokesman’s spokesman.’
  (‘Coal Mine Canaries,’ Into The Buzzsaw, edited by Kristina Borjesson,
  Prometheus Books, 2002, p. 172)

  Yes, the BBC did and does ‘report many other views, including those of
  Hans Blix and Scott Ritter,’ as Mr Sambrook once noted. But facts,
  analyses and views that seriously challenge power are afforded minute
  amounts of coverage. Stating that ‘we also report other views’ is a
  technically correct but conveniently meaningless response. Norman
  Solomon, Executive Director of the US-based Institute for Public
  Accuracy, describes how ‘scattered islands of independent-minded
  reporting are lost in oceans of the stenographic reliance on official
  sources.’ (Target Iraq: What The News Media Didn’t Tell You, New York:
  Context Books, 2003, p. 26)

  Of course, you may dismiss all of this as the ravings from one of the
  ‘wackier websites’ [a reference to a dismissive comment made by Mosey
  in his Guardian article]. Or, on the other hand, you may wish to
  address the substance of the challenges made.

  I hope that you will have the time and motivation to debate further
  and, if so, I look forward to hearing from you.

 

I received this brief reply from Roger Mosey:

  Yes, I’m always happy to debate.

  But I should stress our aim is impartiality. I don’t entirely know
  what you would envisage as the way we should report President Bush or
  Prime Minister Blair in future, but it can’t surely be on the basis of
  having proven themselves to be ‘untrustworthy and irresponsible’?

  And, by the way, we interviewed Scott Ritter many many times –
  honest!⁵¹

 

In fact, the BBC’s Richard Sambrook told Media Lens in 2003 that Ritter
had been interviewed just twice: on 29 September 2002, for Breakfast
With Frost, and on 1 March 2003 for BBC News 24. The latter interview
was broadcast at around 3 am. Peter Barron, then editor of Newsnight,
told us that Newsnight interviewed Scott Ritter precisely twice on the
WMD issue: on 3 August 2000 and 21 August 2002. Note that Mosey ignored
our point about the Iraqi survey early on in the war which reported the
deaths of 37,000 Iraqi civilians. It was given scant, indeed probably
zero, coverage on BBC TV news.

In 2009, Jeremy Paxman said that he and the media had been ‘hoodwinked’
over Iraq. Speaking at a conference on the topic ‘Is World Journalism in
Crisis?’ he said:

  As far as I personally was concerned, there came a point with the
  presentation of the so-called evidence, with the moment when Colin
  Powell sat down at the UN General Assembly and unveiled what he said
  was cast-iron evidence of things like mobile, biological, weapon
  facilities and the like.

  When I saw all of that, I said, ‘we know that Colin Powell is an
  intelligent thoughtful man, and a sceptical man. If he believes this
  to be the case; he’s seen the evidence, I haven’t.’

  Now that evidence turned out to be absolutely meaningless but we only
  discover that after the event. So I am perfectly open to the
  accusation that we were hoodwinked. Clearly we were.⁵²

 

In fact, as we have seen above, Paxman and his media cohorts had ample
opportunity to equip themselves with evidence and arguments to counter
state propaganda.

Sadly, Mosey, and all those who responded to Media Lens’s challenges, or
who flatly refused to engage with us, such as Guardian editor Alan
Rusbridger, displayed what psychologist Steven Pinker eloquently
describes as ‘the ubiquitous vice of self-deception, which always
manages to put the self on the side of the angels.’⁵³

News coverage, we are told, is balanced and fair; all important views
are properly represented. The media did their job properly on Iraq, and
we can all relax. That’s the message the British public was supposed to
accept. In reality, news broadcasters and the press failed in their
public duty to hold power to account. Worse than that, they acted as
campaign managers for an illegal and immoral war; itself, merely the
latest in a long list of murderous foreign ‘interventions.’

Don’t Look at Us – Look at Them!

A rare foray into insider criticism of the complicit role played by the
media in enabling the invasion of Iraq appeared in the Independent in
2008. Media columnist Stephen Glover focused on the Sun, The Times and
the Daily Telegraph in a piece titled ‘Press were wrong on Iraq.’ Glover
said: ‘I am still awaiting an apology from those newspapers that assured
their readers, before the invasion of Iraq, that there was absolutely no
doubt that Saddam Hussein possessed weapons of mass destruction.’

This looked promising. Could the floodgates be about to open, finally,
five years after the war? Would there at last be a reckoning of the
‘mainstream’ media inside the mainstream?

However, Glover neglected to mention the likely death toll of over one
million people, or the misery unleashed by the brutal
invasion-occupation, and concluded tamely: ‘The lesson we should draw
from the Iraq war is that some editors and journalists too eagerly
lapped up government propaganda about Saddam and WMDs, sometimes for
reasons of ideology, sometimes out of sheer credulousness. If newspapers
only said sorry, one might be more confident that they will not do the
same again.’⁵⁴

But barely two months later he published a column praising lavishly the
British press.⁵⁵ Was his memory really so bad? Had he expected his
readers to have forgotten his recent, albeit superficial, analysis of
its failings on Iraq?

In October 2008, I emailed Glover:⁵⁶

  Dear Stephen Glover,

  Hope you’re well. You ask in today’s column, ‘Am I being starry-eyed?’
  over the supposedly vibrant state of the British press [1]. Perhaps;
  but certainly seriously blinkered. And also short on memory. It was
  only two months ago when you mildly pointed out the failings of the UK
  press to challenge government propaganda on Iraq [2]. But media
  performance was far worse than that, as I pointed out to you [3]. The
  British media was a willing accomplice in the US-UK portrayal of Iraq
  as a severe threat to the west. This was a country that had already
  been devastated by thirteen years of brutal UN sanctions that led to
  the deaths of over a million people; around half of them children
  under five. The two westerners who knew Iraq best – Denis Halliday and
  Hans von Sponeck, senior UN diplomats in Baghdad who resigned over the
  ‘genocidal’ sanctions [4] – were virtually shut out of British press
  and broadcasting.

  The ideological role played by the media – that is, of being
  stenographers to power – continued up to and beyond the illegal
  invasion of Iraq: a war of aggression that contravened the UN Charter
  and which is recognised in law as the ‘supreme international crime.’
  If the British media had done its job properly [5] before March 2003,
  there may well have been no invasion of Iraq. The probable death toll
  now stands at over one million [6].

  But for a press commentator it is fine to be distracted by the
  ‘much-improved Times,’ to finger lovingly the ‘redesigned Daily
  Telegraph,’ to swoon over the ‘revamped Independent’ as it ‘crackles
  with energy,’ and to marvel at the ‘sheer diversity and plurality’ of
  British newspapers.

  Best wishes,

  David Cromwell, Co-Editor, Media Lens,

  www.medialens.org

 

I never did receive a response. The following year, 2009, Glover
published another piece on media ‘cheerleading’ in advance of the Iraq
war. This time he devoted his attention to the Murdoch press – The Times
and the Sun, especially. Gordon Brown, then British prime minister, had
just announced that there would be an inquiry into the war. Glover
noted: ‘There are many aspects of this affair that remain unexamined.
One of them is the attitude of some newspapers, in particular the
Murdoch-owned Times and Sun, in uncritically promoting the Government’s
flawed case for war, and defending, or even omitting to report, its
mistakes.’⁵⁷

Glover continued: ‘The new inquiry is unfortunately most unlikely to
investigate the role of these powerful newspapers in legitimising the
war. It is true that Tony Blair was supported by other titles, but one
wonders whether Britain could have gone to war at all unless the
US-based Rupert Murdoch had thrown his powerful divisions behind the
Government. […] In the months leading up to war the Sun regularly
reported every British or American claim about WMD without the slightest
reservation, and a succession of editorials declared that these weapons
existed.’

Glover’s sharply critical remarks were welcome. But he had once again
overlooked the supportive role played by the Observer, the Guardian and,
yes, the Independent newspapers. The Sun no doubt influenced large
swathes of the general population. But it was the Guardian and
Independent titles, with a readership typically regarded as educated and
liberal-thinking, which failed to critically examine government claims
and which overlooked how such self-serving claims fit into a
longstanding pattern of Western interference around the globe.

In 2005, despite everything that had happened, the Guardian actually
urged British citizens to re-elect the warmonger Tony Blair as prime
minister.⁵⁸ No wonder that Jonathan Cook, a former journalist at the
Guardian and the Observer, would later warn of ‘the dangerous cult of
the Guardian’: ‘The paper’s role, like that of its rightwing cousins, is
to limit the imaginative horizons of readers. While there is just enough
leftwing debate to make readers believe their paper is pluralistic, the
kind of radical perspectives needed to question the very foundations on
which the system of Western dominance rests is either unavailable or is
ridiculed.’⁵⁹

The Masquerade of Media Balance

If Stephen Glover’s columns in the Independent represented the pinnacle
of what the corporate media could manage, then it is no wonder that
highly-paid media managers, editors and star commentators remain immune
from fact-based and well-informed public criticism. As for the rest of
us, apparently we should be content to consume what they produce, and be
satisfied with the occasional tossed scrap of carefully managed public
‘feedback’ and ‘consultation.’ And if we still don’t like it, we will be
put in our place. In 2009, Richard Beeston, foreign editor of The Times,
wrote dismissively of attempts to unravel how and why the country was
dragged into an illegal war in Iraq: ‘All this happened six years ago.
Get over it.’⁶⁰

The masquerade of media balance is the tacit acceptance by professional
journalism of the status quo. In an analysis of two pre-war BBC Panorama
phone-in programmes, writer and academic John Theobald noted that the
editorial team sought ‘authority and democratic legitimacy by
incorporating public participation and thus an aura of genuine dialogue
and interaction with the public. Both reveal how what initially seem to
be programmes structured with impeccable balance and plurality are in
fact disguised acts of persuasion for the standpoint of the UK
government, designed to contribute to the luring of sceptical viewers
into support for, or acquiescence in, the US/UK government position.’⁶¹

Indeed, one can generalise from Theobald’s astute observation to note
that the function of the corporate media, including the BBC, is to lure
media consumers into supporting the position of state-corporate power.
Thus, the BBC’s Reeta Chakrabarti could ‘report’ with a straight face in
2009 that ‘Tony Blair passionately believed that Iraq had weapons of
mass destruction and posed a grave threat.’⁶² When challenged about the
impartiality of repeating Blair’s alleged ‘passionate’ beliefs,
Chakrabarti replied: ‘I said Mr Blair passionately believed Iraq had WMD
because he has consistently said so. When challenged he has stuck to his
guns.’⁶³ This was, perhaps, an unfortunate choice of military metaphor.
It was also a glaring example of a BBC journalist channelling a leader’s
supposedly genuinely-held conviction, rather than questioning whether
Blair was using his ‘passions’ to project propaganda in support of a war
of aggression. But public challenges to BBC journalism were routinely
brushed off; perhaps rarely so blatantly as BBC reporter Hugh Sykes who,
while in Baghdad, told one viewer: ‘you will simply have to trust the
judgement of a correspondent who has spent a lot of time here, listening
to many people who know what they are talking about.’⁶⁴


Promoting Public Ignorance

 

  If the mass will be free of chains of iron, it must accept chains of
  silver. If it will not love, honour and obey, it must not expect to
  escape seduction.

  Harold Lasswell, US political scientist and communications theorist¹

 

The Chains of Seduction

We like to believe that we are free; that we are not manipulated unduly
by external forces. The notion that our destiny might not be in our own
hands, or that we cannot at least determine to a large extent how we act
and how we think, is surely abhorrent to each one of us. Yes, many
people are sadly downtrodden by circumstances: by poverty, poor health
or drudge work just to earn a pittance to survive. But for those of us
fortunate enough to be somewhat comfortable in the relatively affluent
West, surely we enjoy great freedom? Of course, it seems at times as if
we live in a surveillance state with oppressive, even brutal, police
intimidation should we take to the streets to protest. But we are not
living in a dictatorship and there is – as yet – no Big Brother-style
monitoring of all social interactions, with the consequent need to
fearfully watch our every move, every spoken word, every thought. Yes,
we can and do still enjoy considerable freedom. But the US political
writer and activist Michael Parenti cautions: ‘We might remember that
the most repressive forms of social control are not always those we
consciously rail against, but those that so insinuate themselves into
the fabric of our consciousness as to remain unchallenged, having been
embraced as part of the nature of things.’²

It is ‘part of the nature of things’ that we do not routinely scrutinise
state and corporate power to the extent that would make them vulnerable
to public intervention. This is no accident. As Dan Hind notes astutely
in The Threat To Reason: ‘Our guardians expend a great deal of effort
insulating their descriptions of the world from reasoned inquiry, since
it is through their control of the public’s understanding in this
respect that they secure our obedience and maintain their position.’³

And the strategy has largely been successful. Opinion polls,
particularly in the US and the UK, consistently show that public opinion
is well to the left of the pro-corporate policies offered by the main
political parties.⁴ In 2011, a New York Times/CBS News poll revealed
that two-thirds of the public said that wealth should be distributed
more evenly in the US. Similar numbers objected to tax cuts for
corporations and supported increasing income taxes on millionaires. Not
only did 74 per cent say that ‘the country is on the wrong track,’ but a
massive 89 per cent of Americans said they distrusted government ‘to do
the right thing.’ And almost half of the public said that the Occupy
movement generally reflects the views of most Americans.⁵

In US opinion polls, large majorities have said that the US should
equalise aid to Israel and the Palestinians under a negotiated
settlement in terms of the international consensus: a two-state
solution, proposed in 2002 and accepted by the Arab League, which offers
full recognition and integration of Israel into the region in exchange
for Israeli withdrawal to the 1967 borders. Aid should be cut to either
party that refuses to negotiate in good faith. Given that Israel, along
with its primary backer, the United States, has relentlessly opposed the
international consensus, that would, in fact, have meant cutting aid to
Israel; a fact little commented upon or publicised in the media.⁶

In a detailed analysis of the sources of US foreign policy, Lawrence
Jacobs and Benjamin Page found that the major influence is
‘internationally oriented business corporations.’ By contrast, public
opinion has ‘little or no significant effect on government officials.’⁷

The pattern is well-established. In eighteenth century Britain, the
economist Adam Smith observed that the ‘merchants and manufacturers’
were ‘the principal architects’ of state policy, and made sure that
their own interests ‘were most peculiarly attended to,’ however
‘grievous’ the effects on others, whether at home or abroad. Historian
Thomas Brady points out that the West’s drive to colonise whole swathes
of the globe was a form of class war within the imperial nations
themselves: ‘European societies were also colonized and plundered, less
catastrophically than the Americas but more so than most of Asia.’ In
other words, the profits of empire were privatised, but the costs were
borne by the weaker and poorer sectors of society.⁸

How can those who govern keep those who are governed away from the
levers of power? In ‘free’ societies, by definition, ruling elites lack
the option of ‘chains of iron’ to bound the public rabble. Instead, a
devotion to mass consumerism, and an unthinking – or at least grudging –
acceptance of the inequitable distribution of power, must be inculcated
and maintained by a constant stream of state-corporate propaganda. This
propaganda is based on appeals to universal values: freedom, democracy,
justice and human rights.

The Australian social critic Alex Carey, author of the seminal book
Taking The Risk Out of Democracy, put it well: ‘Consider for a moment
the symbols by which Americans defined their dream and pictured social
reality: the Statue of Liberty with its Christlike promise of succour
and compassion to the poor and wretched of the earth; the Declaration of
Independence with its noble proclamation of respect for the equal and
inalienable rights of all men and women; the unending public litany of
adulation for American freedom, American individualism and American
democracy; a near-religious commitment to the American form of
free-enterprise economic system, with its supposed almost immaculate
joining of private interest to public well-being.’⁹

Or consider the July 2003 speech that Tony Blair, then British prime
minister, gave to a fawning US Congress:

  Members of Congress, ours are not Western values, they are the
  universal values of the human spirit. And anywhere, any time ordinary
  people are given the chance to choose, the choice is the same:
  freedom, not tyranny; democracy, not dictatorship; the rule of law,
  not the rule of the secret police. The spread of freedom is the best
  security for the free. It is our last line of defence and our first
  line of attack…

  Tell the world why you’re proud of America. Tell them when the
  Star-Spangled Banner starts, Americans get to their feet, Hispanics,
  Irish, Italians, Central Europeans, East Europeans, Jews, Muslims,
  white, Asian, black, those who go back to the early settlers and those
  whose English is the same as some New York cab drivers I’ve dealt
  with, but whose sons and daughters could run for this Congress. Tell
  them why Americans, one and all, stand upright and respectful. Not
  because some state official told them to, but because whatever race,
  colour, class or creed they are, being American means being free.
  That’s why they’re proud.¹⁰

 

‘We See Further into the Future’

Such rhetoric goes back a long way. In a remarkable study of how the
huge Hollywood film industry perpetuates the myth of the US as a beacon
of democracy and a force for good around the world, Matthew Alford notes
that: ‘The concept of a benevolent US foreign policy emerges from the
widespread historical belief in “American exceptionalism,” which
describes the belief that the US is an extraordinary nation with a
special role to play in human history; that is, America is not only
unique but also superior among nations.’¹¹

As Alford points out, it was the nineteenth century French political
thinker and historian Alexis de Tocqueville who was the first major
figure to use ‘exceptional’ to describe the US and the American people,
although the basic concept can be traced back to earliest colonial times
with the idealistic Puritan vision of America as the ‘shining city on a
hill.’

With characteristic insight, the US writer William Blum ‘wonder[s] if
this sense of exceptionalism has been embedded anywhere more deeply than
in the United States, where it is drilled into every cell and ganglion
of American consciousness from kindergarten on. If we measure the degree
of indoctrination (I’ll resist the temptation to use the word
“brainwashing”) of a population as the gap between what the people
believe their government has done in the world and what the actual (very
sordid) facts are, the American people are clearly the most
indoctrinated people on the planet.’¹²

Blum continues: ‘The role of the American media is of course
indispensable to this process – try naming a single American daily
newspaper or TV network that was unequivocally against the US attacks on
Libya, Iraq, Afghanistan, Yugoslavia, Panama, Grenada, and Vietnam. Or
even against any two of them. How about one? Which of the mainstream
media expressed real skepticism of The War on Terror in its early
years?’

The propaganda of ‘exceptionalism’ is rife in the US; not least in
military and political circles. Lieutenant Colonel Ralph Peters said at
the US Army War College in 1997 that: ‘Our country is a force for good
without precedent.’ Thomas Barnett told the US Naval War College: ‘The
US military is a force for global good that… has no equal.’ In 1998,
Madeleine Albright, U.S. Secretary of State, said: ‘If we have to use
force, it is because we are America! We are the indispensable nation. We
stand tall. We see further into the future.’ In 2000, Condoleezza Rice,
later the US Secretary of State, claimed that in the pursuit of its
national security, the United States no longer needed to be guided by
‘notions of international law and norms’ or ‘institutions like the
United Nations’ because it was ‘on the right side of history.’ In 2002,
President George W. Bush said that he did not want other countries
dictating terms or conditions for the war on terrorism: ‘At some point,
we may be the only ones left. That’s okay with me. We are America.’¹³

The reverberations continue to the present day. As I write this,
President Obama has recently delivered his 2012 State of the Union
address in which he proclaimed that ‘the renewal of American leadership
can be felt across the globe’ and ‘America remains the one indispensable
nation in world affairs.’ And, as ever, the speech ended with those
words that are always meant to imply divine ordination: ‘God bless the
United States of America.’¹⁴

Professional journalists, especially the more prominent and influential
ones, are required to follow this script, preferably because they
sincerely believe in it. The punishment if they don’t stick to the
ideological line is denial of access to powerful politicians or even
career death.

As the US political analyst Glenn Greenwald points out, ‘most
establishment media figures, by definition, are hard-core nationalists
who scorn any ideas that suggest their country is at fault for anything.
The very suggestion that the United States of America might have done
anything to provoke rational hatred against it and thus helped cause
9/11 is like poison [in the journalist’s] soul.’

Greenwald continues: ‘Similarly, the very suggestion that the U.S. is
the aggressor when it comes to Iran – rather than the other way around –
is heresy.’ The ‘idea that the U.S. seeks war with Iran will be
slanderous’ for establishment journalists, ‘up until the minute the
first U.S. fighter jet drops a bomb, at which point the war will
instantly become necessary and just.’ This is because ‘their ultimate
political allegiance is to the U.S. political establishment (the same
one over which they claim to act as Watchdogs), and they cannot abide
any arguments that that establishment engages in bad acts: it can
periodically make “mistakes” or exercise “poor judgment” (almost always
totally understandable and driven by good motives: they over-reacted to
9/11 out of a noble desire to keep us safe), but never engage in truly
bad acts. Bad acts are only what America’s enemies do, not America’s
political leaders.’¹⁵

It is, of course, much the same in the UK, the ever-faithful sidekick of
the US in their unequal ‘special relationship.’ As we saw in the last
chapter, John Pilger’s powerful documentary The War You Don’t See
exposed the role of British and other Western media in providing an echo
chamber for government propaganda and warmongering. He says: ‘The role
of respectable journalism in Western state crimes – from Iraq to Iran,
Afghanistan to Libya – remains taboo.’

Pilger adds: ‘Two of Blair’s most important functionaries in his
mendacious, blood-drenched adventure in Iraq, Alastair Campbell and
Jonathan Powell, enjoy a cosy relationship with the liberal media, their
opinions sought on worthy subjects while the blood in Iraq never dries.
For their vicarious admirers, as Harold Pinter put it, the appalling
consequences of their actions “never happened.”’¹⁶

Whenever there is a Western ‘intervention’ – an attack on yet another
vulnerable nation – ‘responsible’ institutions snap into patriotic mode
to support ‘our boys’ (and girls) once the missiles start flying and the
bombs start dropping. And, at all times, the ‘mainstream’ media can be
relied upon not to dig too deeply or too systematically into the crimes
of the West. But the whistle-blowing organisation WikiLeaks sounds a
warning note for all media professionals, echoing the Nuremberg
judgements, that: ‘if a journalist hides the truth they are not
journalists; they are partners in the crime they are hiding.’¹⁷

It is, of course, fine for journalists in the West to point to the
crimes of official enemies, and to mock them for their transparent
propaganda efforts. Thus, the BBC’s Emily Maitlis was able to introduce
Newsnight with a touch of sardonic wit: ‘Hello, good evening. The
Russians are calling it a “peace enforcement operation.” It’s the kind
of Newspeak that would make George Orwell proud.’¹⁸

Maitlis was referring to the invasion of Russian forces into the
Georgian province of South Ossetia in August 2008. By contrast, it would
be inconceivable for a BBC presenter to refer sceptically to the West’s
invasion of Afghanistan, Iraq or Libya as a ‘peace enforcement
operation,’ and to describe such language as ‘the kind of Newspeak that
would make George Orwell proud.’

‘A Load of Cobblers’

As well as the Orwellian mocking of official enemies, another standard
feature of the corporate media is to assist in the promotion of fear in
the West’s pursuit of geopolitical control and world resources. For
example, prior to the invasion of Iraq, the Independent ran two news
stories revealing the supposed existence of ‘three mystery ships’ in the
Persian Gulf possibly carrying Iraqi weapons of mass destruction.
Various other newspapers and broadcasters picked up on the Independent’s
James Bond-esque exclusive.

The first of the two articles – which was actually the Independent’s
lead story on 19 February 2003, virtually on the eve of war – claimed
that ‘three giant cargo ships are being tracked by US and British
intelligence on suspicion that they might be carrying Iraqi weapons of
mass destruction.’ It added: ‘the movement of the three ships is the
source of growing concern among maritime and intelligence experts.’¹⁹

There was a short follow-up piece the next day on an inside page by
reporters Nigel Morris and Ben Russell. The article stated: ‘Security
experts and senior MPs expressed alarm last night at the prospect that
three giant cargo ships are being tracked by Western intelligence
agencies because they could be carrying deadly Iraqi weapons.’²⁰

But then the bizarre story disappeared from the Independent’s pages; a
curious fate given its initial headline prominence and the purported
‘growing concern among maritime and intelligence experts.’ What had
happened next? Were the ships ever found or investigated? What about the
newspaper’s claims that they were carrying WMD? Why did the Independent
never follow this up? Was it, in fact, a bogus story?

In an online Guardian debate a few months later, Peter Beaumont, foreign
affairs editor of the Observer, said of the story: ‘just goes to show,
we can all make mistakes. I.e. the story was – as far as I know – a load
of cobblers.’ Beaumont added: ‘but we’ve all written cobblers, myself
included.’²¹

In the summer of 2003, with Iraq now ‘liberated,’ I asked Michael
Harrison, author of the original article in the Independent, what had
happened to the story. Harrison responded: ‘Thanks for your email about
our “mystery ships” article. My apologies for taking time to reply. The
paper spent several days checking and verifying the story before running
it. We are confident of our sources and satisfied with the veracity of
the story. Indeed, we are continuing to pursue the story with the
intention of reporting on it further. Hope this is of help.’²²

A month later, I prompted Harrison again, mentioning Beaumont’s views
and adding my own questions: ‘How confident can you be that you were fed
accurate US and British intelligence? Who are the maritime and
intelligence experts to whom you referred? When will the Independent
publish a follow-up, either refuting or further detailing the original
story?’²³ Harrison responded briefly: ‘Peter Beaumont is welcome to his
opinion. All I can do is refer you back to my previous email.’²⁴ Perhaps
the story was true and the Independent, which declared itself ‘confident
of our sources and satisfied with the veracity’ of its reports, passed
the details onto Hans Blix, then chief UN weapons inspector. You may
decide how plausible that sounds.

There are curious parallels here with the infamous Gulf of Tonkin affair
in 1964 in which US destroyers supposedly came under attack from North
Vietnamese patrol boats. The alleged provocation was exploited by US
politicians and military planners to escalate the American assault on
Vietnam. Media analyst Daniel Hallin noted that the episode ‘was a
classic of Cold War management… On virtually every important point, the
reporting of the two Gulf of Tonkin incidents… was either misleading or
simply false’ and was, as Edward Herman and Noam Chomsky note, ‘in
accordance with the needs of the US executive at that crucial moment.’²⁵

It remains an open question whether the Independent’s reporters,
presumably unwittingly, were acting in accordance with the needs of the
US-UK administrations to find evidence of an Iraqi threat. However, as
we have seen in earlier chapters, there is certainly no question that
reporters and editors at the Independent, the Guardian, BBC, Channel 4
News, and elsewhere, did little to challenge the US-UK lies, distortions
and omissions that enabled a brutal and illegal invasion of Iraq to take
place.

Post-invasion, Tony Blair resorted to ever greater exhortations of
messianic belief in his own righteousness, where ‘every fibre of
instinct and conviction’ told him that he was right. In his address to
Congress, Blair made a desperate appeal: ‘Can we be sure that terrorism
and weapons of mass destruction will join together? Let us say one
thing. If we are wrong, we will have destroyed a threat that is at its
least responsible for human carnage and suffering. That is something I
am confident history will forgive.’²⁶

It was remarkable that Blair could fail to recognise the irony in his
reference to ‘human carnage’: the kind of carnage that the US-UK
‘coalition’ has wreaked in the former Yugoslavia, Afghanistan, Iraq,
Pakistan and indeed in so many places where the Washington consensus of
corporate-led globalisation holds sway. But perhaps Blair was right to
trust that history will forgive both him and Bush. The Indian statesman
Jawaharlal Nehru once explained how it works: ‘History is almost always
written by the victors and conquerors and gives their viewpoint.’²⁷

Balance Sheets, Death and Silence

The impact of war is devastating, horrific and routinely sanitised for
home audiences by editors and journalists. Robert Fisk, the
Independent’s Middle East correspondent, is a notable exception. ‘It was
a scene from the Crimean War,’ he observed in an Iraqi hospital as the
US-led ‘coalition’ was in the final few hours of ‘liberating’ the
country in April 2003. Fisk wrote with almost unbearable clarity: ‘a
hospital of screaming wounded and floors running with blood. I stepped
in the stuff; it stuck to my shoes, to the clothes of all the doctors in
the packed emergency room, it swamped the passageways and the blankets
and sheets.’²⁸

But for the left-hawk commentators – step forward Johann Hari, Nick
Cohen, David Aaronovitch and the rest – who supported ‘humanitarian
intervention’ in Iraq to bring ‘democracy’ to the long-suffering Iraqis
under ‘Saddam’s sanctions,’ this was supposed to have been a ‘moral war…
fought in a moral way.’²⁹ However, the kind of democracy that was
actually being implemented in Iraq was summed up by Iraqi exile Sami
Ramadani: ‘Saddam’s old right-wing friends, Rumsfeld and co, are
recruiting Saddam’s security men and are prepared to drench Iraq in new
bloodbaths precisely to stop its people from achieving democracy and
true liberation.’³⁰

For the BBC, as with most of the corporate media, the news script that
was followed conformed closely to pronouncements from Washington and
London: a script that spoke inanely of a global ‘war on terror’ and of
the introduction of ‘democracy’ to Afghanistan and Iraq. One item on the
flagship Today news programme on BBC Radio 4 in November 2003 summed up
the ‘balanced’ perspective on offer. Presenter Sarah Montague was
interviewing veteran US broadcaster Walter Cronkite. The basis of the
interview was a comparison of the war in Vietnam over thirty years
previously with the present situation in Iraq. Montague said to
Cronkite: ‘And yet when you do a comparison, just in crude numbers
terms, we’re talking of, what, 58,000 who were killed in Vietnam and
only [pause], we’re up to almost 400 in Iraq.’³¹

I emailed Montague later the same day, pointing out that although I
understood that the focus of her interview with Cronkite was supposed to
be the impact of war on the US and on Americans, why was there no
mention of the far greater deaths of Vietnamese people, possibly
numbering over 2 million individuals? Her response, in full, was:

  David,

  I didn’t make mention of the, what, 2 million indochinese killed, nor
  the, as yet, unknown number of iraqis killed because I was only
  seeking to compare American deaths in both wars. I can’t remember my
  exact phrasing but it was remiss of me if I didn’t make it clear I was
  only referring to American deaths. I decided to focus solely on the
  American side of the balance sheet because, as you note, that was the
  remit of the interview – the impact of the war on America and
  Americans.

  This is just a hurried reply but please feel free to contact me for
  more. Sarah³²

 

Why is it that the ‘remit of the interview’ in corporate news media
reveals a systematic tendency to focus on the impact on the US and
Americans, or on the UK and the British? Why is it so rarely about the
impact of war on the Vietnamese or the impact of war on the Iraqis?
However, Montague had said ‘feel free to contact me for more,’ so I did
just that the following day:

  Dear Sarah,

  Many thanks for replying – it’s much appreciated.

  I find it noteworthy that in a lengthy six-minute piece on a
  comparison between Vietnam and Iraq you did not consider it relevant
  to include reference to the two million dead Vietnamese on the balance
  sheet, as you put it. This mass death (and awful after-effects on
  human health in Vietnam) has undoubtedly influenced the attitude of
  many Americans to future wars. Why was this not considered relevant to
  your piece?

  A U.S. opinion poll in 1982 revealed that 72 per cent of the public
  regarded the Vietnam War as ‘more than a mistake; it was fundamentally
  wrong and immoral.’³³ Would an exclusive concern with U.S. combat
  deaths explain such an expression of U.S. public opinion? Likewise in
  Iraq today, surely one has to approach U.S. perceptions of the costs
  and impact of war more broadly than last Friday’s segment did?

  Nor was there mention in the piece of last week’s estimate by Medact,
  a UK-based organisation of health professionals, of up to 55,000 dead
  Iraqis since the US-led invasion took place.³⁴ These stark figures
  surely play a role in the impact of war on the United States and its
  people. Why did the Today programme not consider the impact of Iraqi
  deaths on American opinion relevant? Why should Americans, or your
  listeners for that matter, focus on U.S. deaths to the exclusion of
  others, as though U.S. lives are more inherently valuable?

  You also let Walter Cronkite’s remark about a communist invasion of
  South Vietnam pass unchallenged when, in fact, it was the United
  States that invaded South Vietnam. By accepting Cronkite’s distorted
  view of history, your listeners are presumably expected to believe the
  standard mythology that the United States was ‘defending’ South
  Vietnam in the same sense in which the Soviet Union later argued that
  they ‘defended’ Afghanistan.

  If you have the time, I’d be interested in your further thoughts on
  the above, please.

  best wishes, David³⁵

 

No further thoughts were, in fact, forthcoming from the BBC presenter.
Perhaps some history would be helpful at this point.

‘Public Opinion of No Value’

In 1794, George Washington confided to Alexander Hamilton, a fellow
architect of the nascent US republic forged upon democratic ideals, that
he had ‘long since learned to hold public opinion of no value.’³⁶ Just
over a century later, in 1898, US Senator Albert Beveridge publicly
disparaged the notion ‘that we ought not to govern a people without
their consent.’ The ‘rule of liberty that all just government derives
its authority from the consent of the governed,’ he declared, ‘applies
only to those who are capable of self-government. We govern the [native
American] Indians without their consent, we govern our children without
their consent.’³⁷

These are but two examples of elite disdain for public opinion and
genuine democracy. The pattern extends solidly back through history as
Noam Chomsky, for example, has repeatedly pointed out.³⁸ He notes the
crucial importance to state and corporate power of keeping the public
confused and remote from any real influence: ‘One fundamental goal of
any well-crafted indoctrination program is to direct attention
elsewhere, away from effective power, its roots, and the disguises it
assumes.’³⁹

In 2004, in continuance of the needs of power, the US occupation in Iraq
was certainly not about to relinquish its attempts to impose
neo-colonial domination and to allow true democracy. The natives,
presumably, were just not ‘capable of self-government.’ Accordingly,
preparations for Iraqi elections needed to be carefully managed in
advance. As Noah Feldman, a New York University law professor and the
Coalition Provisional Authority’s constitutional law adviser, told the
New York Times: ‘If you move too fast, the wrong people could get
elected.’ Indeed, a poll in October 2003 by the Center for Research and
Strategic Studies found that 56 per cent of respondents wanted an
Islamic Iraq.⁴⁰ Meanwhile, as civilians and US-trained security forces
in Iraq continued to suffer the brunt of spiralling violence, the
corporate media continued to talk of the ‘hope’ that the US will be able
‘to hand over power by 30 June [2004] and extricate its troops from the
Iraqi quagmire.’⁴¹ As it happened, US troops were only finally
extricated from ‘the Iraqi quagmire’ in December 2011.

The writer Naomi Klein pointed out that the 2004 US ‘handover of power’
actually equated to appointing approved candidates: ‘Mr. Bremer wants
his Coalition Provisional Authority (CPA) to appoint the members of 18
regional organizing committees. The committees will then select
delegates to form 18 selection caucuses. These selected delegates will
then further select representatives to a transitional national assembly.
The assembly will have an internal vote to select an executive and
ministers who will form the new government of Iraq. That, Bush said in
his address, constitutes “a transition to full Iraqi sovereignty.”’⁴²

Fear of genuine democracy, at home and abroad, is a familiar theme in
establishment circles everywhere. Sometimes it slips out into the open.
In the year after the Iraq invasion, Tony Blair said bluntly: ‘We can’t
end up having an inquiry into whether the war was right or wrong. That
is something that we have got to decide. We are the politicians.’⁴³

While Blair remained in power, no independent inquiry was permitted to
judge whether he and his senior ministers were right or wrong to hitch
the country’s wagon to the Bush war caravan. That would simply be
political suicide given that public feelings of scepticism, indeed
outright betrayal, ran high. According to one 2004 opinion poll, fully
54 per cent of the British population believed that Blair had lied over
Iraq. An even higher proportion, 68 per cent, believed that the
forthcoming Butler inquiry into the failure to find WMDs in Iraq would
be a whitewash; a realistic verdict that was verified once the inquiry
was indeed published.⁴⁴

In June 2009, then prime minister Gordon Brown finally announced that a
public inquiry would be held, chaired by a pillar of the establishment,
Sir John Chilcot. Open sessions of the inquiry were held between
November 2009 and February 2011. The committee included members who had
previously expressed support for ‘liberal military intervention’ and
admiration for Blair. The Chilcot report is due to be published no
earlier than the summer of 2012, delayed in part because of a dispute
over the release of secret documents. It remains to be seen how much of
an exercise in damage limitation the report will be.

‘Fantasy Land’

Meanwhile, another intense campaign of Orwellian propaganda was being
ramped up with Iran becoming increasingly a target for Western strategic
interests. Towards the end of 2011, the media campaign went into
overdrive when the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) released
its much-trailed report ‘presenting new evidence,’ said the BBC,
‘suggesting that Iran is secretly working to obtain a nuclear weapon.’⁴⁵
Relying on ‘evidence provided by more than 10 member states as well as
its own information,’ the IAEA said Iran had carried out activities
‘relevant to the development of a nuclear explosive device.’

Having looked deeply into the claims, veteran journalist Seymour Hersh
commented in a live interview: ‘But you mentioned Iraq. It’s just this –
almost the same sort of – I don’t know if you want to call it a
“psychosis,” but it’s some sort of a fantasy land being built up here,
as it was with Iraq, the same sort of – no lessons learned,
obviously.’⁴⁶

Indeed, informed scepticism in the corporate media was muted or
non-existent, with the image of Iran as a ‘nuclear threat’ being imposed
on the public mind. It was as though the war on Iraq had never happened.
Anyone watching or reading the news would have found it difficult to
avoid the emphatic declarations offered right across the media
‘spectrum.’ Thus, a Guardian editorial asserted: ‘It really is time to
drop the pretence that Iran can be deflected from its nuclear path.’⁴⁷

Two days earlier, the Guardian’s diplomatic editor, Julian Borger,
anticipated the IAEA report’s publication on his ‘Global Security Blog’
with a piece titled ‘Iran “on threshold of nuclear weapon.”’⁴⁸ The
accompanying photograph helpfully depicted a giant mushroom cloud during
a 1954 nuclear test over Bikini Atoll. The propaganda was linked
prominently from the home page of the Guardian website.

In a later article, Borger gave prominence to a quote from an unnamed
‘source close to the IAEA’: ‘What is striking is the totality and
breadth of the information [in the IAEA report]. Virtually every
component of warhead research has been pursued by Iran.’⁴⁹

Presumably all-too-aware of increased public scepticism in the wake of
the Iraq war, the anonymous source continued in the Guardian: ‘The
agency has very, very, high confidence in its analysis. It did not want
to make a mistake, and it was aware it had a very high threshold of
credibility to meet. So it would not be published unless they had that
high level of confidence.’

In similar vein, a New York Times report opened with: ‘United Nations
weapons inspectors have amassed a trove of new evidence that they say
makes a “credible” case that “Iran has carried out activities relevant
to the development of a nuclear device,” and that the project may still
be under way.’⁵⁰

The Daily Telegraph declared its version of the truth unequivocally in a
leader titled ‘Iran’s nuclear menace.’ It noted that the IAEA report
‘has for the first time acknowledged that Tehran is conducting secret
experiments whose sole purpose is the development of weapons.’⁵¹
Presumably drawing on clairvoyant powers, the editors added: ‘Indeed,
the IAEA has known for years that Tehran was building an atomic weapon,
but has been reluctant to say so.’

The title of an editorial in The Times was similarly categorical and
damning: ‘Deadly Deceit; Iran’s bellicose duplicity is definitively
exposed by an IAEA report’: ‘Tehran’s decade-long nuclear programme is
obviously not intended purely for generating electricity. The
International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) has confirmed this week that
it has credible evidence that Iran has worked on the development of
nuclear weapons.’⁵²

The editorial stamped this with the required emphasis: ‘This will sound,
and is, a statement of such banality that it ought not to need saying.’
And then continued without a shred of uncertainty: ‘The IAEA report is
extensive and understated. Founded on intelligence sources from ten
countries, it explains in detail how Iran has established a programme to
develop the technologies for a nuclear weapon. Its findings are entirely
consistent with all that has been known and exposed before. Indeed, the
IAEA is late in stating them.’

For anyone relying solely on corporate news media coverage, the case
against Iran was closed. All that remained was to decide the necessary
course of international action: ramped-up ‘diplomacy,’ international
sanctions and perhaps – the threat was left ‘lying on the table’ – war.

What was so breathtaking was that the apparent consensus on Iran, like
the case against Iraq, was a fraud.

Burying the Cable

Missing from corporate media coverage of the IAEA report were stunning
WikiLeaks disclosures concerning IAEA chief, Yukiya Amano. According to
a US Embassy cable from an American diplomat in Vienna, where the IAEA
is based, Amano described himself as ‘solidly in the U.S. court on every
key strategic decision, from high-level personnel appointments to the
handling of Iran’s alleged nuclear weapons program.’⁵³

Amano’s predecessor as IAEA chief was Mohammed ElBaradei who had refused
to bow before US warmongering, and who was later awarded the Nobel Peace
Prize. As ElBaradei came to the end of his term in 2009, the Americans
sensed an opportunity to work with someone more compliant. And so they
lobbied, successfully, on Amano’s behalf. Following his election as IAEA
chief, a US cable reported on a meeting with him: ‘This meeting, Amano’s
first bilateral review since his election, illustrates the very high
degree of convergence between his priorities and our own agenda at the
IAEA. The coming transition period provides a further window for us to
shape Amano’s thinking before his agenda collides with the IAEA
Secretariat bureaucracy.’⁵⁴ This ‘very high degree of convergence’ would
presumably be useful in hyping the alleged ‘nuclear threat’ of Iran.

A US mission cable from Vienna commented that Amano was ‘DG
[Director-General] of all states, but in agreement with us.’⁵⁵ The
Guardian reported the Amano cable in a blog back in November 2010, but
not in the paper itself.⁵⁶ A newspaper database search that I conducted
in November 2011 revealed that not a single UK national newspaper had
mentioned the WikiLeaks cable revealing that Amano was ‘solidly in the
U.S. court’ in coverage of the latest IAEA report. The sole exception I
could find anywhere in the UK print media was an article in the
small-circulation weekly New Statesman by Mehdi Hasan.⁵⁷

Rather than report this vital evidence from WikiLeaks, the British media
either tried to silence or vilify its founder, Julian Assange.⁵⁸ This
was a truly damning indictment of the ‘free press.’

By contrast, Seymour Hersh was a rare voice of rationality exposing this
latest propaganda hype. On Democracy Now!, Hersh commented of former US
Vice-President Dick Cheney: ‘Cheney kept on having the Joint Special
Operations Force Command, JSOC – they would send teams inside Iran. They
would work with various dissident groups – the Azeris, the Kurds, even
Jundallah, which is a very fanatic Sunni opposition group – and they
would do everything they could to try and find evidence of an undeclared
underground facility. We monitored everything. We have incredible
surveillance. In those days, what we did then, we can even do better
now. And some of the stuff is very technical, very classified, but I can
tell you, there’s not much you can do in Iran right now without us
finding out something about it. They found nothing. Nothing. No evidence
of any weaponization. In other words, no evidence of a facility to build
the bomb. They have facilities to enrich, but not separate facilities
for building a bomb. This is simply a fact. We haven’t found it, if it
does exist. It’s still a fantasy.’⁵⁹

Hersh said that Iran did look ‘at the idea of getting a bomb or getting
to the point where maybe they could make one. They did do that, but they
stopped in ’03. That’s still the American consensus. The Israelis will
tell you privately, “Yes, we agree.”’ He described the new IAEA report
as ‘not a scientific report, it’s a political document,’ noting that
‘Amano has pledged his fealty to America.’ Amano had been ‘a marginal
candidate’ for the position of IAEA chief but the US wanted him in
place: ‘We supported him very much. Six ballots. He was considered weak
by everybody, but we pushed to get him in. We did get him in. He
responded by thanking us and saying he shares our views. He shares our
views on Iran… it was just an expression of love. He’s going to do what
we wanted.’

In a blog on The New Yorker website, Hersh added that one of the
classified US Embassy cables from Vienna described Amano as being ‘ready
for prime time.’ The cable also noted that Amano’s ‘willingness to speak
candidly with U.S. interlocutors on his strategy… bodes well for our
future relationship.’⁶⁰

In his Democracy Now! interview, Hersh pointed out that his blog piece
had been thoroughly researched and checked by The New Yorker, and that
it included expert testimony shunned by the major newspapers: ‘These are
different voices than you’re seeing in the papers. I sometimes get
offended by the same voices we see in the New York Times and Washington
Post. We don’t see people with different points of view… And I get
emails, like crazy, from people on the inside saying, “Way to go.” I’m
talking about inside the IAEA. It’s an organization that doesn’t deal
with the press, but internally, they’re very bothered by the direction
Amano is taking them.’⁶¹

In his blog, Hersh cited Robert Kelley, a retired IAEA director and
nuclear engineer who previously spent more than thirty years with the US
Department of Energy’s nuclear-weapons programme: ‘He noted that
hundreds of pages of material appears to come from a single source: a
laptop computer, allegedly supplied to the I.A.E.A. by a Western
intelligence agency, whose provenance could not be established. Those
materials, and others, “were old news,” Kelley said, and known to many
journalists. “I wonder why this same stuff is now considered ‘new
information’ by the same reporters.”’⁶²

An assessment of the IAEA report was published by the Arms Control
Association (ACA), a non-profit organisation campaigning for effective
arms control. Greg Thielmann, a former US State Department and Senate
Intelligence Committee analyst who was one of the authors of the ACA
assessment, told Hersh: ‘There is troubling evidence suggesting that
studies are still going on, but there is nothing that indicates that
Iran is really building a bomb. Those who want to drum up support for a
bombing attack on Iran sort of aggressively misrepresented the
report.’⁶³

The BBC ‘Notes’ Privately That There Are Dissenting Views

On 9 November 2011, a BBC news piece carried a side bar ‘analysis’ by
James Reynolds, the BBC’s Iran correspondent.⁶⁴ I wrote to him the same
day:

  I hope you’re safe and well there. In your analysis which is included
  in the BBC News article ‘UN nuclear agency IAEA: Iran “studying
  nuclear weapons,”’ you note that:

  ‘The agency stresses that the evidence it presents in its report is
  credible and well-sourced.’

  You then add:

  ‘Iran’s President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad has dismissed the IAEA as puppet
  of the United States. His government has already declared that its
  findings are baseless and inauthentic.’

  You attribute such views to Iran, an officially-declared enemy of the
  West. A more balanced approach might be to report that a US Embassy
  Cable published last year revealed that Yukiya Amano, the IAEA
  director general, is ‘solidly in the U.S. court on every key strategic
  decision.’

  And according to a recent New York Times report: ‘the Obama
  administration, acutely aware of how what happened in Iraq undercut
  American credibility, is deliberately taking a back seat, eager to
  make the conclusions entirely the I.A.E.A.’s, even as it continues to
  press for more international sanctions against Iran.’⁶⁵

  Shouldn’t these crucial facts be noted in your analysis?

  The NYT report continues:

  ‘When the director of the agency, Yukiya Amano, came to the White
  House 11 days ago to meet top officials of the National Security
  Council about the coming report, the administration declined to even
  confirm he had ever walked into the building.’

  Isn’t all this relevant in assessing the context, realpolitik and
  implications of the IAEA report? Can you not find critical
  commentators outside the Iranian government whom you can quote?

  Given the stakes involved, would you perhaps consider addressing the
  above points in your analysis in future, please?

  Many thanks.

 

Rather than address any of the above points, Reynolds emailed back:
‘thanks for your message. I appreciate your comments and insight.’⁶⁶

Just over a week later, a new BBC piece appeared in which the five
permanent members of the UN Security Council and Germany claimed to have
‘deep and increasing concern’ over Iran’s nuclear programme.⁶⁷ I emailed
Reynolds again:⁶⁸

  Have you considered interviewing sceptical and informed commentators?

  For example, you could approach the experienced investigative
  journalist Gareth Porter. He says that the recent IAEA report’s
  ‘dubious intelligence [is being] used as pretext for tougher
  sanctions.’⁶⁹

  Porter’s analysis is backed up by Robert Kelley, a nuclear engineer
  who has carried out IAEA inspections. Kelley believes that ‘the report
  misleads and manipulates facts in [an] attempt to prove a foregone
  conclusion.’⁷⁰

  He also says that the IAEA report ‘recycles old intelligence and is
  meant to bolster hard liners.’

  Shouldn’t you also be including such important and informed views in
  your reporting for BBC News?

 

Not hearing from him, I nudged Reynolds three days. He again avoided
addressing the points made: ‘I received your message – thanks. I shall
reflect on the points you raise. It is always important for me to hear
from licence-fee payers – the lifeblood of the BBC.’⁷¹

I tried once more to elicit a response from the BBC’s Iran correspondent
that actually addressed the points put to him:

  I appreciate your reply.

  But with the resources of the BBC at your disposal, you surely cannot
  be unaware of the informed commentators and important points presented
  to you [in the previous emails]. It is notable that you do not appear
  to have included them in any of your BBC reports to date. Why not?

  Nor have you reported – although I may have missed it – that IAEA
  chief Yukiya Amano is regarded by the US, according to a WikiLeaks
  cable, as ‘solidly in the U.S. court on every key strategic decision,
  from high-level personnel appointments to the handling of Iran’s
  alleged nuclear weapons program.’

  Why remain silent about this astonishing fact? Isn’t this crucially
  relevant for public understanding of what is happening over Iran?
  Perhaps there are editorial reasons that are making it difficult for
  you to properly report these vital issues?⁷²

 

To no avail: the response was even terser this time: ‘points noted.’⁷³
Curiously, ‘the lifeblood of the BBC’ apparently deserved no better than
this.

Can journalists really have forgotten the propaganda offensive that
predated the 19 March 2003 invasion of Iraq; a tsunami of disinformation
in which they were accomplices? Had they really learned nothing? What
gave them the right to absolve themselves and to start with a clean
slate when Iran became the next hyped ‘threat’?

Surely as the spectre of yet another war in the Middle East loomed,
perhaps the greatest conflagration yet, it should have been essential
for journalists to be wary of broadcasting propaganda claims over Iran.


Global Climate Crime

 

  The gap between public perception and scientific reality is now
  enormous. While some of the public is just becoming aware of the
  existence of global warming, the relevant scientists – those who know
  what they are talking about – realize that the climate system is on
  the verge of tipping points. If the world does not make a dramatic
  shift in energy policies over the next few years, we may well pass the
  point of no return.

  James Hansen, leading NASA climate scientist¹

 

Dancing with a Fossil Fuel Dinosaur

When I was growing up I used to keep scrapbooks of cuttings from
newspapers that my parents bought. As hinted at in the first chapter, it
was quite an eclectic mix comprising the Daily Record, Sunday Mail,
Glasgow Herald, the Morning Star (formerly the Daily Worker) as well as
the Cumbernauld News, our local paper. I’ve preserved all kinds of
stories in these scrapbooks from the 1970s: articles about the
possibility of life on Mars (NASA’s Viking space missions were
generating considerable excitement); Glasgow’s rubbish collection
strikes; investigations into the paranormal (often quoting Archie Roy, a
professor of astronomy, who would later teach me at Glasgow University);
and, as a keen swimmer, reams of news about Cumbernauld swimming club to
which I belonged.

One November 1975 article on the Loch Ness monster caught my eye the
other day. The byline says: ‘Nicholas Witchell is 22 and finishing a law
degree at Leeds University. He is a firm believer in the existence of
the Loch Ness monster.’ Witchell later became a well-known BBC
correspondent, specialising in stories related to royalty (surely of
less interest or importance than Nessie). He also performed a propaganda
service for the British government with his reporting on Iraq.

Other articles, from May 1975, covered the end of the Vietnam war,
including one titled ‘Saigon cheers as Vietcong move in.’ An
accompanying piece declared that Henry Kissinger had ‘travelled the
world in search of a peace formula.’ In fact, as mentioned earlier,
Kissinger played a leading role in perpetrating major US war crimes in
southeast Asia, not least the massive aerial bombardment of Cambodia.
The article pointed out that the war ‘had taken the lives of nearly
60,000’ Americans. The closing line was: ‘The final reckoning of the
Vietnamese casualties on both sides may never come.’ Indeed, no reliable
estimates for the Vietnamese death toll exist even today, but the number
likely lies in the range 1.5 million to 3.8 million.²

Also among the more serious newspaper clippings are indications of
another concern of mine back then and now: climate. One story from the
Glasgow Herald on 3 February 1977 is titled ‘Earth may be warming up.’
Journalist Robert Cowen was reporting the view of academician Mikhail I.
Budyko, a Soviet climatologist. Budyko warned that, following a general
plateauing of global temperatures since the 1940s, ‘substantial warming’
was once again kicking off, ‘due partly to carbon dioxide pollution.’
The scientist added: ‘If the present rapid trend towards a warmer
climate continues, in five to ten years, climatic conditions will appear
which have not been observed for many centuries.’ It was a pretty
accurate prediction, as we now know.

A decade later, in 1987, I had my head buried in scientific papers,
notebooks and computer programs in Glasgow University’s astrophysics
group. I was doing my best to pull together some research findings that
I could write up for my PhD thesis before funding from the Science and
Engineering Research Council ran out that year. While I was trying to
understand what was going on inside solar flares, huge magnetic
explosions in the sun’s atmosphere, I hadn’t given a great deal of
thought to looking for a job. A job? I’m too young for that; I’m only 24
for goodness’ sake! Professor John Brown, my supervisor, accomplished
magician, Frank Zappa fan and now Astronomer Royal for Scotland, had
suggested that I apply for a postdoctoral position in Boulder, Colorado.
The National Center for Atmospheric Research (NCAR) looked like a pretty
good place for solar physics, they had a thriving postdoctoral
fellowship scheme, and Boulder was an attractive town with the Rocky
Mountains on its doorstep and the fair-sized city of Denver close at
hand. So, if my application was successful, that could be fun for a year
or two.

While working on my thesis, my then girlfriend had spotted a job ad in
New Scientist. Shell were aiming to recruit not just geologists and
geophysicists for oil and gas exploration, but physicists too. Okay, so
I was more of an astrophysicist, but this looked intriguing. A real job
– well-paid, no doubt – doing something to do with physics and seeing a
bit of the world. ‘Why don’t you apply for it and see what happens?’,
she said. I did. I was invited down to Shell’s headquarters in London’s
York Road, opposite Waterloo railway station, wearing a new suit and a
new skinny silk pink tie that she had bought. (Don’t forget, this was
the 1980s.)

The interview seemed to go fine. I had felt quite relaxed because I
still had my heart set on Boulder; indeed, my postdoc application had by
now been accepted. I passed the Shell interview in London. But that was
only phase one. A few weeks later, I was off to the Netherlands for a
full day of interviews with senior managers at Shell International’s
offices in The Hague. I also got taxied across to their research
laboratory in Rijswijk near Delft for another couple of interviews.
Perhaps Shell personnel weren’t quite sure what to do with me if they
took me on: would I be better suited to working in an operational
environment, tracking down oil and gas reservoirs, or working as a
white-coated boffin doing clever things in the lab or perhaps sitting
behind a computer performing complicated calculations?

Driven back to The Hague for the final few interviews, I then had a bit
of a grilling from one senior figure, a former manager of one of Shell’s
many exploration companies around the world. With a straight face, he
asked me: ‘Why do you want to join a big corporation that screws the
environment and exploits people around the world?’ Why indeed? This was,
in part, typically provocative Dutch bluntness, as I was to learn in
later years. Of course, he was playing devil’s advocate and trying to
test my mettle. I managed to regurgitate some standard guff I’d read in
one of the glossy Shell brochures about how the company group operates
to very high environmental standards, creates good job opportunities for
natives, er locals, in the countries in which they work, supports
educational and other charitable initiatives, blahblah-blah. I even
half-believed it at the time.

The last interview was with Shell’s personnel manager for international
staff. He was imposing, well over six feet tall, slim, severe-looking
and carried an intimidating aura of ‘Whatever you say, I won’t be
impressed.’ He told me that he thought Shell international staff were
well-paid, ‘in my view, almost certainly over paid’ and said that he’d
let me know in due course whether I’d got the job. He looked even less
impressed at the end of the interview than at the beginning.

A few days after returning home, I received a telegram – now a relic
from a bygone era – to say I’d got the job. I was to report to Shell HQ
in The Hague in January 1988, a few months hence, to start the 18-week
Shell training course that was mandatory for all international staff. I
was torn. I really wanted to work and live in the United States, and was
due to start my postdoc in Boulder the same month when Shell training
would begin. During my PhD, in the late summer and autumn of 1986, I’d
already been on a research visit to NASA’s Space Flight Center in
Greenbelt, Maryland, and I was keen to return to the US. But a job offer
from Shell, with opportunities for working around the world, wasn’t to
be turned down lightly. ‘Why don’t you talk to the original personnel
bloke you saw in London?’, suggested my girlfriend. ‘Maybe you could
defer the Shell offer for a year. Go to Boulder, see what it’s like,
then decide.’

‘They won’t let me do that. Put them off for a whole year? I might as
well tell them now to stuff their job!’

‘Just ask. It can’t do any harm.’

I asked. It was fine! ‘By all means go off to Boulder to do a postdoc,’
said the Shell personnel manager in London, himself a former physicist.
‘Get in touch with us half-way through the year and we’ll see how things
stand. I’m keen to recruit more physicists, so I reckon there’s a very
good chance you could start with us in January 1989, a year later.’

And that’s what happened. I went to Boulder, worked at the High Altitude
Observatory at NCAR, made new friends, joined a softball team, went to
some gigs (Pink Floyd and Roy Buchanan were highlights), walked in the
Rockies and explored further afield, including New Mexico and
California.

1988 happened to be a watershed year in the climate debate and it was
especially interesting to be in the US then. Concern among the United
Nations had heightened to such an extent that the Intergovernmental
Panel on Climate Change was established. Watching and reading the news
that year, I started to get a real sense of the shifts in normal weather
patterns; there were frequent media bulletins about anomalously high
temperatures and extended droughts. And it was that summer when NASA
scientist James Hansen testified to the US Congress about the threat of
global warming. I could see that new books and reports on climate change
were flying into the NCAR library. One pile of glossy brochures I came
across set out NASA’s plans for an extensive programme of Earth
observation satellites, primarily motivated by concerns over climate
change and human exploitation of ecosystems.

I loved living in Boulder but decided that perhaps astronomical research
wasn’t quite for me. After the PhD, I seemed to have lost that
passionate edge for pursuing it. What I thought would be more attractive
or, at least, well worth a shot was a different kind of challenge in
exotic locations, doing what would surely be dynamic and challenging
physics-based work. I decided to take up the Shell job after all and was
told, yes, the offer to start in January 1989 was still on the table. I
took it and returned to Europe.

The 18-week Shell training course in the Netherlands would prove to be a
major challenge – a feat of endurance, of trying to soak up as much
geology and geophysics as I could, not to mention rather tedious
‘management skills’; but also of bonding with a disparate but mostly fun
and engaging group of twenty recent graduates: British, Dutch, French,
Belgian and even one German who’d been studying in the States.

From what I recall now, if there was any ethical dilemma amongst the new
recruits at this time, it wasn’t about climate change, pollution or
complicity in human rights abuses in Nigeria. Instead, the issue was
that Shell, like some other Western companies, were operating in South
Africa under the apartheid regime. This sat uneasily with many of us;
though clearly not sufficiently heavily to have prevented us applying to
Shell in the first place. During a coffee break one new recruit
suggested that we should ask for a note to be placed in our personnel
records that we would refuse any posting to South Africa. A few of us
did so. The personnel manager was clearly irritated when I made this
request, replying to the effect that she would do so, but that she
wasn’t happy that we’d clearly been colluding amongst ourselves!

We would joke on the training course about ‘escaping’ from the intense
cramming and acculturation process into the Shell world, becoming ‘Shell
refugees.’ But nobody left at that stage. Everyone completed the
demanding 18 weeks and was then sent to his or her first post: most of
us staying in the Netherlands, like me, or going to the UK. Two people
did receive more exotic postings: one to Libya and the other to Oman. By
the end of the first four-year assignment a couple of the initial twenty
recruits had dropped out. I was one of them. As mentioned in an earlier
chapter, I left towards the end of 1993, just under five years after
joining Shell. Although I’d met lots of good people, and enjoyed life in
Holland, I felt a huge sense of relief in escaping the corporate
confines of a big company.

Within the next few years many others would leave, some by choice but
others were forced out in successive cost-cutting rounds of
redundancies. In 1995, Shell was embroiled in huge controversy when it
was accused of being complicit in the ‘judicial murder’ – to quote then
British prime minister John Major, no radical – of Ken Saro-Wiwa and
eight other Nigerian human rights activists. The company would later
also be rocked by financial scandal in 2004 after falsely optimistic
accounts of Shell oil reserves had been published.³ It was but a
temporary blip. In 2008, the oil giant announced record profits over the
previous year of £13.9 billion. Shell’s core business, despite incessant
green rhetoric, has remained firmly in hydrocarbons.

Climate out of Control

Meanwhile, since its inception in 1988, the Intergovernmental Panel on
Climate Change had continued to investigate global warming and, in
particular, the evidence for an anthropogenic fingerprint on climate
change. The IPCC comprises three Working Groups investigating,
respectively, climate science; impacts, adaptations and mitigations
related to climate change; and social and economic dimensions of climate
change. The panel works to the highest levels of rigour and probity. But
over the years it has been subjected to immense pressure from oil-rich
nations, corporate representatives from the coal, oil, electricity,
chemical and automobile industries, and fossil fuel-funded ‘sceptics.’⁴

By the mid 1990s, there was a remarkable convergence of the relevant
science, enabling the IPCC’s Working Group I on climate science to
conclude famously in its 1996 Second Assessment Report that ‘the balance
of evidence suggests a discernible human influence on global climate.’⁵
The report also warned: ‘Future unexpected, large and rapid climate
system changes (as have occurred in the past) are by their nature
difficult to predict. This implies that future climate changes may also
involve “surprises.”’ Such surprises may occur as a result of so-called
‘positive feedbacks’: effects which mutually reinforce each other,
leading to a runaway climate change (‘negative’ feedbacks would tend to
dampen, rather than amplify, changes). One example is that of cloud
feedbacks, a source of uncertainty in climate models. Thin high-altitude
clouds in a warming world may trap more heat than the lower-altitude
clouds which reflect heat back into space. Another possible positive
feedback mechanism is the melting of the Arctic ice cap. A smaller
Arctic ice cap would result in a lower Earth albedo (reflectivity),
meaning that more heat would be absorbed by the planet.

We now know that the climate crisis is not a future risk; it is today’s
reality. As Myles Allen, a climate scientist at Oxford University,
warned back in 2005: ‘The danger zone is not something we are going to
reach in the middle of this century. We are in it now.’⁶ Indeed, climate
change is already responsible for 300,000 deaths a year and is affecting
300 million people, according to a report by former UN secretary general
Kofi Annan’s think tank, the Global Humanitarian Forum. The study warned
that increasingly severe heatwaves, floods, storms and forest fires will
be responsible for as many as 500,000 deaths a year by 2030.⁷

By the time of the IPCC’s Fourth Assessment Report in 2007, the evidence
for human-induced climate change had become ‘unequivocal.’⁸ In 2009, the
United Nations Environment Programme warned that: ‘The changing climate
is pushing many Earth systems towards critical thresholds that will
alter regional and global environmental balances and threaten stability
at multiple scales. Alarmingly, we may have already passed tipping
points that are irreversible within the time span of our current
civilization.’⁹

According to NASA researchers at the Goddard Institute for Space Studies
(GISS) in New York, global surface temperatures in 2010 tied with 2005
as the warmest on record. ‘If the warming trend continues, as is
expected, if greenhouse gases continue to increase, the 2010 record will
not stand for long,’ said James Hansen, the director of GISS. ‘Global
temperature is rising as fast in the past decade as in the prior two
decades, despite year-to-year fluctuations associated with the El
Niño-La Niña cycle of tropical ocean temperature,’ Hansen and his
colleagues reported.¹⁰

The very stability of the Earth’s climate system is on the brink. Even
an overall global temperature rise of two degrees Celsius (2^(o)C),
decreed the politically acceptable target for limiting global warming,
would be ‘a guaranteed disaster,’ warned Hansen: ‘It is equivalent to
the early Pliocene epoch [between about 5.3 and 2.6 million years ago]
when the sea level was 25 m higher. What we don’t know is how long it
takes ice sheets to disintegrate, but we know we’d be starting a process
which then is going to be out of control.’¹¹

The next IPCC assessment report is expected to be finalised in 2014. No
doubt whoever is in power then will once again assert a renewed
‘commitment’ to ‘combat’ global warming. But Hansen believes that UN
climate talks are ‘doomed to failure’ so long as they do not address the
fundamental physical constraints of the Earth’s climate system and how
to live within them. These constraints and – crucially – how they are
under threat by a rampant system of corporate globalisation are taboo
subjects for the corporate media.

Guarding the Mythology of ‘Failure to Act’

In 2009, six years after Iraq had suffered the brutal US-led invasion,
Sir David King described the war as the first of this century’s
‘resource wars’ in which powerful countries would use force to secure
valuable commodities. The Guardian reported that King, who had been the
UK government’s chief scientific adviser in the run-up to the Iraq war:
‘Implicitly reject[ed] the US and British governments’ claim they went
to war to remove Saddam Hussein and search for weapons of mass
destruction […] the US had in reality been very concerned about energy
security and supply, because of its reliance on foreign oil from
unstable states.’

The Guardian noted blandly that King ‘did not express his view of its
true motivation to Tony Blair.’ King asked us to believe that: ‘It was
certainly the view that I held at the time, and I think it is fair to
say a view that quite a few people in government held.’¹²

The journalist, James Randerson, passed over this piece of
self-exculpatory rhetoric. I decided to email him, asking:

1.  Did King offer any reason for not expressing his view to Blair?
2.  Did he express any regret or remorse for this silence?
3.  Have you asked him why he did not express his view?
4.  If you haven’t asked him – why not do so, given its importance?¹³

Randerson replied, thanking me for my interest and said: ‘The question
was posed at the end of the lecture so there was not an opportunity to
follow up his answers. I suspect he would say that the view of the chief
scientist on this matter would not be worth much, but that is just me
speculating.’¹⁴ I replied, thanking him for responding and then added:

  But, please, rather than speculating… you’re a reporter. Why not
  follow this up, get hold of King and put these questions to him?

  Surely it’s of importance to find out why so many people inside
  government held their tongues? Given the huge stakes, is it really
  reasonable for King, or anyone else anywhere inside government, to
  feel that their view “would not be worth much”? Given that we are
  talking about a “war of aggression” – “the supreme international
  crime,” to quote the Nuremberg judges – how reasonable was it to
  maintain silence; to justify to oneself that speaking out didn’t fit
  one’s job specs?

  And the outcome of such individual silence, repeated over and over
  again? Probably over one million dead, millions of refugees, and
  untold numbers of maimed, traumatised, suffering people.

  For the sake of humanity, is it not worth pushing a bit harder in your
  reporting?’¹⁵

 

There was no further response from the Guardian journalist. It struck me
as an illustration of the limits of acceptable debate, highlighting the
triple failure of journalism, academia and politics.

Yet another example of these limits is the attention now being devoted
to proposals for ‘geoengineering’ projects to ‘tackle’ global warming:
seeding the oceans with nutrients to boost the growth of carbon
dioxide-chomping phytoplankton, the ‘grass’ of the sea; carbon capture
and storage to bury climate-wrecking gases deep underground; and even
giant mirrors orbiting above the planet, directing sunlight away from
the Earth. These are all desperate proposed measures which would divert
attention and resources, not to mention human brainpower and will, from
the urgent need to build sustainable economies ‘as if people mattered,’
to echo E. F. Schumacher.¹⁶ By contrast, a Guardian editorial, while
expressing some justified caution about ‘possibly half-baked plans,’
mused grandly about governments ‘dreaming of engineering solutions’ and
of how ‘under the right political and economic arrangements, scientists
and technologists around the world can and will co-operate in selfless
achievement.’¹⁷

In 2009, the Royal Society published a report which examined a raft of
proposals to either remove carbon dioxide from the atmosphere or to
reflect some of the Sun’s light and heat back into space.¹⁸ The study
rightly warned that ‘geoengineering techniques could have serious
unintended and detrimental effects on many people and ecosystems.’ But
the bleak conclusion was that: ‘Geoengineering and its consequences are
the price we may have to pay for failure to act on climate change.’¹⁹

Scientist James Lovelock, originator of the Gaia hypothesis of Earth as
a self-regulating system, has already effectively cut adrift most of the
human population. He argues that if a ‘safe form’ of geoengineering the
climate system can be found, it should be used ‘to buy a little time’
for humanity to marshal its resources and retreat to ‘refuge areas of
the world that [will] escape the worst heat and drought.’²⁰ He
continues: ‘Parts of the world such as oceanic islands, the Arctic basin
and oases on the continents will still be habitable in a hot world. We
need to regard them as lifeboats and see that there are sufficient
sources of food and energy to sustain us as a species.’

The mantra of ‘failure to act,’ the framing of the climate debate
favoured by the Royal Society and other establishment voices, is a
persistent cover-up of the truth. What is fundamentally missing from the
analyses of the Royal Society, James Lovelock and other commentators
with media-friendly profiles, is the dangerous driving force of
state-corporate greed that is accelerating the danger of societal
collapse under climate chaos. What is also missing from mainstream
debate is the potential for mass grassroots action to challenge this
dangerous greed and to invert current state-corporate priorities in
order to benefit humanity and ecosystems.

It cannot be denied that, as individuals, the tide is almost impossible
to swim against. And for anyone in a public position to speak out
against the current direction in science policy, never mind government
priorities generally – foreign policy, the economy, domestic and
international poverty – is to be marked as a ‘troublemaker,’ or worse.
Far easier to go with the flow, address the priorities driven from on
high, and keep your mouth shut to avoid offending reigning
sensibilities.

It should be clear by now that there is already intolerable pressure on
the environment and on global human security as a result of the
extraction of natural resources such as oil and natural gas – a major
factor behind the US government’s smokescreen of the ‘war on terror.’
The additional threats represented by the spectre of climate change
could create unprecedented political and social upheaval.²¹

A pressing question today is whether national governments will adopt
new, even more strict, authoritarian measures to limit personal freedom,
including rights to peaceful protest, as they have already begun to do
in the wake of the terrorist attacks of 11 September 2001, in order to
protect ‘homeland security.’ Will the elite political and corporate
forces that are directing economic globalisation for their own ends
adopt uncompromising and awful measures to perpetuate global capitalism
in the twenty-first century? Will they thus ensure that they keep the
‘gains’ to themselves and inflict the Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse,
namely the ‘losses,’ on the rest of us, as Susan George conjectures in
her disturbing 1999 book, The Lugano Report?²² Whatever the future
holds, we should be under no illusions. ‘The stress caused by climate
change,’ warns US journalist Ross Gelbspan, ‘is lethal to democratic
political processes and individual freedoms.’²³

It might be easy at this juncture to throw our hands in the air and
wail, ‘What’s the point?’ But this is precisely the point at which the
need for changing the external conditions of the world collides with the
need to transform ourselves. The Scottish activist and writer Alastair
McIntosh says candidly that he ‘cannot say that I am optimistic about
saving some of the things that are most familiar and loveable in this
world. And yet, my position borders on the perverse.’

He explains: ‘I perversely hold out hope for humanity, not in spite of
global warming, but precisely because it confronts us with a wake-up
call to consciousness. Answering that call of the wild to the wild
within us all invites outer action matched by inner transformation.’²⁴

This is a vital point to which we will return in the final two chapters
of this book.

Who’s Holding Us Back?

I met up with David Edwards, my co-editor at Media Lens, in London one
day in the summer of 2009. We were chatting about how little had been
achieved to address climate change in all the time we’d both been
seriously following the debate (more than 20 years). Today, whenever
climate change impinges on news headlines, the public is told that
politicians from around the globe are working together to address the
problem. And yet, the world seems hell-bent on maximising economic
growth and continuing with accelerated mass consumption. It is as if the
media is perennially stuck on ‘square one’ of a board game, as David put
it during our conversation. He then came up with the idea of approaching
a number of leading scientists and commentators to solicit their brief
responses to three simple questions:

1.  In your opinion, as things stand, how far have governments really
    gone towards addressing the climate crisis?
2.  If you had to sum up in a word, would you describe the political
    response as ‘impressive,’ ‘adequate,’ ‘inadequate,’ ‘negligible’ or
    another word of your choice?
3.  If you could give a rough figure, would you say governments are 1%,
    20%, 50%, 70%,…, of the way there? (We knew this was very imprecise
    but we were interested in getting an idea of people’s gut feelings
    on the issue.)

We emailed a number of mostly UK-based senior climate researchers, some
of them with significant media profiles, and a few environment writers
and activists as well. We received very few responses despite, in some
cases, sending two follow-up reminders. In particular, one senior
scientist at the UK Met Office maintained a studied silence. Not even
the directors of the two leading environment groups, Friends of the
Earth and Greenpeace, answered the questions. Of course, it could have
been that everyone was simply too busy to respond or regarded us as
nobodies. Entirely possible! Or were they nervous of speaking out?

A notable exception to the prevailing silence was one leading climate
scientist whom we met earlier in this chapter: James Hansen, head of
NASA’s Goddard Institute for Space Studies in the US. He was pretty
scathing about political rhetoric, telling us that the response of
governments to date was ‘misleading’ and ‘mostly greenwash.’ As to how
much they had actually achieved: ‘0%, because they are starting down a
wrong track, requiring 1-2 decades to reset. “Goals” for emission
reduction, cap-and-trade with offsets, while continuing to build more
coal-fired power plants and developing unconventional fossil fuels is a
disastrous path. It is meant to fool people, even themselves. A
strategic approach would instead recognize the geophysical boundary
conditions, specifically that coal emissions must be rapidly phased
out.’

He added some disturbing analysis: ‘The fundamental economic requirement
concerns the price of (cheap, subsidized) fossil fuels relative to
alternatives (energy efficiency, renewables, and other carbon-free
energies) – there must be a rising price on carbon emissions (a fee, at
the coal/oil/gas source or port of entry). As that price rises and the
competition ensues we would reach a point where alternatives suddenly
take off and we move beyond the dirty fossil fuel era. The fear that
this will in fact occur is what drives the fossil interests who have
totally taken control of our governments’ actions.’²⁵

Even the cautious and conservative International Energy Authority warned
in 2011 that under currently planned policies, ‘rising fossil energy use
will lead to irreversible and potentially catastrophic climate
change.’²⁶ Around the same time, Greenpeace International published a
study revealing that the corporations who bear the most responsibility
for climate change emissions, and then profiting from those activities,
were campaigning to increase their access to international climate
negotiations. The study, appropriately titled ‘Who’s holding us back? –
How carbon-intensive industry is preventing effective climate
legislation,’ showed that corporations and their networks of industry
associations are even ‘blocking policies that aim to transition our
societies into green, sustainable, low risk economies.’²⁷

According to the report: ‘These polluting corporations often exert their
influence behind the scenes, employing a variety of techniques,
including using trade associations and think-tanks as front groups;
confusing the public through climate denial or advertising campaigns;
making corporate political donations; as well as making use of the
“revolving door” between public servants and carbon-intensive
corporations.’

In the US alone, approximately $3.5 billion is invested annually in
lobbying activities at the federal level. In recent years, Royal Dutch
Shell, the US Chamber of Commerce, Edison Electric Institute, PG&E,
Southern Company, ExxonMobil, Chevron, BP and ConocoPhillips all made
the top 20 list of lobbyists. The climate campaign organisation 350.org
estimates that 94 per cent of US Chamber of Commerce contributions went
to climate denier candidates. In Europe, attempts by the EU to increase
its emissions reductions target for 2020 from 20 per cent to 30 per cent
have been undermined by the heavy lobbying of carbon-intensive
interests, including BASF, ArcelorMittal and Business Europe.

Tzeporah Berman of Greenpeace International summed it all up when she
said that the study ‘shows beyond a doubt that there are a handful of
powerful polluting corporations who are exerting undue influence on the
political process to protect their vested interests.’²⁸

‘A Death Sentence for Africa’

The 2011 UN climate summit in Durban, South Africa, ended with one of
those marathon all-night cliffhanger negotiations that the media love so
much. The outcome was a commitment to talk about a legally-binding deal
to cut carbon emissions, by both developed and developing countries,
that would be agreed by 2015 and come into effect by 2020. It was about
as tortuous and vague as that sounds.

BBC News reported the UN chairperson saying that the talks had ‘saved
tomorrow, today.’²⁹ But nothing substantive had changed. Carbon
emissions, already at their peak,³⁰ would continue to increase for at
least the next eight years, pushing humanity closer to the brink of
climate collapse. Rather than address the madness of a global system of
corporate-led capitalism that is bulldozing us into this disaster, the
corporate media mouthed deceptive platitudes. A Guardian editorial
assured readers that the Durban deal is ‘better than nothing,’ and that:
‘There are times when inching forward can look like progress […] a
moment when it is cheerier to think of how bad things might have been
than to rate the success of the final outcome.’³¹ Adopting the standard,
but discredited, establishment framework to explain the treacly mire
hindering serious action on climate, this vanguard of liberal journalism
opined: ‘There is an unvarying conflict of interest in the fight against
climate change between developed and developing economies.’

No hint there that the conflict is, as the Occupy Movement has pointed
out, between the elite corporate 1% and the 99% of the global population
that are their victims.

The Independent, another great white hope of liberal journalism, told
its diminishing band of readers that the Durban outcome is ‘an agreement
that gives new cause for optimism.’³² Indeed, it ‘is an enormous advance
on the position now.’

An editorial in The Times conformed along similar lines while also
taking care to kick the forces of rationality in the teeth: ‘Scientists
and activists will complain that Durban’s only commitment is to more
talks and that any agreement will not become operational until 2020. But
these campaigners have often proved poor advocates, either exaggerating
or misusing data to make their case or showing an unwise disdain for the
realpolitik and compromises essential for any deal.’³³

Climate scientists may have been dismayed that an ostensibly responsible
paper like The Times would make a sneering reference to the unfounded
‘Climategate’ claims of climate data manipulation.³⁴ But perhaps the
general reader would appreciate the irony that the Murdoch-owned Times
is itself, of course, an enthusiastic practitioner of corporate
‘realpolitik.’

‘A Crime of Global Proportions’

I am not suggesting that critical comment was entirely missing from
press coverage in the wake of the 2011 UN climate talks in Durban; that
would require absurd levels of totalitarian media control. At least the
Guardian managed to find space on its website, if not in the print
edition, for the newspaper’s ‘head of environment,’ Damian Carrington,
to write in his blog:

  Unlike the economic debt currently transfixing the attention of
  world’s leaders, it appears possible to them that we can put our
  climate debt on the never-never.

  The loans in euros, dollars and pounds will be called in within days,
  weeks, and months. But the environmental debt – run up by many decades
  of dumping carbon dioxide waste in the atmosphere – won’t be due for
  full repayment before 2020, according to the plan from Durban.³⁵

 

This ‘ecological debt,’ Carrington added, ‘will inevitably transform
into a new economic debt dwarfing our current woes. […] Cleaning up the
energy system that underpins the global economy is inevitable, sooner or
later. If not, true economic armageddon awaits, driven by peak oil,
climate chaos and civil unrest.’

Friends of the Earth were permitted their token quote in the Guardian,
scant reward for decades of softening its criticism of the corporate
media: ‘This empty shell of a plan leaves the planet hurtling towards
catastrophic climate change.’³⁶

Unfiltered by corporate news editors, the US-based Union of Concerned
Scientists issued a statement pointing out that, in Durban, the world’s
governments ‘by no means responded adequately to the mounting threat of
climate change. […] It’s high time governments stopped catering to the
needs of corporate polluters, and started acting to protect people.’³⁷
UCS added: ‘Powerful speeches and carefully worded decisions can’t amend
the laws of physics. The atmosphere responds to one thing, and one thing
only – emissions. The world’s collective level of ambition on emissions
reductions must be substantially increased, and soon.’

In a powerful article on Independent Online, based in South Africa,
there were stronger messages still. The environment group Earthlife
Africa said the decisions resulting from the Durban summit would result
in a 4^(o)C global average temperature rise which would mean an average
increase of 6^(o)C-8^(o)C for Africa. This would lead to an estimated
200 million deaths by 2100. No wonder that Nnimmo Bassey, chairman of
Friends of the Earth International, said: ‘Delaying real action until
2020 is a crime of global proportions.’³⁸ He continued: ‘An increase in
global temperatures of 4^(o)C, permitted under this plan, is a death
sentence for Africa, small island states, and the poor and vulnerable
worldwide. This summit has amplified climate apartheid, whereby the
richest 1 percent of the world have decided that it is acceptable to
sacrifice the 99 percent.’

Karl Hood of Grenada, chair of the Alliance of Small Island States, an
intergovernmental organisation of low-lying coastal and small island
countries, responded to the Durban deal with damning words: ‘Must we
accept our annihilation?’ Aubrey Meyer, a valiant climate activist and
originator of the ‘contraction and convergence’ policy³⁹ that would, if
adopted by the UN, equitably reduce greenhouse gases to safe levels, was
also scathing: ‘The islands are being annihilated and we all are now
become their assassins. We have informally known this but with this
“Durban-Deal” we all have now formally crossed that threshold.’⁴⁰

Janet Redman, of the Washington-based Institute for Policy Studies,
spoke the unadorned truth that is so painful, if not impossible, for the
corporate media to acknowledge: ‘What some see as inaction is in fact a
demonstration of the palpable failure of our current economic system to
address economic, social or environmental crises.’⁴¹

The Eightfold Nay: The Great Unmentionables of Climate Coverage

In the second Media Lens book, Newspeak in the 21^(st)Century, we listed
the key issues that would be at the heart of any debate on the climate
crisis in a truly free media.⁴² They are worth polishing off and
reiterating here, with added references, as this will help clarify the
gross divide between where we are and where we need to be.

In other words, here are eight key issues that are not being discussed
at length by ‘mainstream’ politicians, academics and the media:

1.  The inherently biocidal, indeed psychopathic, logic of corporate
    capitalism, structurally locked into generating maximised revenues
    in minimum time at minimum corporate cost. Because corporations are
    legally obliged to maximise profits for shareholders, it is in fact
    illegal for corporations to prioritise the welfare of people and
    planet above private profits.⁴³ How can this simple fact of
    entrenched corporate immorality not be central to any discussion
    that is relevant to the industrial destruction of global
    life-support systems?⁴⁴
2.  The proven track record of big business in promoting catastrophic
    consumption, regardless of the consequences for human and
    environmental health. Whether disregarding the links between smoking
    and cancer, junk food and obesity, exploitation of the developing
    world and human suffering, fossil fuel extraction and lethal climate
    change, factory farming and animal suffering, high salt consumption
    and illness, corporations have consistently subordinated human and
    animal welfare to short-term profits.⁴⁵
3.  The relentless corporate lobbying of governments to introduce, shape
    and strengthen policies to promote and protect private power.⁴⁶
4.  The billions spent by the advertising industry to sell consumer
    products and ‘services,’ creating artificial ‘needs,’ with children
    an increasing target.⁴⁷
5.  The collusion between powerful companies, rich investors and state
    planners to install compliant, often brutal, dictators in client
    states around the world.⁴⁸
6.  The extensive use of loans and tied aid that ensnare poor nations in
    webs of crippling debt, ensuring that the West obtains or deepens
    control of their resources, markets and development.⁴⁹
7.  The deployment of threats, bribery and armed force against countries
    that attempt to pursue self-development, rather than economic or
    strategic planning sanctioned by ‘the international community.’⁵⁰
8.  The lethal role of the corporate media in promoting the
    planet-devouring aims of private power.⁵¹

One searches in vain for any sensible and sustained discussion of any of
these issues in the corporate media; never mind all of them taken
together. Edward Herman and Noam Chomsky showed why this might be so in
their classic book Manufacturing Consent which I mentioned in Chapter 2.
They argued, with copious examples, that the performance of news media
is shaped by economic and ideological factors embodied in a ‘propaganda
model.’⁵² The book was published in 1988, the same year that the IPCC
was set up. (I told you earlier that 1988 was a pivotal year.) The
propaganda model consists of five filters that, in the words of the New
York Times masthead logo, output ‘all the news that’s fit to print.’ The
news filters are corporate media ownership; heavy dependence on
advertising revenue; reliance on approved news sources such as
governments and business; the threat, and use, of flak by powerful
interests to keep the media in line; and an ideological framework that
demonises state-designated enemies.

No wonder, then, that the corporate media, including the ‘impartial’
BBC, rarely address unsustainable economic growth on a finite planet; or
the links between likely climate catastrophe and the destructive
practices of global corporations, financial speculators and banks. The
BBC is publicly funded and ostensibly free from vested interests. But
its senior managers are appointed by the UK government (which sets the
licence fee paid by the public), as are the members of the BBC Trust
charged with ensuring that the broadcaster fulfils its public
obligations. The Trust consists of influential and privileged people
from the corporate media, advertising, banks, finance and industry.⁵³

Anyone concerned with the future of humanity has a responsibility to
speak out about the crippling factors that are hindering effective
action on climate. A good start to these responsibilities would be to
expose the impossibility of a corporate media performing its mythical
fourth-estate role of challenging powerful interests in society; and to
promote genuine public-interest alternative media. Until these
initiatives start to kick in, be in no doubt that the corporate takeover
of government policy has taken humanity to the very edge of the climate
abyss.


Power’s Assault on Democracy

 

  It is arguable that the success of business propaganda in persuading
  us, for so long, that we are free from propaganda is one of the most
  significant propaganda achievements of the twentieth century.

  Alex Carey¹

 

The Invisible Corporate Shadow

The Australian social scientist Alex Carey, whom we met in Chapter 4,
once wrote that the twentieth century was ‘characterised by three
developments of great political importance: the growth of democracy, the
growth of corporate power, and the growth of corporate propaganda as a
means of protecting corporate power against democracy.’² The power of
the state has also grown, a major factor in facilitating the rise of
corporate dominance.

Although couched in terms of ‘defence’ and ‘security,’ the projection of
the West’s military might around the globe is more to do with strategic
dominance and opportunities for big business. The influential New York
Times columnist Thomas Friedman put it bluntly: ‘The hidden hand of the
market will never work without a hidden fist. McDonald’s cannot flourish
without McDonnell Douglas, the designer of the F-15. And the hidden fist
that keeps the world safe for Silicon Valley’s technologies is called
the US Army, Air Force, Navy and Marine Corps.’³ It is little wonder
that John Dewey, one of America’s leading philosophers, described
politics as ‘the shadow cast on society by big business.’⁴

The corporation craves, and is highly dependent upon, good public
relations to promote itself as a ‘responsible citizen.’ A report
published in 2006 by Corporate Watch, an independent research group,
cast a rare critical eye on the corporation as an entity with powerful
and malign impacts on society. Writer and activist Claire Fauset rightly
described the propaganda tool of ‘corporate social responsibility’ (CSR)
as ‘an effective strategy for: bolstering a company’s public image;
avoiding regulation; gaining legitimacy and access to markets and
decision makers; and shifting the ground towards privatisation of public
functions.’

Fauset continued: ‘CSR enables business to propose ineffective,
voluntary, market-based solutions to social and environmental crises
under [the] guise of being responsible. This deflects blame for problems
caused by corporate operations away from the company, and protects
companies’ interests while hampering efforts to tackle the root causes
of social and environmental injustice.’⁵

The notion of ‘corporate social responsibility,’ endlessly promoted by
big business, news media and even green groups, is an oxymoron. But
there are plenty of non-governmental organisations (NGOs) which are
actively involved in partnerships with corporations. One intriguing
example is the Aldersgate group which coalesced around the issue of
climate change in 2006. Bemused bystanders marvelled at the sight of the
Green Alliance and even Friends of the Earth sitting cosily alongside
business giants Tesco, Shell, Vodafone, Unilever and BAA.⁶ It is another
sign of how much green groups have become assimilated, and thereby
neutered, in a misguided attempt to work with government and the
corporate world. As Corporate Watch asked: ‘Why are NGOs getting
involved in these partnerships?’ One important factor, it seems, is
‘follow the leader’: ‘For many NGOs, the debate on whether or not to
engage with companies is already over. The attitude is “all the major
NGOs engage with companies so why shouldn’t we?” While in many
organisations internal debate continues, there is a sense that, right or
wrong, engagement is the current tack so there is little point in
questioning it.’⁷

Sadly, NGOs do not address the fundamentally destructive nature of
corporations. I once wrote to Stephen Tindale, then executive director
of Greenpeace UK, and asked him why not. I recognised the excellence of
much Greenpeace campaigning and research, but I suggested that there was
a gaping hole at the heart of its work: ‘Let us see Greenpeace (and
other pressure groups) doing more to oppose, not so much what
corporations do, but what they are; namely, undemocratic centralised
institutions wielding illegitimate power.’⁸

Ignoring or missing the point, Tindale replied: ‘We will continue to
confront corporations where necessary – as in our current campaign to
force ExxonMobil to change its stance on climate change. Since we have
taken on the most profitable corporation in the world we cannot be
accused of ducking conflict with corporations. But we are an
environmental group, not an anti-corporate group. We will therefore work
with companies when we can do so to promote our campaign goals. But we
will do so on the basis of complete financial independence.’⁹

But I wasn’t asking Greenpeace about its financial independence from
corporations or whether it was willing to ‘confront’ them. The reality
is that Greenpeace and other NGOs accept the ideological premise that
corporations can be persuaded to act benignly. To question that premise,
never mind to point out the illegitimate power and inherent destructive
nature of the corporation, is seemingly beyond the pale for most
pressure groups.

‘Good People Work for Corporations, Too’

In a Media Lens media alert in 2005, we reported that major
environmental and social justice groups, and even the Green party,
almost wholly overlook the corporate nature of the news media.¹⁰ Nothing
seems to have changed in the meantime. Such groups appear unmoved by
rational analysis, backed by evidence aplenty, which shows that the
corporate media filter out any serious challenges that such groups might
ever make.¹¹ Once again, the corporation – as an entity with immense
undemocratic power, whether in the media industry or elsewhere in the
global economy – is simply accepted as an immutable cosmic fact, like
the laws of physics.

Likewise, mainstream journalists do sometimes raise questions about
corporate behaviour but only within the constraints set, for example, by
the media’s huge dependence on corporate advertising revenue. Bad
corporate practice might be fair game but not the nature of the
corporation which, as we will see below, can justifiably be described as
‘psychopathic.’ This blindness afflicts even those journalists we are
supposed to regard as champions in the fight for climate protection: the
environment editors.

Consider John Vidal, veteran environment editor at the Guardian. Since
the mid-1990s, I had been emailing him on and off, occasionally trying
to publish pieces as a freelance journalist, and had also chatted to him
a few times over the phone. He was a genial bloke under a constant
barrage of demands from environmental groups, activists and hopeful
writers to squeeze something into the paper’s weekly environment
section, which is now discontinued. I had pushed him for literally years
to run a brief article of mine about plans by Associated British Ports
to expand its Southampton port facilities at Dibden Bay, right on the
edge of the New Forest. Eventually, the Independent published a news
article and only then did Vidal accept my piece for the Guardian,
clearly spurred by a rival getting one over on him. My piece was heavily
edited, presumably by Vidal himself, with changes I would not have
approved had I been given the chance to read the final version, and yet
it appeared under my sole byline.¹² At the time, I reluctantly decided
not to complain, fearing that otherwise I might jeopardise my chances of
ever publishing another piece in the Guardian. It was yet another
reminder of the filtering process that afflicts even what was supposed
to be the most progressive section, the environment pages, of the most
progressive newspaper in the country. Over time, it was becoming clearer
to me that the paper had no radical edge; just like the rest of the
media. So even the ostensibly best environment editors were failing to
portray an accurate picture of corporate power.

A few years after my Dibden Bay piece had finally appeared, I had an
intriguing exchange with Vidal when I emailed him on behalf of Media
Lens about a piece he had just written:

  Earlier this year, one of our readers challenged you about your
  article ‘Big water companies quit poor countries’ (Guardian, 22 March
  2006). You were asked:

  ‘Why do you assert as fact that the multinationals “intended to end
  the cycle of drought and death.” They exist to maximize profits, not
  public health.’ (Email forwarded to Media Lens, 22 March 2006)

  In your email response you wrote: ‘...

  do not underestimate the essential humanity of the people who work for
  them [the corporations]. I’m always amazed at how within the body
  corporate, there are people at all levels, who do feel and act
  responsibly with the best of intentions. I have had long, long talks
  with several water companies at all levels and some are clearly
  better/worse than others. Equally, there are some small (water)
  companies who are right bastards and will sell their grandmothers.
  Size seems to have nothing to do with morality etc.’

 

I said in my email to Vidal that his argument was an irrelevance, a
diversion from what really matters. By contrast, I said, consider Joel
Bakan’s devastating book and documentary The Corporation, in which the
Canadian law professor explains how the business entity termed a
‘corporation’ was legally transformed into a ‘person’ possessing its
‘own identity, separate from the flesh and blood people who were its
owners and managers.’ Bakan showed that corporate behaviour closely
matches the clinical definition of a psychopath, including: ‘callous
disregard for the feelings of other people, the incapacity to maintain
human relationships, reckless disregard for the safety of others,
deceitfulness (continual lying to deceive for profit), the incapacity to
experience guilt, and the failure to conform to social norms and respect
for the law.’¹³

Bakan quotes businessman Robert Monks who noted that a corporation
‘tends to be more profitable to the extent it can make other people pay
the bills for its impact on society. There’s a terrible word that
economists use for this called “externalities.”’ Monks added: ‘The
difficulty with the corporate entity is that it has a dynamic that
doesn’t take into account the concerns of flesh-and-blood human people
who form the world in which it exists,’ so that ‘in our search for
wealth and prosperity, we created a thing that’s going to destroy us.’¹⁴
This is the kind of honest, rational perspective that is routinely
missing from corporate journalism.

As for the people who work in influential positions within corporations,
Noam Chomsky has pointed out a crucial truth overlooked by Vidal and his
fellow journalists: ‘When you look at a corporation, just like when you
look at a slave owner, you want to distinguish between the institution
and the individual. So slavery, for example, or other forms of tyranny,
are inherently monstrous. But the individuals participating in them may
be the nicest guys you can imagine – benevolent, friendly, nice to their
children, even nice to their slaves, caring about other people. I mean
as individuals they may be anything. In their institutional role,
they’re monsters, because the institution’s monstrous. And the same is
true here.’¹⁵

Using the Lexis-Nexis database, an extensive online archive of newspaper
and other media sources, in September 2006 I conducted a search of John
Vidal’s articles in the Guardian since 2003, the year that the film The
Corporation was released (the book of the same name was published the
following year). It turned out that Vidal had never mentioned Joel
Bakan’s book or the film, or ever seriously addressed the evidence that
‘corporate social responsibility’ is an oxymoron and that corporate
behaviour is essentially psychopathic. I asked Vidal: ‘What reason(s) do
you have for not addressing such important arguments in your journalism?
Surely these are crucial points in reporting the potentially terminal
fate that faces us in this age of climate chaos?’¹⁶ Vidal did not
respond. I had also presumably blown any chance of ever publishing
anything with him again!

The pattern at other papers is similar, despite some glimpses of
scepticism here and there. One article in the Independent on Sunday by
business reporter Abigail Townsend on ‘corporate social responsibility’
noted that: ‘All companies want a bigger market share and bigger
profits, it’s what they do – and they will push the limits of what’s
acceptable to achieve it. And therein lies the problem whenever
companies start talking about corporate social responsibility: there’s
too big a whiff of empty spin about it.’¹⁷ This scepticism was welcome.
But note that an endemic and deeply damaging problem to society as a
whole is no more than a ‘whiff of empty spin’ to the nose of yet another
corporate newshound.

In another article which focused on the publicity problems afflicting
fossil fuel giant British Petroleum, Townsend again strained at the
limits of acceptable analysis in the mainstream: ‘People want
environmentally aware, socially responsible companies… So business
adapts – or at least it almost does… Politicians are the only ones who
can bring about change. And when the G8 leaders can’t even ensure that
their own carbon-offsetting scheme gets off the ground, it doesn’t bode
well for the rest of us. So, spin or not, companies are to be applauded
for at least moving in the right direction.’¹⁸

Once again, I conducted a newspaper database search which showed that
Townsend had never mentioned Joel Bakan, the book or film The
Corporation, or dismissed ‘corporate social responsibility’ as a lethal
falsehood – not merely ‘spin’ – or addressed the argument that corporate
behaviour is psychopathic. Such absences from ‘mainstream’ journalism
are not unusual. Serious, far less any sustained, discussion of the
inherently destructive and illegitimate system of corporate power has
been essentially ignored by the corporate media. This should surprise
nobody who realises that we cannot rely on the corporate media for
critical analysis of corporate power. But once again, the costs of such
media silence are enormous.

Poverty and the ‘Defence’ Budget

State-corporate propaganda really comes to the fore whenever there is a
need to explain why ‘we’ need to spend billions on ‘defence,’ even as
huge swathes of the country are suffering in poverty, including millions
of children. This should have been an eye-opener for many in 2006 when
Tony Blair, still in power as prime minister, called for a renewed
British nuclear ‘deterrent.’ Or, as the Morning Star put it sagely, a
replacement for ‘the irrelevant, ineffectual and unused Trident missile
system at an estimated cost of around £25 billion.’¹⁹

But even the mind-boggling figure of £25 billion was a huge
underestimate of the likely final cost to the public. Calculations by
the Liberal Democrats led to an estimate of a much higher total figure
of £76 billion. This would be the treasure chest required to buy the
missiles, replace four nuclear submarines, and maintain the system for
its lifetime of 30 years.²⁰ The Sunday Herald later reported that the
total cost of the Trident system could, in fact, reach a staggering £100
billion.²¹ A Greenpeace report published in 2009 confirmed this
figure.²² By then, the Institute of Fiscal Studies was reporting that
inequality in Britain was at a record high, amongst the worst in Europe;
so too were child poverty levels.²³ The campaign group End Child Poverty
(ECP) reported that four million children in the UK, almost one in
three, were living in poverty.

In the same month that Blair was calling for billions on a replacement
for Trident, Guardian columnist Polly Toynbee published a piece on
poverty.²⁴ Over many years, Toynbee, formerly the BBC’s social affairs
editor, built a reputation in the mainstream as a social democrat who
champions the cause of poverty reduction. Now she was heaping praise on
Tory Leader David Cameron, then in opposition, for ‘admit[ting] that
ignoring relative poverty [had been] a terrible mistake.’ It was,
declared Toynbee, ‘a real breakthrough.’

This was a trivial analysis. Toynbee was giving credit to Cameron for a
wretched PR attempt to hijack the poverty issue to boost the image of
his party as ‘caring.’ There was no mention of the corporate-dominated
policies supported by his party, and pursued by the state no matter
which party rules, to the detriment of social justice – including any
realistic hopes of abolishing poverty. As historian Mark Curtis has
written: ‘Addressing poverty eradication without tackling big business
is a bit like addressing malaria without mentioning mosquitoes.’²⁵

I emailed Polly Toynbee:

  There’s no mention in your article of skewed government spending
  priorities such as its overblown ‘defence’ budget; and, specifically,
  whether the state should be paying billions for the
  invasion-occupation of Iraq.

  Or, looking to Richard Norton-Taylor’s column²⁶ [‘Beware
  Trident-Lite’] immediately to the right of yours, whether paying for a
  grossly expensive updated nuclear ‘deterrent’ is a responsible use of
  public revenue.

  Why did you not consider these issues of relevance in your piece on
  poverty today?²⁷

 

In reply, I received another permutation of the standard ‘lack of space’
canard seen so often from journalists: ‘Well, you can’t put everything
into one column! Or you’d always write the same one.’²⁸

Such a response would make sense if Toynbee had repeatedly examined the
link between exorbitant military spending – the Trident replacement, in
particular – and the lack of progress on eradicating poverty. This was
an unimpressive performance from someone lauded for her supposed
commitment to exposing poverty and social injustice. Her answer has
entered the lexicon of liberal evasions I have accumulated over the
years.

The narrow terms of public debate on the debased priorities of ruling
power was rammed home again when Unicef released a report on child
well-being in 2007. The UK languished at the bottom. As ever, discussion
on the BBC, Channel 4 News, ITN and the ‘quality’ press managed to turn
its collective eye away from root causes. An email I sent to Deborah
Orr, a liberal columnist on the Independent (and now back at the
Guardian where she’d been before), summed up the chasm at the heart of
the debate.²⁹

  Dear Deborah,

  Thank you for drawing attention today to the disturbing Unicef report
  on child well-being.³⁰ It truly is shocking, though perhaps not
  entirely surprising, that the UK came bottom out of the 21 rich
  nations surveyed, with the US next to bottom. You did not make the
  connection that these nations have pursued the most grim form of
  turbo-capitalism in recent decades. Here’s what Martin Luther King
  said, all of 40 years ago:

  ‘And one day we must ask the question, Why are there forty million
  poor people in America? And when you begin to ask that question, you
  are raising questions about the economic system, about a broader
  distribution of wealth. When you ask that question, you begin to
  question the capitalistic economy. And I’m simply saying that more and
  more, we’ve got to begin to ask questions about the whole society.’³¹

  More recently, the economist and Nobel Laureate Amartya Sen wrote:

  ‘Global capitalism is much more concerned with expanding the domain of
  market relations than with, say, establishing democracy, expanding
  elementary education, or enhancing the social opportunities of
  society’s underdogs.’³²

  King and Sen provide the context so sorely lacking in your analysis
  today.

  You wrote of the report’s appalling findings:

  ‘I hope that some of these statistics really can be explained away.
  But so many of them cannot be, and must not be.’

  In that case, why did your article fail to note, even in passing, the
  grip of corporate globalisation on British society and well-being? Why
  did you not mention – now, when it matters – the corrosive effects of
  big business’s endless quest for economic ‘growth,’ power and profit?

  Will you also point out that the political ‘choice’ represented by the
  major political parties in this country conform closely – with only
  occasional tactical differences – to the narrow agenda of corporate
  industry and powerful investors? In other words, there is no
  meaningful ‘choice’ in the mainstream political domain.

  Moreover, the corporate media – including the Independent, owned by a
  billionaire [then the wealthy Irish businessman Tony O’Reilly] who
  constantly seeks to ‘further enhance shareholder returns’ – are
  failing to report or discuss this in any substantive way.³³

  You have an influential position as a commentator. Even within the
  constraints set by writing for Independent News & Media, surely you
  can, and must, do more to expose the roots of the ongoing tragedy
  afflicting this country’s children – indeed, all of us.

 

The response, of course, was silence.

The Power Inquiry and Gaping Holes in Media Coverage

Front-page headlines and prominent news bulletins greeted the 2006
publication of the ‘Power Report’ into the ‘meltdown’ of British
democracy. Plummeting participation in elections, and a growing chasm
between the public and party politics, had prompted the study by an
independent panel led by Labour peer and Queen’s Counsel Helena Kennedy.
The report, optimistically titled ‘Power to the People,’ was based on a
year of surveys and hearings, including online public consultation which
generated 1,500 responses.

The Independent rode on the report’s coat tails, proudly proclaiming its
own supposed enthusiasm for real democracy. The newspaper’s coverage
included self-satisfied references to previous Independent cover pages
supporting electoral reform under its ‘Campaign for Democracy’ (since
sunk without trace). The paper greeted the report’s publication:
‘Democracy faces meltdown in Britain as the public rejects an outdated
political system which has centralised more authority than ever in a
tiny ruling elite, the Power inquiry warns today.’ The article
continued: ‘The inquiry says that there is a “very widespread sense that
citizens feel their views and interests are not taken sufficiently into
account.”’³⁴ An Independent editorial the same day was titled, ‘The
urgent need to return politics to the people.’³⁵

Meanwhile, the Guardian’s editors announced grandly, ‘A cause whose time
has come.’³⁶ Guardian columnist Jonathan Freedland warned: ‘Short of
revolution and war, how does anyone ever get power to shift in this
country?’ but then suggested farcically that a ‘reforming [Gordon]
Brown,’ Chancellor of the Exchequer, might prove ‘to be the solution.’³⁷

In contrast, the Daily Telegraph greeted the Power Report with somewhat
flippant headlines: ‘16-year-olds should be allowed to stand for
Parliament,’ and ‘Red Baroness on mission to save democracy.’³⁸ A
comment piece by one of its political reporters assured readers that
Brown, the prime minister-in-waiting, ‘believes [the Power Report]
should be the catalyst for a wide-ranging debate on the future of the
political system.’³⁹

BBC News reported in its usual ‘objective’ manner; namely as a
mouthpiece for power: ‘Tony Blair’s official spokesman said these were
issues which were debated inside and outside parliament and the Power
Inquiry “will contribute to the debate.”’⁴⁰

The Guardian gave comment space to Gordon Brown to ally himself
opportunistically with the limited progressive credentials of the
report. In a breathless piece of political blather, Brown, or his
speechwriter, proclaimed a ‘renewal of Britain’ that ‘springs from a
welcome new culture of rising aspirations, is shaped by a reinvigorated
sense of community and is being led by courageous local reformers – from
environmentally responsible companies to path-breaking charities and
committed councillors. It is a 21st-century expression of the enduring
ideas that Britain gave the world – a commitment to liberty, a strong
sense of civic duty, a belief in fairness.’⁴¹ One could almost picture
the angels in the firmament blowing trumpets to proclaim the glory of
all that New Labour had supposedly achieved in power. However, in common
with other commentators and news reports, Brown skipped over the
Report’s awkward finding that: ‘The main political parties are widely
held in contempt. They are seen as offering no real choice to
citizens.’⁴²

For anyone who cared to examine the Power Report directly, as I did,
there were several obvious and significant omissions in the media
coverage. No doubt the journalistic excuse would be the robotically
uttered standby: ‘restricted space’ means that ‘we can’t cover
everything.’ This would presumably explain why the Report’s emphasis on
public concerns about the huge impact of corporate lobbying, and
business shaping of government policies, was missing from mainstream
news coverage.

The Guardian did briefly note one relevant recommendation of the Power
Inquiry: ‘Ministerial meetings with lobbyists and representatives of
business to be logged and listed monthly.’⁴³ But the crucial context
behind this tantalising glimpse of destructive corporate power
whispering in the ear of the state was missing. As one public submission
to the Inquiry observed: ‘It is not just perception that corporate
lobbying influences government policy – it is actuality. Until the
actuality changes, the perception will not.’⁴⁴

Independent research had determined the extent of this public perception
of illegitimate power: ‘79 per cent of respondents to the State of the
Nation poll in 2004 stated that they felt large corporations had
influence over government policies, while only 34 per cent felt they
ought to enjoy such influence.’⁴⁵ The Power Report noted ‘the
extraordinary power afforded to corporations and their lobbying groups,
often disguised as public-interest NGOs [non-governmental
organisations].’⁴⁶

Again, the media displayed its standard ‘balance’ by remaining silent on
these matters. But then, uncomfortable facts about the extent of
business lobbying, and the relentless green-washing of harmful corporate
practices around the globe, have always received scant coverage. The
same applies to public concerns over the democracy-suppressing power of
media corporations. One individual’s submission put it this way:
‘Commercial considerations influence too greatly how newspapers and
other media gather, edit and represent news stories about politics.’⁴⁷

One member of the public quoted in the Power Report astutely observed
that: ‘The media largely serves its own (financial) interests and barely
serves the interests of the public.’⁴⁸ And another one said: ‘I think it
is a disgrace that so much of the media is concentrated in so few
private hands. I think it is a disgrace that it is allowed to
“self-regulate.”’ On the contrary, there should be ‘legislation to
prevent ownership of controlling stakes by individuals or corporations.
There should be no room for Murdochs or Berlusconis.’⁴⁹

And another reasonable comment: ‘The media’s agenda is largely directed
by the vested interests of political parties and capital.’ As a result,
noted yet another astute member of the public: ‘The media routinely and
systematically ignores the serious problems of our times, such as
climate change, global poverty, massive political unrest, social
instability and dispossession all over the world and spends much of its
time analysing party political rhetoric, the behaviour of the Windsor
family and the wranglings of religious establishments.’⁵⁰

This is precisely the kind of vital and accurate commentary that is
rarely, if ever, permitted to break through the media’s electric fence
of acceptable debate. Instead, news coverage included no more than the
briefest and most anodyne statements on the Power Inquiry’s
recommendation to ‘reform the rules on media ownership.’ The systemic
nature of the media’s role as guardians of power remained hidden. The
media were yet again perfectly happy to overlook their own complicity in
the undermining of democracy.

But then, corporate media professionals have long played a crucial role
in the protection of private power by maintaining the illusion that
members of the public are offered an ‘impartial’ and wide selection of
facts, opinions and perspectives from which any individual can derive
his or her own well-informed world view. Consider one example from the
media section of the Independent in which Tim Luckhurst, a former radio
and newspaper editor and now professor of journalism at Kent University,
quoted the journalist and broadcaster Brian Walden with approval: ‘The
demand for impartiality is too jealously promoted by the political
parties themselves. They count balance in seconds and monitor it with
stopwatches.’⁵¹

This, writes Luckhurst, is a ‘telling point.’ Indeed it is; for it
presumes that ‘impartiality’ equates to one major political party
receiving identical, or at least similar, coverage to another. But when
all the major political parties have almost identical views on important
issues, barring tactical differences, how can this possibly be deemed to
constitute genuine media impartiality?

The problem is a glaring consequence of the unmentionable truth
described by political scientist Thomas Ferguson in his book Golden
Rule; namely, that when major backers of political parties and elections
agree on an issue – such as international ‘free trade’ agreements or
retaining a massive ‘defence’ budget – then the parties will not compete
on that issue, even though the public might ardently wish for a real
alternative.⁵²

Luckhurst, together with virtually all corporate media commentators and
academics, ignores the fact that the public is well aware that a huge
constituency of opinion is reflected neither in what the major political
parties are offering them, nor in what the major broadcasters and
newspapers broadcast and publish. As this book is being completed, the
Leveson inquiry into the British media in the wake of the News
International phone hacking scandal is still ongoing. Do not expect any
meaningful radical reform of the corporate media.

Public Interests Would Mean ‘Disaster’ for Elites

The members of the Power commission found an unsurprising ‘resistance,
even a tetchiness’ when interviewing politicians, particularly when
confronting them with any ideas for political reform raised by the
public. The Report noted: ‘Suddenly, change became a matter for the
people rather than the politicians. The Vice Chair of our Commission,
Ferdinand Mount, quoted Bertolt Brecht to characterise what he had
heard: “Would it not be easier in that case to dissolve the people and
elect another?”’⁵³

As the US media analyst Robert McChesney once observed: ‘In many
respects we now live in a society that is only formally democratic, as
the great mass of citizens have minimal say on the major public issues
of the day, and such issues are scarcely debated at all in any
meaningful sense in the electoral arena.’⁵⁴ McChesney was referring
explicitly to the United States. But the same is demonstrably true of
all the Western ‘democracies,’ including the United Kingdom. As the
Washington Post once noted, inadvertently echoing Ferguson’s ‘Golden
Rule,’ modern democracy works best when the political ‘parties
essentially agree on most of the major issues.’ The Financial Times put
it more bluntly: capitalist democracy can best succeed when it focuses
on ‘the process of depoliticizing the economy.’⁵⁵

Notwithstanding the Power Report’s well-intentioned warning about the
imminent ‘meltdown’ of democracy, this calamity is actually nothing new;
although it is arguably growing ever more severe. Examination of the
historical record reveals that it has always suited the interests of
powerful institutions for the public hand to be kept well away from the
helm of policy; the fear of public opinion is ever-present in the minds
of the ruling classes.

As long ago as the 17^(th) century, historian Clement Walker complained
of English revolutionaries: ‘They have cast all the mysteries and
secrets of government… before the vulgar (like pearls before swine), and
have taught both the soldiery and people to look so far into them as to
ravel back all governments to the first principles of nature… They have
made thereby the people so curious and so arrogant that they will never
find humility enough to submit to a civil rule.’⁵⁶ Walker was clear that
‘there can be no form of government without its proper mysteries, which
are no longer mysteries than while they are concealed. Ignorance, and
admiration arising from ignorance, are the parents of civil devotion and
obedience.’ Or, as MajorGeneral Philip Skippon of Oliver Cromwell’s New
Model Army told Parliament in 1656: ‘The more liberty, the greater
mischief.’ Luke Robinson, MP for Scarborough, concurred: ‘I would not
have a people know their own strength.’⁵⁷

The pattern persists throughout history. Following the French Revolution
of 1789, political elites everywhere were terrified at the prospect of
the mass of the population taking the reins of power away from the
state. The dangers were recognised in Britain by Edmund Burke when he
complained of ‘the swinish multitude’ that was undermining civilisation
itself: ‘The glory of Europe is extinguished forever. Never, never more
shall we behold the generous loyalty to rank and sex, that proud
submission to dignified obedience, that subordination of the heart,
which kept alive even in servitude itself, the spirit of exalted
freedom.’⁵⁸

But ‘the spirit of exalted freedom’ was to be enjoyed by just a select
few. And as the Industrial Revolution took hold in the West in the
nineteenth century, and corporate power grew, business corporations
‘took a contemptuous attitude to public opinion,’ as Alex Carey noted.
Things began to change when the underlying appalling ugliness of the
capitalist system was exposed. In the United States, observed Carey:
‘from 1900 to 1910 Upton Sinclair [the prolific author and ‘muckraker’]
and others so effectively exposed the exploitation and brutality of
American industry that, as Fortune magazine wrote later, “business did
not discover – until its reputation had been all but destroyed – that in
a democracy nothing is more important than [public opinion].”’⁵⁹

Corporate and financial interests quickly perceived the need for ‘public
relations’ campaigns. Over the years, such business propaganda has
attempted to rein in and shape public opinion for corporate ends. Edward
Bernays, one of the founders of the modern PR industry in the 1920s, had
warned that otherwise ‘the masses promised to become king.’ Bernays, a
nephew of Sigmund Freud, argued that this danger could be averted by
deploying new methods of propaganda to influence the public and thus
effect the ‘engineering of consent.’ These methods would enable the
‘intelligent minorities to mold the mind of the masses’ thus
‘regimenting the public mind every bit as much as an army regiments the
bodies of its soldiers.’⁶⁰

The purpose of the newly burgeoning PR industry was to sell corporate
interests to the public as ‘national interests,’ thus protecting the
enormous power and wealth enjoyed by a narrow sector of society:
industrialists, investors and their political allies. Huge propaganda
campaigns were designed and implemented to proclaim the alleged benefits
of the capitalist system and to undermine grassroots efforts to
challenge the growth of corporate power. American historian Elizabeth
Fones-Wolf wrote of business’s attack on the public in the 1940s and
1950s: ‘Manufacturers orchestrated multi-million dollar public relations
campaigns that relied on newspapers, magazines, radio, and later
television, to re-educate the public in the principles and benefits of
the American economic system… This involved convincing workers to
identify their social, economic, and political well-being with that of
their specific employer and more broadly with the free enterprise
system.’⁶¹

Alex Carey concurred: ‘Beginning in 1945, the postwar conservative
assault on public opinion revived the two dominant themes of the 1930s
campaigns: identification of the traditional American free-enterprise
system with social harmony, freedom, democracy, the family, the church,
and patriotism; and identification of all government regulation of the
affairs of business, and all liberals who supported such “interference,”
with communism and subversion.’⁶²

In the United States, the influential National Association of
Manufacturers (NAM) explicitly warned its members, fearful of public
resistance to big business, that: ‘Public policies in our democracy are
eventually a reflection of public opinion,’ so public opinion must be
reshaped ‘if we are to avoid disaster.’⁶³ The NAM, representing a large
swath of US, and thus global, corporate power, is today implicated in
blocking substantive action to combat climate chaos.⁶⁴

Similar pressures have been brought to bear on the public in other
Western democracies which have imported the capitalistic values, ‘public
relations’ industry and marketing techniques that remain so prevalent in
the United States. Here in the UK, the hijacking of government policies
by powerful groups such as the Confederation of British Industry
receives minimal media coverage. But then, why expect corporate media to
expose the dubious activities of itself and its allies in the business
world, or its corporate sources of vital advertising revenue?

Mark Curtis has noted that the primary function of the British state,
‘virtually its raison d’être for several centuries – is to aid British
companies in getting their hands on other countries’ resources.’ The
British security services have an important role to play too in support
of ‘the national interest’: ‘As Lord Mackay, then Lord Chancellor,
revealed in the mid-1990s, the role of MI6 is to protect Britain’s
“economic well-being” by keeping “a particular eye on Britain’s access
to key commodities, like oil or metals [and] the profits of Britain’s
myriad of international business interests.”’⁶⁵

The above observations, then, point towards the actual but unreported
nature of ‘democracy’ in countries where, like the UK, state power and
business power operate in tandem, systematically fighting tooth and nail
against any serious public challenge. This is the hidden history and the
missing context from news reporting on the Power Inquiry, or protests at
international summits of businesses and politicians, or the current
Occupy Movement that has taken roots in towns and cities across the
world. The real reasons for the public’s ongoing disenchantment with
politicians, the banking sector and powerful corporations are not to be
scrutinised too closely.

For example, not much scepticism is ever expressed in news coverage
about the supposed central importance of ‘democracy’ in explaining
Washington’s deep interests in other countries’ affairs. Thomas
Carothers, director of the Democracy and Rule of Law Project at the
Carnegie Endowment, found a ‘strong line of continuity’ running through
all US administrations in the post-Cold War era: ‘Where democracy
appears to fit in well with US security and economic interests, the
United States promotes democracy. Where democracy clashes with other
significant interests, it is downplayed or even ignored.’⁶⁶

Noam Chomsky has expressed succinctly the underlying problem for genuine
democracy, even in so-called ‘free’ societies: ‘Remember, any state, any
state, has a primary enemy: its own population.’⁶⁷ No wonder the
shocking depth and historic extent of the systemic corruption of
democracy by big business and its political allies remains off the
agenda of the corporate media. Corporate-employed reporters and
commentators have mastered the art of not making painful connections;
painful for powerful interests, that is. No wonder, too, that our major
political parties offer no real choice: they all represent essentially
the same interests crushing any moves towards meaningful public
participation in the shaping of policy; towards genuine concern for all
members of society, particularly the weak and the vulnerable.

Much of the public recognises all this; opinion polls indicate the
distrust they feel for politicians and business leaders, as well as the
journalists who all too frequently channel uncritical reporting on
politics and business. A 2009 survey by the polling company Ipsos MORI
found that only 13 per cent of the British public trust politicians to
tell the truth: the lowest rating in 25 years. These results, in the
wake of the scandal over MPs’ expenses, was ‘a blow to all three party
leaders’ determination to restore public faith in Westminster’s elected
representatives,’ said a Guardian report. (‘Restoring public faith in
elected politicians’ is, of course, crucial to steadying the boat; it
wouldn’t do to encourage any real shakeup.) Business leaders were
trusted by just 25 per cent of the public, while journalists languished
at 22 per cent.⁶⁸

As we have seen in this book so far, then, the public is both detached
from, and disillusioned about, the setting of priorities in state and
business policy planning. For journalists and ‘mainstream’ commentators
generally, the absolute scandal of poverty, for example, and the massive
military budget belong in separate compartments of thought. Woe betide
anyone who should look at one, and then the other, and wonder aloud
whether state policy is, in fact, societal madness.

Instead, consider the possibility that the state does not act out of
benign motives, or in blundering attempts to do good; that, in fact, the
governments of the US, the UK and their allies are responsible for mass
slaughter and suffering in one country after another. At root we need to
question whether the state, as an institution wedded to power, is even
capable of consistently pursuing policies that are rooted in
rationality, humanity and compassion. And if not, what are we, the
people, going to do about it?


Endless Echoes

 

  It is my opinion that the use of this barbarous weapon at Hiroshima
  and Nagasaki was of no material assistance in our war against Japan.
  The Japanese were already defeated and ready to surrender… My own
  feeling was that in being the first to use it, we had adopted an
  ethical standard common to the barbarians of the Dark Ages.

  US Admiral William D. Leahy¹

 

One of the major events of the twentieth century, with reverberations
that reach today, was the dropping of the atomic bomb on Japan by the
United States in 1945. The top officials who ran the Manhattan Project,
the US-led programme that developed the atomic bomb, warned President
Harry S. Truman before the bomb was used: ‘The world in its present
state of moral advancement compared with its technical development would
be eventually at the mercy of such a weapon. In other words, modern
civilization might be completely destroyed.’²

Many people, and I am one of them, believe that the moral
‘justification’ of using the atomic bomb in the Second World War, and
the threatened use of nuclear weapons in succeeding decades, has no
basis in civilised society. But what about the conventional argument
that the two atomic bombs dropped on Japan did, nonetheless, bring about
the end of the war? I was confronted with this view in a compelling and
personal way when I was a student at Glasgow University. One of my
friends there was, like me, studying physics and astronomy. I used to
visit him quite often at his parents’ home where he still lived. (I was
still living at home, too; not unusual for students in the west of
Scotland.) His father had been in the Royal Navy and during the war had
been serving in the Pacific. He told me personally that he was convinced
that he owed his life, as did many others, to the atomic bombs; because
they were dropped no costly invasion of Japan was required to end the
war. That is certainly the view presented in history lessons and
propagated to this day in the media. But how accurate is it?

The first atomic bomb was dropped on Hiroshima on 6 August 1945 and the
second on Nagasaki three days later. Soviet armed forces invaded
Japanese-occupied Manchuria on 8 August. On 15 August, Emperor Hirohito
announced the surrender of Japan in a radio address to the nation.

Broadly speaking, there are three different schools of thought as to why
the US government used the bomb. We may refer to these as the orthodox,
the revisionist, and the neo-orthodox or anti-revisionist schools.

Orthodox historians argue that dropping the atomic bombs was necessary
and justified because this led directly to Japan’s surrender, thus
saving millions of American and Japanese lives that would have been
otherwise lost during the US invasion of Japan, planned to begin on 1
November 1945. Revisionists disagree. The bombing was neither necessary
nor justified, they say; Japan had already been comprehensively
defeated. Some revisionists even argue that the United States used the
bombs to intimidate the Soviet Union and thereby help boost its own
strategic strength in the post-WWII world.

In recent years, anti-revisionists have challenged the revisionist view
and argued, as did the original orthodox historians, that the bomb was
used to end the Pacific War by directly prompting Japan’s surrender.
They contend that the Soviet entry into the war against Japan played a
minor role in surrender, and certainly less than the decisive ‘shock’
factor of the bombs.

The above is necessarily a sketchy summary but captures the essence of
divergent views on the end of the Pacific War. In this chapter, I intend
to show that while there continues to be vibrant, sometimes heated,
debate among historians, the revisionist view most closely accords with
the evidence.

Racing the Enemy

Western historians debating the reasons for the end of the war have
focused heavily on the US ‘decision’ to drop the atomic bomb.³ But there
has been relatively little attention devoted to the deliberations among
the Japanese wartime ruling elite which led to surrender. Even less is
known about Soviet decision-making and the Soviet entry into the Pacific
War against Japan.

A stumbling block until recently has been that no historian has been
sufficiently fluent in English, Japanese and Russian to investigate the
primary archival material – including internal government documents,
military reports and intelligence intercepts – in all three languages.
This partly explains why historical debate in the West has been so
focused on the Truman administration’s motives and policy-making: this,
after all, could be pursued on the basis of English-language material.
For example, in 1965, revisionist historian Gar Alperovitz published an
influential book, Atomic Diplomacy, in which he argued that use of the
atomic bombs was militarily unnecessary and was intended as a show of US
strength against Soviet power. There has been furious debate about this
ever since.⁴

In 1995, Alperovitz published The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, a
comprehensive and hugely detailed work of scholarship. A key argument in
the book is that the Americans feared the emergence of a state-run
Soviet bloc in Central and Eastern Europe. President Truman relied
heavily on the advice of James Byrnes whom he would later appoint as his
Secretary of State. On 28 May 1945, Byrnes met with three scientists to
discuss atomic bomb-related issues at his home in Spartanburg, South
Carolina. One of the scientists, Leo Szilard, subsequently reported that
‘Mr. Byrnes was much concerned about the spreading of Russian influence
in Europe,’ and that Byrnes’s view was ‘that our possessing and
demonstrating the bomb would make Russia more manageable in Europe.’⁵

In 2005, Tsuyoshi Hasegawa, a professor of history at the University of
California at Santa Barbara, published a landmark study, Racing The
Enemy: Stalin, Truman, and the Surrender of Japan.⁶ Hasegawa, born and
raised in Japan but now a US citizen, appraised the trilateral wartime
relationships between the United States, the Soviet Union and Japan. His
study has been critically acclaimed and has generated considerable
debate. Barton Bernstein, professor of history at Stanford University
and one of the world’s foremost commentators on atomic bomb issues,
warmly praised the book as ‘formidable,’ ‘a major volume in
international history’ and ‘a truly impressive accomplishment, meriting
prizes and accolades.’⁷ The book has also delivered a huge jolt to
anti-revisionists.

So why the title, Racing the Enemy? The reason is as follows. At the
1945 Potsdam meeting of the three major allies (the US, Soviet Union and
the UK), the Soviet leader Joseph Stalin had given Truman a date for the
Soviet attack on Japan: 15 August 1945. If the US was to force Japan to
surrender without Soviet help, and thus avoid making any geostrategic
concessions to its ostensible ally, it would have to do so before that
date.

Hasegawa takes up the story of the ‘race’: ‘The only remaining factor
was the atomic bomb. Contrary to historians’ claim that Truman had no
intention to use the atomic bomb as a diplomatic weapon against the
Soviet Union, it is hard to ignore the fact that the Soviets figured
into Truman’s calculations. The date for the Soviet attack made it all
the more imperative for the United States to drop the bomb in the
beginning of August, before the Soviets entered the war. The race
between Soviet entry into the war and the atomic bomb now reached its
climax.’⁸

Hasegawa’s diligent research has strengthened the revisionist challenge
to the orthodox view that the atomic bombs delivered decisive blows to
Japan’s will to fight, and resulted in surrender. He cautions:
‘Americans still cling to the myth that the atomic bombs dropped on
Hiroshima and Nagasaki provided the knockout punch to the Japanese
government. The decision to use the bomb saved not only American
soldiers but also the Japanese, according to this narrative. The myth
serves to justify Truman’s decision and ease the collective American
conscience.’

Hasegawa shows that ‘this myth cannot be supported by historical facts.
Evidence makes clear that there were alternatives to the use of the
bomb, alternatives that the Truman administration for reasons of its own
declined to pursue.’⁹

The Real Meaning of the Potsdam Proclamation

In order to more fully understand the nature of the ‘race’¹⁰ between the
Soviet Union to enter the Pacific war and the American dropping of the
atomic bomb, we need to go back to the Potsdam Proclamation issued by
the leaders of the United States, the United Kingdom and China¹¹ on 26
July 1945. This set out the terms for ‘the unconditional surrender of
all Japanese armed forces.’ If the terms were not met, Japan would be
faced with ‘prompt and utter destruction.’

Hasegawa, as well as other historians, argue that Truman was deeply
worried that Stalin would shortly enter the war in the Pacific region
against Japan and make important strategic gains in Asia, thus posing a
threat to American interests. Alperovitz draws attention to the fear
shared by US officials of Soviet strategic designs on the Far East. He
quotes a memorandum by Joseph Grew, Under-Secretary of State: ‘Once
Russia is in the war against Japan, then Mongolia, Manchuria, and Korea
will gradually slip into Russia’s orbit, to be followed in due course by
China and eventually Japan.’¹² Averell Harriman, US Ambassador to the
Soviet Union, even raised the spectre of hundreds of millions of
marching Chinese soldiers if Russia made an early entry into the Pacific
War. ‘[I]f China continued weak,’ he argued, ‘Russian influence would
move in quickly and toward ultimate domination… [T]here could be no
illusion about anything such as a ‘free China’ once the Russians got in…
the two or three hundred millions in that country would march when the
Kremlin ordered.’¹³

How could the US force Japan’s surrender before the Soviets made such
gains? The atomic bomb provided a solution to the dilemma that
confronted Truman. To trigger Japan’s unconditional surrender before the
Soviet Union could enter the Pacific war, argues Hasegawa, Truman issued
the Potsdam Proclamation. This was intended not as a warning to Japan,
but to justify the use of the atomic bomb. Alperovitz argues strongly
that Byrnes was responsible for advising Truman to remove explicit
assurances for the Japanese Emperor from the Potsdam Proclamation.¹⁴ At
this point it is crucially important to recall that the Japanese people
revered the Emperor as a living god. He stood at the pinnacle of power:
political, legislative, executive, cultural, religious and military.
Indeed, the Emperor embodied the very essence of Japan. Hence his
fundamental importance, for the Japanese, to the surrender terms.

The standard history is that Japan’s rejection of the Potsdam
Proclamation led to the US decision to drop the bomb. Hasegawa notes
bluntly that this myth, too, ‘cannot be supported by the facts.’¹⁵
Truman wrote that he issued the order to drop the bomb after Japan
rejected the Proclamation. The truth is quite the opposite, however: the
order to drop the atomic bomb was given to General Carl Spaatz,
commander of the US Army Strategic Air Forces, on the morning of 25
July. The Proclamation was not issued until the evening of 26 July.
Japan’s supposed rejection of the Potsdam Proclamation was required to
justify the dropping of the bomb.¹⁶

Although Japan had not yet agreed to surrender, its rulers had already
seen defeat staring it in the face as early as February 1945. In a
careful account of events leading up to the atomic bombing, historian
Peter Kuznick cites the Pacific Strategic Intelligence Summary for the
week of the Potsdam meeting: ‘[I]t may be said that Japan now,
officially if not publicly, recognizes her defeat. Abandoning as
unobtainable the long-cherished goal of victory, she has turned to the
twin aims of (a) reconciling national pride with defeat, and (b) finding
the best means of salvaging the wreckage of her ambitions.’¹⁷

Colonel Charles Bonesteel, chief of the War Department Operations
Division Policy Section, recalled: ‘the poor damn Japanese were putting
feelers out by the ton so to speak, through Russia.’¹⁸ Allen Dulles of
the Office of Strategic Services (precursor to the CIA) briefed Henry
Stimson, the US Secretary of War, at Potsdam. Dulles wrote: ‘On July 20,
1945, under instructions from Washington, I went to the Potsdam
Conference and reported there to Secretary Stimson on what I had learned
from Tokyo – they desired to surrender if they could retain the Emperor
and the constitution as a basis for maintaining discipline and order in
Japan after the devastating news of surrender became known to the
Japanese people.’¹⁹

President Truman and Byrnes, his closest adviser, must have known that
Japan was putting out feelers to end the war. This can be seen in
Truman’s 18 July 1945 diary entry referring to ‘the telegram from the
Jap Emperor asking [the Soviets to mediate] for peace.’ There is also a
diary entry dated 3 August, when Truman and his delegation were crossing
the North Atlantic to attend the Potsdam meeting, by Walter Brown,
Byrnes’s assistant, who noted, “Aboard Augusta/ President, Leahy, JFB
[Byrnes] agrred [sic] Japas [sic] looking for peace.”²⁰

Byrnes publicly admitted this when he spoke to the press shortly after
the end of the war. The New York Times reported on 29 August 1945 that
Byrnes ‘cited what he called Russian proof that the Japanese knew that
they were beaten before the first atomic bomb was dropped on
Hiroshima.’²¹ Kuznick notes that similar comments were made by Secretary
of the Navy James Forrestal, Assistant Secretary of War John McCloy and
Secretary of War Stimson, showing how widespread was this realization.
Kuznick adds: ‘But, at Potsdam, when Stimson tried to persuade Truman to
alter his approach and provide assurances on the emperor in the Potsdam
Proclamation, Truman told his elderly Secretary of War that, if he did
not like the way things were going, he could pack his bags and return
home.’²²

When the official Potsdam Papers were published in 1960, it was revealed
that Truman had been fully aware of key Japanese intelligence messages,
just as he had privately confirmed to State Department interviewers four
years earlier.²³

In short, as Hasegawa says: ‘Justifying Hiroshima and Nagasaki by making
a historically unsustainable argument that the atomic bombs ended the
war is no longer tenable.’²⁴

Crucial Questions About Truman Left Unanswered

In 2007, on the 62^(nd) anniversary of the atomic bombing of Hiroshima,
the Guardian published a comment piece from an anti-revisionist
viewpoint claiming that: ‘New historical research […] lends powerful
support to the traditionalist interpretation of the decision to drop the
bomb… Sadao Asada [a Japanese historian] has shown from primary sources
that the dropping of both bombs was crucial in strengthening the
position of those within the Japanese Government who wished to sue for
peace.’

While acknowledging the terrible nature of the bombing, the article
claimed that there is ‘a high degree of probability that abjuring the
bomb would have caused greater suffering still.’²⁵ This, to say the
least, was a highly contentious assertion.²⁶ Indeed, the article’s
perspective was reliant on the work of anti-revisionist historians such
as Robert Maddox, Robert Newman, Michael Kort, Sadao Asada and D. M.
Giangreco.²⁷ Giangreco is a military historian based at the US Army
Command and General Staff College at Fort Leavenworth, Kansas. He is an
advocate of the ‘high-estimate casualties’ thesis: the argument that
hundreds of thousands, perhaps more than a million, American lives would
have been lost in Operation Olympic, the invasion of Japan that was
scheduled for 1 November 1945.

I contacted Tsuyoshi Hasegawa, author of Racing the Enemy, and pointed
out the above arguments. Hasegawa responded: ‘I am familiar with the
criticisms raised by [anti-revisionists]. Their line of arguments are
very similar.’ Not only are they similar, but they have been refuted by
serious historians including Bernstein, Alperovitz and Hasegawa himself.
Significantly, Hasegawa noted that the US anti-revisionists do not read
Japanese, and therefore have to ‘rely exclusively on Asada to make their
judgement on the crucial question: how the atomic bombings and the
Soviet entry influence[d] the Japanese decision to surrender.’²⁸

As we have seen, Hasegawa addressed this question rigorously in Racing
the Enemy and demonstrated from archival sources that the Soviet entry
had the larger, indeed, decisive shock impact on Japan’s leaders. In The
End of the Pacific War: Reappraisals, published in 2007 and edited by
Hasegawa, he marshals further evidence for his argument in an incisive
chapter that includes additional powerful analysis of Japanese-language
documents, and rebuts Sadao Asada comprehensively. Hasegawa notes, for
example, that telegrams between Foreign Minister Togo and the Japanese
ambassador Sato in the Soviet Union show that Japan was clinging to the
hope that the termination of the war was possible and desirable through
Moscow’s mediation. The Soviet Union and Japan had signed a Neutrality
Pact in 1941 which Japan hoped to utilise to bring about favourable
terms to end the war. This was the position that Togo had adhered to
since the Allies had issued the Potsdam Proclamation on 26 July 1945.
The Hiroshima bomb on 6 August did not change this policy, as is clear
from Japanese archival documents. Indeed, from these primary sources,
Hasegawa has shown that the Japanese ruling elite pinned their hopes
even more desperately on Moscow’s mediation after the Hiroshima bomb.

Hasegawa has studied closely the original-language testimony of Japan’s
military leaders in particular, and presented numerous examples which
reinforce the view that their shock at Soviet entry into the Pacific War
was significantly more than when the atomic bombs were dropped. As the
Japanese Army Ministry stated categorically shortly after the war: ‘The
Soviet participation in the war had the most direct impact on Japan’s
decision to surrender.’²⁹

Hasegawa notes that: ‘Asada ignores all this overwhelming evidence that
stresses the importance of the Soviet entry into the war.’³⁰ And he
concludes reasonably: ‘My major criticisms to those who claim that
Truman had no choice but to use the A-bomb in order to save lives is: If
that is so, why did he consciously avoid two alternatives available to
him that might have hastened Japan’s surrender: (1) to assure Soviet
entry into the war; and (2) to revise the unconditional surrender demand
in such a way to assure the retention of the emperor system? My critics
do not answer these crucial questions.’³¹

‘Deeply Flawed’ Casualty Claims

The likely number of Allied, and Japanese, lives that would have been
lost in the planned invasion of Japan can, of course, never be known
with certainty. Moreover, any number would arguably be ‘too high’ and
wholly regrettable. However, it is known that the predicted number of US
combat deaths in the planned invasion escalated enormously among
pro-bomb commentators from the US War Department’s 1945 prediction of
46,000 dead. In 1955, Truman insisted that General George Marshall
feared losing a half million American lives. Secretary of War Stimson
made a claim of over one million casualties (dead, wounded and missing)
in 1947. And, in 1991, President George H.W. Bush defended Truman’s
‘tough calculating decision, [which] spared millions of American lives.’
In 1995, a crew member on Bock’s Car, the plane that bombed Nagasaki,
asserted that the bombing saved six million lives – one million
Americans and five million Japanese.³²

Michael Kort, like D. M. Giangreco, is an advocate of this
‘high-estimate casualties’ viewpoint. In 2003, Kort published a piece
titled ‘Casualty Projections for the Invasion of Japan, Phantom
Estimates, and the Math of Barton Bernstein.’³³ This was an attempted
rebuttal of the work of Bernstein, mentioned above, whose careful study
of the evidence had led him to reject projections of casualties at the
high end of the scale favoured by orthodox and anti-revisionist
historians. Bernstein responded³⁴ to Kort in a piece that, Hasegawa told
me, ‘completely demolishes’³⁵ the high-estimate claims of a million
casualties or more.

Bernstein argued, with numerous examples, that the anti-revisionist
Kort: ‘relies upon strained readings, omission of crucial material,
severely limited research, unfair and facile resolution of complicated
matters, and invidious language and interpretations. He also mixes large
issues with trivial ones and neglects relevant archival sources and much
of the published work upon the casualty issue. Finally, he has serious
problems with quoting accurately, revealing fundamental problems as a
craftsman.’ This was devastating enough, but Bernstein also showed that
Kort ‘often fails to delve deeply enough into issues,’ displays
‘remarkable carelessness’ and, in summary, has produced a ‘deeply flawed
essay [that] seldom, if ever, meets the standards for serious,
responsible academic discourse.’

In a separate article, Bernstein turned to Giangreco, the military
historian already mentioned: ‘For a deeply flawed recent article which
strains in interpreting sources, makes dubious connections, uncritically
and self-servingly uses post-Hiroshima recollections, briefly makes a
factually incorrect claim for newness, and avoids some earlier contrary
scholarship, see D.M. Giangreco, “‘A Score of Bloody Okinawas and Iwo
Jimas’: President Truman and Casualty Estimates for the Invasion of
Japan,” Pacific Historical Review 72 (February 2003): 93-132.’³⁶

This ‘deeply flawed’ analysis by Giangreco underpins repeated assertions
of projected high casualties.³⁷ By contrast, J. Samuel Walker, chief
historian of the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, a conservative
source of pro-nuclear opinion, notes: ‘It is certain that the hoary
claim that the bomb prevented one-half million American combat deaths is
unsupportable.’³⁸

Careful historians do not deny that Truman was concerned at the prospect
of many US lives being lost in an invasion of Japan, but the predicted
numbers were far less than the inflated figures provided postwar to
‘justify’ the atomic bombings. Such figures, along with Japan’s alleged
‘rejection’ of the Potsdam Proclamation, form key elements of the
conventional narrative that the atomic bombs were sadly necessary.
Walker writes that: ‘It is clear that alternatives to the bomb existed
and that Truman and his advisers knew it.’³⁹

Hasegawa concurs: ‘Evidence makes clear that there were alternatives to
the use of the bomb, alternatives that the Truman administration for
reasons of its own declined to pursue. And it is here, in the evidence
of roads not taken, that the question of moral responsibility comes to
the fore. Until his death, Truman continually came back to this question
and repeatedly justified his decision, inventing a fiction that he
himself came to believe. That he spoke so often to justify his actions
shows how much his decision to use the bomb haunted him.’⁴⁰

What Compelled the Japanese Surrender?

The United States Strategic Bombing Survey, based on postwar interviews
with hundreds of Japanese military and civilian leaders, concluded that
Japan would have surrendered before 1 November 1945, the date set for a
US invasion of Japan, without the atomic bombs and without Soviet entry
into the war. For years, this conclusion gave credence to the arguments
of revisionist historians who stated that the atomic bombs were not
necessary for Japan’s surrender.

However, some historians, notably Bart Bernstein, have argued that the
survey’s conclusion is not supported by its own evidence. Bernstein has
shown that the evidence is, in places, contradictory and cautions that
the Survey is ‘an unreliable guide.’⁴¹ For example, Prince Konoe
Fumimaro, Hirohito’s envoy to Moscow, had stated in his postwar
interrogation that the war would probably have gone on throughout 1945
(i.e. beyond the anticipated US invasion date of 1 November) if the
atomic bomb had not been dropped on Japan.

Although Bernstein concluded that Paul Nitze, author of the Survey, had
been ‘far too optimistic about a pre-November surrender,’ Bernstein
sought to address Nitze’s counterfactual assertion that Japan would
‘certainly’ have surrendered without the A-bombing, Soviet entrance into
the war, or modified surrender terms allowing an emperor-as-figurehead
system. The use of ‘certainly,’ concluded Bernstein, was an exaggerated
judgement. However, as Hasegawa has demonstrated, the Soviet entry into
the Pacific war was a massive shock to Japanese leaders; Japan was still
strenuously seeking Moscow’s help to bring about an end to the war.⁴²
Given the huge impact of Soviet entry into the war, Bernstein’s view is
that under heavy US bombing and the Allied air-naval blockade that was
strangling the country, it was ‘far more likely than not’ that Japan
would have surrendered before any invasion. Bernstein rues the serious
‘missed opportunity’ to avoid the costly invasion of Japan without
dropping the atomic bomb by awaiting Soviet entry into the war.⁴³

In any case, Gar Alperovitz notes that ‘the issue of the accuracy of the
Strategic Bombing Survey is quite secondary’ to the decisive impact of
the Soviet entry into the war.⁴⁴ As mentioned earlier, Alperovitz’s 1995
book, The Decision to Use the Bomb, extensively updated the revisionist
arguments of his classic book, Atomic Diplomacy, thirty years earlier.
Alperovitz, in common with many other historians, has welcomed
Hasegawa’s groundbreaking research and is impressed by Hasegawa’s
ability to draw diligently and exhaustively from primary archival
sources in English, Japanese and Russian. For instance, one of the
important subjects dealt with by Hasegawa is the Japanese intelligence
communications which were intercepted and decoded by the Americans. As
mentioned above, these so-called Magic intercepts revealed that leading
Japanese figures, including Foreign Minister Togo, were contemplating
the Potsdam Proclamation as the basis of surrender terms. Truman, Byrnes
and Stimson were likely ‘paying close attention to the Magic intercepts
to see Japan’s reaction to the Proclamation.’

As Hasegawa observes of the US wartime leadership: ‘If they wanted
Japan’s surrender at a minimal cost in American lives, if they wished to
prevent Soviet entry into the war, and if they wanted to avoid the use
of the atomic bomb, as they claimed in their postwar memoirs, why did
they ignore the information obtained by the Magic intercepts? […] one
cannot escape the conclusion that the United States rushed to drop the
bomb without any attempt to explore the readiness of some Japanese
policymakers to seek peace through the ultimatum.’⁴⁵ Truman, argues
Hasegawa, ‘was bent on avenging the humiliation of Pearl Harbor by
imposing on the enemy unconditional surrender.’⁴⁶

Peter Kuznick notes that: ‘highlighting the decisive role of atomic
bombs in the final victory […] served American propaganda needs by
diminishing the significance of Soviet entry into the Pacific War,
discounting the Soviet contribution to defeating Japan, and showcasing
the super weapon that the United States alone possessed.’⁴⁷

Based on careful analysis of Japanese archives, Hasegawa emphasises that
although the Hiroshima bomb ‘heightened the sense of urgency to seek the
termination of the war, [it] did not prompt the Japanese government to
take any immediate action that repudiated the previous policy of seeking
Moscow’s mediation.’ Moreover, Hasegawa has found no evidence to show
that the Hiroshima bomb led either Foreign Minister Togo or Emperor
Hirohito to accept the Potsdam terms. In this respect, the effect of the
second bomb on Nagasaki was ‘negligible.’ Even the suggestion by Japan’s
Army Minister Anami Korechika that ‘the United States had more than 100
[sic] atomic bombs and planned to bomb Tokyo next did not change the
opinions of either the peace party or the war party [factions within the
Japanese leadership] at all.’⁴⁸ The decisive event that changed the
views of the Japanese ruling elite was the Soviet entry into the war.
This ‘catapulted the Japanese government into taking immediate action.
For the first time, it forced the government squarely to confront the
issue of whether it should accept the Potsdam terms.’⁴⁹

Hasegawa does not deny completely the effect of the atomic bomb on
Japan’s policymakers. Koichi Kido, Emperor Hirohito’s most trusted
advisor, stated after the war that the atomic bomb helped to tip the
balance in favour of the peace party within the Japanese ruling elite.
However, on the basis of the extensive archival evidence Hasegawa has
gathered and critically appraised, he concludes that: ‘It would be more
accurate to say that the Soviet entry into the war, adding to that
tipped scale, then completely toppled the scale itself.’⁵⁰

The dropping of the atomic bombs, the Soviet entry into the Pacific War,
and the ending of the Second World War, will doubtless generate endless
historical research and debate. But the available evidence – in
particular, the thoroughly scrutinised archival collections in English,
Russian and Japanese – strongly suggests that the analysis of
revisionist historians is the one best supported by the facts.

Why, then, has the mythical standard narrative endured? Alperovitz
suggests a plausible explanation: ‘it would be very surprising indeed if
the widespread and continued belief in the mistaken notion that the
atomic bomb had been needed to prevent massive loss of life had simply
occurred without official encouragement and the denial of access to
contrary information.’⁵¹

As an example, consider the conclusions of Robert Messer, who carefully
examined the records left behind by James Byrnes, Truman’s trusted
adviser: ‘Byrnes’ efforts at manipulating history include his deliberate
editing, altering and at times even fabricating evidence of his past as
it is recorded in the documents and other manuscript sources […] Byrnes’
manipulation of his personal papers goes beyond the normal limits of
genteel dishonesty. Extensive research of these archival records leads
unavoidably to the conclusion that they have been systematically
doctored.’⁵² Alperovitz charges President Truman himself with deception:
‘Truman lied – directly, repeatedly, and without apparent hesitation –
about some of the most important aspects of the Hiroshima story.’⁵³

In Bomb Power, US historian Garry Wills argues that the atomic bomb
dramatically increased the power of the US presidency and redefined the
US government as a National Security State. This ‘profoundly altered the
nature of American democracy’ in a way that ‘has left us in a state of
war alert ever since.’ The US president controls the atomic ‘button’
and, thus, the fate of the world with no proper constitutional check.
The atomic bomb ‘also placed a stronger emphasis on the President’s
military role, creating a cult around the Commander in Chief’ that,
argues Wills, ‘has no precedent in American history.’⁵⁴

Finally, what really matters is the moral argument that there can be no
justification for the use, or threatened use, of nuclear arms.

The Nuclear Hammer Still Above Our Heads

While I was working on this book chapter, there were news reports of
President Obama’s declared commitment to a nuclear-free world. Around
the same time came a fanfare from Gordon Brown, then the prime minister,
to cut Britain’s complement of Trident nuclear submarines from four to
three. Meanwhile, the same political leaders were piling pressure on
Iran over its supposed nuclear ‘threat,’ ramping up the risk of yet
another war in the Middle East that might ignite global conflict.⁵⁵ The
press continued to play its customary role of serving state interests
and portraying ‘our’ leaders as well-intentioned men of peace. There are
so many examples I could cite, but take just one from the Independent
early in 2009.⁵⁶ The correspondent was Leonard Doyle, formerly the
paper’s foreign editor (and before that, foreign editor of the
Observer).

Doyle’s byline gave his location as ‘in Washington.’ But perhaps it
should have been ‘inside Obama’s head’ given that Doyle seemed to have
remarkable access to the president’s real hopes and motivations, rather
than what Obama professed. This is what Doyle wrote:

  ‘Mr Obama wants to turn the page…’
  ‘... the President hopes to set a new course…’
  ‘Mr Obama hopes the talks…’

 

But why would any serious journalist want to take the US president’s
supposed ‘hopes’ and stated agenda at face value? According to Doyle’s
report, which would have fitted snugly on the webpage for White House
press releases, Obama’s foreign policy really is driven by the desire
to:

-   have a ‘nuclear-free world’ with the ‘superpowers’ no longer relying
    on ‘nuclear weapons for protection.’
-   ‘to share the load in fighting climate change.’
-   to hold out ‘a sincere hand to Iran.’

These may be what Obama claims he wants; what he claims to be his
agenda. But anyone familiar with the longstanding thrust of Washington’s
policies and plans, regardless of who is President, knows that the
guiding imperative is for the US to be dominant in international
affairs; to maintain a grip of natural resources and ‘markets’ around
the world; and to achieve ‘full spectrum dominance’ of the air, sea,
land and space, including in nuclear weaponry. In short, the fundamental
US policy goal is to maintain global hegemony.

The chasm between government propaganda and harsh reality, between
stated and actual agendas, is the chasm into which all too many
‘unpeople’ have fallen: in Iraq, Afghanistan, Palestine, Kosovo,
Vietnam, and on and on. The public deserves, and expects, more
scepticism, more realism and more rational analysis from correspondents
‘in Washington’ and other seats of power. It is a dereliction of duty –
not just to journalism, but to humanity – to take professed state
imperatives at face value. Beneath the lofty rhetoric, the threat of
nuclear annihilation sadly remains. More than sixty-five years after
Hiroshima and Nagasaki, humanity still stands at the edge of the abyss.


The Madness of the Global Economy

 

  Capitalism lures us onward like the mechanical hare before the
  greyhounds, insisting that the economy is infinite and sharing
  therefore irrelevant. Just enough greyhounds catch a real hare now and
  then to keep the others running till they drop. In the past it was
  only the poor who lost this game; now it is the planet.

  Ronald Wright¹

 

A Sprinkling of Stardust Covering Ugly Realities

Watching the corporate media report the global financial crisis of
recent years has been instructive. From the perspective of power, it is
important that a steadying hand is applied to the tiller of news and
commentary on the crisis, as well as the global economy itself.

And so Martin Wolf, chief economics commentator of the Financial Times,
took an ostensibly measured view as the credit crunch hit hard in 2008.
There had been 100 ‘significant’ banking crises in the past thirty
years, he noted soothingly, making them sound almost routine.
Authorities have had to intervene to ‘rescue’ the US financial system
from four crises over that period: the developing country debt crisis as
well as the ‘savings and loan’ crisis of the 1980s; the commercial
property crisis of the early 1990s; and then the subprime and credit
crisis of 2007-2008. As Wolf observed correctly of the banking sector:
‘No industry has a comparable talent for privatising gains and
socialising losses.’²

Wolf’s big ‘fear,’ though, was that the crumbling financial system would
destroy ‘the political legitimacy of the market economy itself.’ Why
this ‘political legitimacy’ should not be challenged was left hanging in
the air. And what Wolf termed the ‘market economy’ is, as we will see,
an extreme variant of capitalism known as neoliberalism which is
massively subsidised and protected by powerful states. Again, all this
was left unsaid. Wolf turned instead to the relatively minor issue of
bankers’ pay which, he asserted, lay at the root of the problem: ‘By
paying huge bonuses on the basis of short-term performance […] banks
create gigantic incentives to disguise risk-taking as value-creation.’
Official intervention to regulate bankers’ remuneration is a ‘horrible’
solution. But the alternative, an endless series of financial crises, is
‘even worse.’

Wolf’s ‘solution,’ however, is hugely impractical. Defining a link
between bankers’ performance and remuneration would be immensely
difficult, involve unlikely international regulation of global markets
and require complex mechanisms to police. As this simply is not going to
happen in the current political climate, given the certain massive
resistance of financial interests, we can expect more crises to follow.

Over at The Times, another useful gauge of establishment thinking, the
title of one piece by Anatole Kaletsky summed up the required pacifying
message: ‘Relax. Our economy isn’t manic depressive.’ Happily, according
to Kaletsky’s ‘hunch,’ it would all turn out fine: ‘a combination of
monetary and fiscal easing, along with some regulatory changes […] will
lessen the credit crisis and prevent a world recession.’³ The message
was buoyant, but it was also superficial; and when world recession
ensued just months later, following the bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers in
September 2008, profoundly wrong.

With global meltdown imminent, the Independent’s economics commentator,
Hamish McRae, was pinning blame for the developing crisis simply on that
well-worn catch-all, ‘mistakes’: ‘Bankers, like the rest of us, make
mistakes, but the scale of the mistakes, particularly in US banks, has
been enormous. We won’t fully understand for some time quite how they
could persuade themselves that bundles of housing loans to clearly
uncredit-worthy borrowers should be ranked as almost as good as
government securities.’

The ‘legitimate question’ now, asserted McRae, is ‘whether the
continuing banking weakness has become so serious as to transfer what is
still a financial market problem into a more general economic problem.’
His reassuring conclusion? ‘Banking troubles will be a drag on the world
economy, slowing it down. But they won’t stop it in its tracks.’⁴

This would have been comforting news for the ‘masters of the universe’
who were then, in January 2008, meeting in Davos.⁵ The summit comprised
27 heads of state, 113 cabinet ministers, hundreds of chief executives,
bankers, fund managers, economists and journalists: about 2,500
participants in all. One of them, Sean O’Grady, the Independent’s
economics editor, was enthralled by the ‘concentrated, eclectic mix of
the top slice of humanity’ that ‘is part of the “magic” of this mountain
redoubt’; all twinkling under a ‘sprinkling of stardust’ brought upon
proceedings by the likes of U2 frontman Bono. The stardust was clearly
affecting O’Grady’s vision when he proposed that we should rely on
Western political and corporate leaders to ‘balance the needs and
aspirations of the old economies of the West, the emerging economies of
the east and the still poor billions in the south.’⁶

In the Guardian’s comment pages there was at least a glimmer of dissent
from columnist Jonathan Freedland. ‘Turbo-capitalism is not just
unfair,’ he wrote, ‘it is dishonest and dangerous.’ He pleaded: ‘surely
this is the moment when Labour and the centre-left can dare to question
the neoliberal dogma that has prevailed since the days of Thatcher.’ Any
hope that the then Labour government would step in to challenge
neoliberalism was seriously misguided, given its egregious record in
expanding Thatcherism after the party came to power in 1997. Freedland’s
dissection was limited at best, timidly suggesting that ‘you could
argue’ that ‘capitalism is always […] parasitical on the state.’ What he
sought was a kinder, gentler form of capitalism instead of the
‘turbo-capitalism’ which is happy to rely ‘on us, the public, and our
instrument, the state, when it gets in trouble.’ Thin on details, he
concluded weakly: ‘Now we should demand a say the rest of the time,
too.’⁷

The Masters of the Universe Cling to Power

Financial and political elites are at pains to convince the public that
they, the masters of the universe, can get things ‘back on track’ by
tweaking interest rates, ‘stimulating’ the economy and only infrequently
having to intervene to make a heroic ‘rescue.’ Thus, although the
occasional financial crisis cannot be prevented, just as a flu virus
might afflict a healthy body the economy itself is proclaimed to be
‘inherently strong,’ in the deluded words of then President Bush.⁸ The
assertion became unsustainable when the collapse of Lehman Brothers
triggered a crisis for capitalism. Drastic action was now required to
save the system. And so powerful bankers and several US Treasury
officials, including the Treasury Secretary himself (a past president of
Goldman Sachs), got together and then ‘emerged from a conference room
with a three-page document demanding a $700 billion bail-out of the
banking system while threatening Armageddon in the markets,’ noted
social theorist David Harvey. ‘It seemed like Wall Street had launched a
financial coup against the government and the people of the United
States. A few weeks later, with caveats here and there and a lot of
rhetoric, Congress and then President George Bush caved in and the money
was sent flooding off, without any controls whatsoever, to all those
financial institutions deemed “too big to fail.”’⁹

The initial $700 billion US ‘bailout’ plan was followed by further huge
instalments of the ‘rescue package.’ In the real world, many people at
the bottom of the heap lost homes, jobs and hope. By late 2008, it was
estimated that the US federal government had already spent $4.2 trillion
in response to the financial crisis. As George Monbiot noted, this sum
was more than the total spending on the Second World War when adjusted
for inflation.¹⁰ Around the world, governments transferred huge sums of
public money into shoring up the crumbling financial system. The sums
just kept getting bigger. In 2012, John Pilger reported that ‘America is
now a land of epidemic poverty and barbaric prisons – the consequence of
a “market” extremism that, under Obama, has prompted the transfer of $14
trillion in public money to criminal enterprises in Wall Street.’¹¹ As
for Britain: ‘In David Cameron’s “big society,” the theft of £84 billion
in jobs and services exceeds even the amount of tax “legally” avoided by
piratical corporations. Blame rests not with the far right, but with a
cowardly liberal political culture that has allowed this to happen…’

British economist Harry Shutt explained that ‘too big to fail’ actually
means that the tiny clique of the very wealthy recognise that they risk
losing vast fortunes if the markets are allowed to take their course
free of intervention from the state. Wholesale nationalisation of
insolvent banks would have posed an existential threat to elite power,
or even led to the collapse of the capitalist profits system in its
entirety. Rather than accept such a fate, rich investors tried to ensure
that their toxic assets were ‘largely transferred to the state, thereby
adding unimaginable sums – officially estimated at $18 trillion
world-wide – to already excessive public debt.’¹²

This was a dangerous situation for elite interests who always need to
present themselves as being in charge of events or, at least, capable of
righting the ship. To emphasise a recurring theme of this book: the
illusion of benign control and competence is vital, and a basic
requirement for the maintenance of powerful authority to prevail over a
potentially troublesome, perhaps even a rebellious, civic multitude.
Public anger at the banks and financial institutions, even at the
capitalist system itself, was refocused, in large part by media
script-making, towards those individuals who were the visible face of a
‘greedy’ industry: ‘fat cats’ such as Fred Goodwin who resigned as chief
executive of Royal Bank of Scotland just before it was announced that
the bank’s losses in 2008 totalled £24.1 billion. Goodwin was roundly
condemned for clinging on to his massive £700,000 annual pension despite
presiding over the largest annual loss in UK corporate history. It
appeared that he was legally entitled to his massive pension, however,
and government criticism of Goodwin served little purpose other than an
attempt to divert public scrutiny from its own culpability.¹³ A
political response to the wider crisis was still required, however; even
if it was only nice words to try to pacify the voters. Thus, as a new
year dawned, then prime minister Gordon Brown claimed that 2008 would be
remembered as the year in which ‘the old era of unbridled free market
dogma was finally ushered out.’¹⁴

It was, of course, all nonsense. And Brown surely paid the price when an
unconvinced electorate withdrew its support for a Labour government at
the May 2010 general election.¹⁵ The new Tory-Liberal Democrat coalition
thereafter continued the neoliberal mission, with appalling attacks on
public services, pensions and the welfare state. At the same time, the
government – it matters little who is in power – continued the age-old
tradition of trying to shore up public confidence in an unjust,
crisis-riven financial and economic system. Such political machinations
were supplemented reliably by an establishment corps of business and
economics journalists. For example, one Sunday Times article cited
approvingly the views of Jim O’Neill, chief economist at Goldman Sachs,
one of the architects of the global recession. In a note to clients,
titled ‘Why the World is Better Than You Think,’ O’Neill tried to allay
fears that the collapse of financial markets had made the world seem a
‘scary place.’ It was not so bad; in fact, ‘global recovery’ was already
underway. The article then quoted a hedge fund manager proclaiming
‘massively good profits in the US,’ and beaming that ‘emerging markets
[in Brazil, India and elsewhere] are still booming.’ The article’s
propaganda message boiled down to ‘positive fundamentals for the global
economy.’¹⁶

All the media samples we’ve seen so far in this chapter are indicative
of the narrow spectrum of permitted corporate and political opinion on
the financial and economic crisis. Viewpoints are heavily biased towards
the status quo, with only occasional fig leaves of mild dissent. This
spectrum of news reporting and commentary is systematically biased; it
avoids scrutiny of an economic system that is both fundamentally flawed
and stacked against the majority of humanity.

As Shutt notes, one of the most striking features of the ongoing crisis
is: ‘the uniformly superficial nature of the analysis of its causes
presented by mainstream observers, whether government officials,
academics or business representatives. Thus it is commonly stated that
the crisis was caused by a combination of imprudent investment by
bankers and others […] and unduly lax official regulation and
supervision of markets. Yet the obvious question begged by such
explanations – of how or why such a dysfunctional climate came to be
created – is never addressed in any serious fashion.’ Shutt continued:
‘The inescapable conclusion […] is that the crisis was the product of a
conscious process of facilitating ever greater risk of massive systemic
failure.’¹⁷

With a few ruffled feathers here and there, Western leaders and their
faithful retinue in the media and academia continue to deceive the
public about the global economic crisis and its root causes; because
profits and power demand it. Otherwise these elites run the serious risk
of a huge slump in public confidence in the current system and even in
what passes for democratic politics. As it turned out, the chair of the
prestigious US law firm Sullivan & Cromwell was not far off in his
prediction that ‘Wall Street, after getting billions of taxpayer
dollars, will emerge from the financial crisis looking much the same as
before markets collapsed.’ Indeed it was strengthened, as explained by
Simon Johnson, former chief economist of the IMF: ‘Throughout the
crisis, the [US] government has taken extreme care not to upset the
interests of the financial institutions, or to question the basic
outlines of the system that got us here.’ Moreover, the ‘elite business
interests… [who] played a central role in creating the crisis, making
ever-larger gambles, with the implicit backing of the government, until
the inevitable collapse… are now using their influence to prevent
precisely the sorts of reforms that are needed, and fast, to pull the
economy out of its nosedive’ while ‘the government seems helpless, or
unwilling to act against them.’ As Chomsky notes: this is ‘no surprise,
at least to those who remember their Adam Smith,’ and adds: ‘The outcome
was nicely captured by two adjacent front-page stories in the New York
Times, headlined “$3.4 Billion Profit at Goldman Revives Gilded Pay
Packages” and “In Recession, a Bleaker Path for Workers to Slog.”’¹⁸

Boom and Bust

Despite the huge scale of yet another financial crisis, and the severe
global economic recession that followed, the major political parties and
elite media still refuse to address seriously even the possibility of
fundamental weaknesses and inequality at the very heart of modern
capitalism. In reality, the current system, driven by private profit far
beyond environmental sanity, is incapable of meeting the needs and
aspirations of humanity.

The inherently unstable and destructive behaviour of capitalism derives
from its inevitable cycles of ‘boom and bust.’ We can see this in both
theory and practice. Bear in mind that corporations operate for the
primary benefit of their shareholders, as demanded by company law.¹⁹ The
priority of shareholders is to maximise profits. The capital that they
invest must increase in value to justify the risk undertaken; demand for
products and services thus needs to expand. The profits gained, or part
of them, can then be reinvested to generate further profit.

But the process is unsustainable because markets become saturated. So
intense competition impels producers to drive down costs, especially
labour, to make or defend profits. As profits become squeezed, and
dividend-hungry shareholders threaten to take their investment
elsewhere, producers become desperate to push up total sales. They pump
out ever greater volumes of commodities and spend billions on
advertising to boost demand. Inevitably, the flood of commodities
surpasses the capacity of the market to absorb products: people can only
buy so much ‘stuff.’ Sales collapse, unemployment rises and a full-blown
recession ensues: this is the ‘bust’ part of the cycle. Surplus
productive capacity then has to be destroyed before a new ‘boom’ can
begin.²⁰

That is the basic theory, worked out in detail by Karl Marx in the
19^(th) century, and it is borne out by historical experience. Since the
Industrial Revolution, around two centuries ago in the West,
boom-and-bust cycles have recurred with varying intensity. The most
destructive bust occurred in the 1930s Great Depression, leading to the
Second World War and the deaths of over 60 million people.

Historically, as Marx recognised, capitalism can also be seen as the
driver of technological revolutions and in boosting human powers of
production. And, at least in the West, it has been associated with past
improvements in the living conditions of a sizeable fraction of the
population. So should we perhaps just accept that capitalism, with all
its flaws, is the best we can do? Perhaps we should believe the official
argument that governments have largely learnt to cope with boom-and-bust
cycles through judicious planning. For example, a huge crisis was
averted in the 1970s. However, this was only possible because, as
economist Harry Shutt explains: ‘the authorities were determined (as
never before) to use the forces of the state – through fiscal and
monetary manipulation (including massive but unsustainable government
borrowing) – to try and keep the show on the road.’²¹ But these were
only short-term fixes at best. Gerry Gold and Paul Feldman of the
UK-based activist network A World To Win sum it up: ‘Attempts to resolve
the simultaneous stagnation and inflation of the 1970s through high
interest rates produced a recession in the US in the early 1980s.
Parallel deflationary policies imposed by the UK’s Thatcher government
from 1979 led quickly to a recession and a full-blown slump by 1985.
Attempts to overcome this only led to a further recession in 1991-2.’²²

Moreover, Shutt points to the ‘coping strategies’ promoted since the
1980s by government authorities in cahoots with Wall Street and the
City. These have ‘all involved pumping up credit bubbles around various
fantasies – “emerging” markets, dot.com, housing – which had about as
much substance as the original South Sea [Bubble] and could only be
sustained even for a few years by a similar level of fraud and
misinformation.’²³

In 1997, a major financial crisis erupted, starting in East Asia.
Currencies collapsed, businesses went bankrupt and millions of people
lost their jobs. Many Asian enterprises were subsequently snapped up at
rock-bottom prices by corporations and investors in the West. Soon
after, in 2000, the speculative bubble of investment in internet-related
companies burst spectacularly. This ‘dot-com’ bust saw a lengthy
recession ensue in the developed world.

Historical evidence shows, then, that governments have been largely
powerless to combat capitalism’s inevitable and damaging ‘business
cycles.’ However, this should not be confused with the resiliency of
capitalism; the system has demonstrated a repeated capacity to reform
itself sufficiently to allow renewed growth, albeit at low levels, and
to survive further rounds of business cycles. So it would be wrong to
assume that the whole capitalist system, unstable and unfair as it
always will be, is necessarily on the verge of total collapse.

Official Fraud and Propaganda

An alarming symptom of what is wrong with current economics is the
increasingly desperate and cynical measures taken by powerful states,
corporations and investors to maintain faltering public confidence in
global capitalism. Just as Enron, WorldCom and a host of other large
corporations have committed accounting fraud, so governments have
falsified figures on inflation, output and unemployment to present a
false picture of a healthy economy up to, and even including, the
current global recession.²⁴

For example, the US government deliberately exaggerated GDP growth rates
in order to disguise the economy’s poor performance since the mid-1970s;
in the developed world, growth rates actually declined over succeeding
decades. As David Harvey notes in A Brief History of Neoliberalism,
aggregate global growth rates stood at around 3.5 per cent in the 1960s.
Even during the difficult 1970s, marked by energy shortages and
industrial ‘unrest,’ it only fell to 2.4 per cent. But later growth
rates languished at 1.4 per cent and 1.1 per cent in the 1980s and
1990s, respectively, and struggled to reach even 1 per cent after
2000.²⁵

In terms of managing public perception, however, the authorities have
largely succeeded. They have maintained the fiction that they can manage
the economy effectively and that global capitalism is the only game in
town. How has this been possible? Shutt points to a ‘media campaign of
uncritical propaganda and pro-market hype.’ This ‘sustained act of mass
deception (in which the establishment has seemingly come to believe in
its own propaganda) has had disastrous consequences.’²⁶

Those consequences include wars motivated by the desire for geostrategic
power including the access to, and control of, hydrocarbon resources and
economic markets; crushing levels of poverty and inequality; global
climate instability; and the most rapid loss of species in the planet’s
history.²⁷

The Neoliberal Nightmare

To complement the above picture, and in contrast to corporate media
coverage, we must also expose the political-economic process summed up
by that innocuous-sounding word, ‘neoliberalisation.’ This serious
attack on democracy, the latest stage in advanced capitalism, took root
in the Reagan-Thatcher era of the 1980s, and has accelerated ever since.
Proponents of neoliberalism tell us that human well-being flourishes
best within an institutional framework characterised by strong private
property rights, ‘open’ markets and ‘free’ trade. But what has it meant
in practice?

First, recall that after the trauma of the Depression and the Second
World War in the 1930s and 1940s, Western governments used Keynesian
fiscal and monetary policies (named after the British economist John
Maynard Keynes) to try to dampen business cycles and to ensure
reasonably full employment. There was significant state-led planning,
and even state ownership, of key industrial sectors such as coal, steel
and cars. Governments also made huge investments in health care,
education and infrastructure. As Harvey explains, this system of
‘embedded liberalism’ involved ‘market processes and entrepreneurial and
corporate activities [that] were surrounded by a web of social and
political constraints and a regulatory environment.’²⁸

During the 1950s and 1960s, embedded liberalism delivered high rates of
economic growth in the West. But in the 1970s, given the inevitability
of boom-and-bust, a serious crisis of capital accumulation arose.
Inflation and unemployment soared, and labour unrest threatened business
interests. The free-market and monetarist financial centres, notably the
City of London, had never been enamoured of the postwar welfare state
and were increasingly antagonistic towards state Keynesian policies. As
Harvey notes, ‘the nationalized industries were draining resources from
the Treasury.’²⁹ With the oil shocks and economic stagnation of the
1970s, powerful business and political forces mobilised to set a course
for the next stage of capitalism: to regain the elite class power that
had been dissipated to some extent by postwar policies of wealth
redistribution and social welfare. Neoliberalisation was born.

A wave of deregulation of financial markets swept the world, and
transnational mobility of capital rapidly rose. Corporate pressure
intensified on governments to create ‘a good business climate’ and to
adopt neoliberal ‘reforms’ that routinely squeezed state spending. Wall
Street-IMF-Treasury policy measures came to dominate US economic policy
and many developing countries were driven down the neoliberal road,
creating social havoc and environmental disasters. Neoliberalism became
the new economic orthodoxy, exerting a powerful ideological influence in
the media and academia.

The whole process has been a form of ‘creative destruction,’ the term
popularised by the Austrian economist Joseph Schumpeter, which has
weakened or even dismantled existing institutions and state powers,
social welfare, health care, education systems and culture; even modes
of human interaction, behaviour and thought. With characteristic
clarity, Noam Chomsky observes that: ‘Just about every element of the
neoliberal package is an attack on democracy. In the case of
privatization, that is true by definition: privatization transfers
enterprises from the public to the private domain. In the public domain
they are under some degree of public control, at least in principle; in
more democratic societies, that could be a considerable degree, and in
still more democratic societies, which barely yet exist, they would be
under the direct control of “stake-holders”: workers and communities.
But the private domain is virtually unaccountable to the public in
principle, except by regulatory mechanisms that are typically quite weak
thanks to the overwhelming influence of concentrated private capital on
the state.’³⁰

In some countries there have been improvements during the initial stages
of neoliberalisation in lifting people out of poverty and in raising
living standards for many; just as past capitalism generally did in the
West. However, this has certainly not been the motivating intent of
corporations and investors, despite much pious rhetoric about ‘solving
poverty.’ Any localised ‘success’ has typically been achieved at the
expense of people elsewhere, in regions where neoliberal ‘development’
has not been as advanced. China’s achievements, for example, have been
gained to the serious detriment of neighbouring economies which have not
been as well-equipped to compete in global markets. Moreover, a
persistent and deep-rooted characteristic of neoliberalisation, in China
and elsewhere, has been its strong tendency to worsen social inequality,
as we will see below. Social progress achieved during neoliberalisation
of previously poor countries has not been sustained. Typically, state
intervention has been required to maintain any semblance of a social
welfare safety net, or the net has simply been left to fray in the chill
winds of economic ‘progress.’

At the other end of the social spectrum, neoliberalisation has generated
spectacular concentrations of wealth and power that have not been seen
since the 1920s. In China and Russia, new and powerful economic elites
have been created. Harvey sums up: ‘The flows of tribute into the
world’s major financial centres have been astonishing. What, however, is
even more astonishing is the habit of treating all of this as a mere and
in some instances even unfortunate by-product of neoliberalization. The
very idea that this might be – just might be – the fundamental core of
what neoliberalization has been about all along appears unthinkable. It
has been part of the genius of neoliberal theory to provide a benevolent
mask full of wonderful-sounding words like freedom, liberty, choice, and
rights, to hide the grim realities of the restoration or reconstitution
of naked class power…’³¹

Neoliberalism has gone hand in hand with state terrorism, a coercive
tool that liberal democratic states have used routinely for many
years.³² As Ruth Blakeley observes, state terrorism by the West has
helped ‘to secure access to and control of resources, including labour,
and markets’ in the interests of rich and powerful elites.³³ Examples
include the US-led invasions of Afghanistan (2001) and Iraq (2003), as
well as direct US complicity in the brutal violence of client regimes in
Latin America, such as Chile, El Salvador and Nicaragua.³⁴

The above is but a hint of the stark reality underpinning the
‘flourishing’ of the global economic system; and it is a reality that is
shamefully missing from broadcast headlines and newspaper front pages.
The current system of economics, particularly the latest stage of
‘turbo-capitalism,’ known inoffensively as ‘neoliberalism’ as we have
seen, is built upon painful boom-and-bust cycles fuelled by corporate
greed and maintained by cynical deception of the public. The costs to
the planet, in terms of human and animal suffering, and environmental
collapse, are staggering. So what happens when you confront journalists
with these realities?

‘Most of Us Get These Things out of Our System When We Are Students’: A Tangle with the Economics Editor of the Sunday Times

I emailed David Smith, the economics editor and lead author of a Sunday
Times article cited earlier in this chapter.³⁵ I told him that I thought
his perspective was too limited, and too skewed towards the status quo.
Why not examine some of the following key points made by, for example,
David Harvey in The Enigma of Capital?

-   The endemic problems of instability arising from financial-isation,
    leveraging and surplus liquidity.
-   Repeating systemic cycles of crises.
-   Capitalism feeding off wars and conflict.
-   Inevitable victims: billions of the world’s population, ecosystems
    and climate stability.

As we saw earlier, Smith had cited with approval Jim O’Neill, chief
economist at Goldman Sachs, whose pacifying note, ‘Why the World is
Better Than You Think,’ had claimed that a ‘global recovery’ was
underway.

Smith emailed me back:

  Jim O’Neill is a good economist, irrespective of whether you like the
  company he keeps. David Harvey is not alone in seeing periodic crises
  for capitalism. So do the Austrian School or any number of economists
  brought up in the Keynesian tradition. What was interesting, to me,
  was Harvey’s rather despairing conclusion, which appeared to be a
  tribute to capitalism’s great resilience. He wrote:

  “Capitalism will never fall on its own. It will have to be pushed. The
  accumulation of capital will never cease. It will have to be stopped.
  The capitalist class will never willingly surrender its power. It will
  have to be dispossessed.”³⁶

 

Smith was dismissive, but David Harvey is surely right. We might even
recast the observation to make the same point about certain journalists:
‘The journalists of capitalism will never tell the truth on their own.
They will have to be pushed.’

And although the Sunday Times journalist’s point about the resilience of
capitalism may well be accurate, it is a complete red herring, as I said
when I wrote back: ‘But you’ve evaded my central question – why do you
rarely, if ever, address the issues I put to you?’ His reply was a lofty
dismissal: ‘Most of us get these things out of our system when we are
students.’³⁷

The condescension is not out of place amongst media professionals
dealing with pesky members of the public. The clear message was that
once students graduate they are supposed to be mature enough to ignore
capitalism’s victims and to be content with an appallingly unjust system
of destruction and exploitation. This is the cold, heartless logic that
seeps out from the symbiosis of capitalism and corporate journalism.

‘You Sanctimonious Nitwit’: Financial Times Chief Economics Commentator Unhappy with Debating in Public

Unlike the BBC, the corporate press is not obliged, even on paper, to be
impartial. Nor is it required, as is the BBC – again on paper – to
‘strive to reflect a wide range of opinion and explore a range and
conflict of views so that no significant strand of thought is knowingly
unreflected or under represented.’³⁸ But surely serious commentators
should be able, at least, to engage with serious public criticism?

Take Martin Wolf, for example, the Financial Times chief economics
commentator whom I mentioned at the start of this chapter. With the
financial system in disarray in late 2008, and a global recession
underway, I emailed him:³⁹

  Dear Martin Wolf,

  In your most recent FT column⁴⁰ you wrote:

  ‘When confidence collapses, a market economy cannot function. It must
  now be restored.’

  There is no ‘market economy.’ Certainly not one that would be
  recognised by Adam Smith.

  You concluded:

  ‘Government must start to show it is in control of events.’

  The trouble is, the government is not in control of events. Nobody is.
  No more than anyone can be in control of an unstable house of cards.

  You quoted Roosevelt and Churchill. Try Martin Luther King:

  ‘True compassion is more than flinging a coin at a beggar; it comes to
  see an edifice that produces beggars needs restructuring.’

  Your columns are shoring up the edifice.

 

Within minutes, Wolf responded bluntly: ‘Yes, you are right. They
are.’⁴¹

I thanked him for his response, flippant though it was, and added: ‘At
least you are honest in admitting your role in perpetuating a system
“that produces beggars.”’⁴²

Wolf responded again that same day: ‘All financial systems, since at
least the Middle Ages, have been “unstable houses of cards.” That is
their nature. It’s tough to live in a fallen world, isn’t it?’⁴³

I emailed back:

  Good point. But there are various degrees and consequences of
  instability. Under today’s global elite-run ‘house of cards,’ those
  consequences include crushing levels of poverty and inequality; wars
  motivated by the desire for strategic control, hydrocarbon resources
  and economic markets; climate instability; and the most rapid loss of
  species in the planet’s history. Please consider making these links
  somewhere in your columns.

  You could do worse to begin than by unpacking that cosy-sounding
  phrase ‘market economy’: in reality, an extreme variant of capitalism
  known as neoliberalism which is massively subsidised and protected by
  powerful states.⁴⁴

 

That marked the end of the correspondence with the FT journalist; he
didn’t bother to respond. I posted the exchange on the message board of
the Media Lens website.⁴⁵ This encouraged members of the public to
challenge Wolf’s repeated failure to report the real underlying causes
of global financial instability, as well as its awful human and
planetary impacts. Wolf then told one emailer that he was unimpressed
that the exchange had now been made public. His challenger responded
cogently: ‘The corporate press has a significant (unfortunately
destructive) impact on the lives of people around the world. Hence, I
see no need for Medialens or anyone to hesitate about making the replies
of journalists about their work (hardly personal matters) available to
the public.’⁴⁶ Wolf replied: ‘Of course you don’t. It’s just what I
would expect of a sanctimonious nitwit.’⁴⁷

The scathing tone summed up the corporate media’s general attitude
towards its audience: swallow what we say, and do not dare hold us up to
public scrutiny.

‘Dealing with the World as it is’? Jousting with Independent Economics Commentator

Earlier in this chapter I noted an observation made by Hamish McRae,
economics columnist at the Independent: ‘Bankers, like the rest of us,
make mistakes, but the scale of the mistakes, particularly in US banks,
has been enormous.’⁴⁸ I emailed McRae to ask why he talked merely of
‘mistakes,’ adding provocatively, as I did in emailing David Smith of
the Sunday Times: ‘Why are the terms of your analysis so narrow; so
skewed towards the perspective of financial power?’⁴⁹

As an alternative framework, I suggested a few of the observations made
earlier in this chapter; in particular, that the current economic system
is both innately unstable and destructive. I asked McRae why he appeared
to reject such a rational analysis. On the same day, he wrote back:
‘Thanks – I see your point. I suppose I feel I should deal with the
world as it is, rather than as it might be. Is that narrow? Well, yes if
you are seeking a discussion of the merits and demerits of the present
global market economy, but no if you are trying to understand and
calibrate what is actually happening. I think I am probably more use
doing the latter.’

This was an interesting sidestep from genuine journalistic
responsibility. So I responded: ‘You say: “I feel I should deal with the
world as it is.” Perhaps it would be more accurate to rephrase this as:
“I feel I should deal with the world as I see it.”’ His reply, sent as
he was about to head for the World Economic Forum in Switzerland: ‘Not
sure – let me think about it. But in all earnestness I do think that you
should not discount the huge progress made in India and China in lifting
people out of poverty. I visited both in recent months and am in awe. I
shall have to stop this interchange as I have to pack for Davos now.’

But just how accurate is McRae’s assertion of the ‘huge progress made in
India and China,’ a mantra that appears regularly in the corporate
media?

The Latest ‘Success Stories’ of Capitalism

Cheerleaders for capitalism are always keen to advertise the system’s
‘successes,’ updating where necessary. Previously, model countries were
said to include Japan, South Korea, Malaysia and Thailand. But that was
before the East Asian financial crisis of 1997-98. India and China are
today’s poster states for capitalism.

Some progress in these countries is real. However, as noted above, any
social progress under ‘neoliberal reforms’ has not been sustained and,
moreover, has been to the detriment of people losing out elsewhere in
the global economy (not to mention the damage to global ecosystems).

Another important factor, glossed over in conventional news reporting
and debate, is that massive state intervention and subsidies have been
required to ameliorate the worst consequences of ‘shock therapy’ in
following neoliberal doctrines of ‘market reforms.’⁵⁰ Political
economist David Kotz notes that China’s strategy of opening up its
economy since 1978 ‘bears almost no resemblance to the neoliberal
approach followed by Russia.’⁵¹ For example, government price controls
were lifted only gradually in China. Also, the large-scale privatisation
of state-owned enterprises, upon which many people depended, did not
begin until 1996, eighteen years into the transition. The Chinese
government continued to direct and support large state enterprises, only
gradually loosening its regulation as experience grew of operating in a
market environment.

Public spending and public investment continued to grow, rather than
shrink as in Russia. China did not privatise its banks, as Russia did,
but retained a state-controlled financial system. And rather than
rapidly eliminating barriers to trade and capital movements, China
retained significant controls over both. By keeping strict control of
key elements of the economy, China managed, at least initially, to avoid
the disasters that assailed other countries. India, too, has long
pursued interventionist economic strategies, with the government
restricting the attempted access by foreign corporations to domestic
markets and enterprises.

Commentators in the corporate media seem reluctant to acknowledge all
this when they talk of the supposed successes of ‘market reforms’ in
China and India. Moreover, behind McRae’s impression of ‘huge progress’
in these countries, the reality is far more disturbing.

Take India first. In 2007, the country’s rank in the Human Development
Index of the United Nations Development Programme (UNDP) fell two places
to 128. That put India in the bottom 50 of the 177 nations examined.
Palagummi Sainath, rural affairs editor of The Hindu newspaper, pointed
out the disturbing context of the statistics: ‘El Salvador, which saw a
bloody civil war for over a decade from the 1980s, ranks 25 places ahead
of us at 103. Bolivia, often called South America’s poorest nation, is
11 steps above us at 117. Guatemala, nearly half of whose citizens are
poor indigenous people, saw the longest civil war in Central America.
One that lasted close to four decades and which saw 200,000 people
killed or disappear. That too, in a nation of just 12 million. Guatemala
ranks 10 places above us at 118.’⁵²

Sainath added, with grim humour: ‘India rose in the dollar billionaire
rankings, though. From rank 8 in 2006 to number 4 in the Forbes list
this year […] In the billionaire stakes, we are ahead of most of the
planet and might even close in on two of the three nations ahead of us
(Germany and Russia).’

Even in the midst of the financial crisis, the number of Indian
billionaires increased from twenty-seven to fifty-two in 2008.⁵³ As
India’s new billionaires snapped up palatial homes and luxury yachts,
desperate conditions for the nation’s farmers led to an epidemic of
suicides. Vandana Shiva, director of the Research Foundation for
Science, Technology and Ecology, has referred to the appalling number of
suicides among Indian farmers, conservatively estimated at a quarter of
a million⁵⁴, as ‘genocide.’ ‘This genocide,’ she says, ‘is a result of
deliberate policy imposed by the World Trade Organisation and
implemented by the Government. It is designed to destroy small farmers
and transform Indian agriculture into large-scale corporate industrial
farming.’⁵⁵

Indian farmers are in despair over crippling debts from rising
production costs and falling prices, both linked to the corporate-led
imposition of ‘free trade’ in agriculture. Shiva has repeatedly warned
of the growing forced dependence on hybrid and genetically modified
seeds which are costly and cannot be saved. These are the consequences
of the corporate drive to create multinational seed monopolies and to
privatise seed supply. In desperation, farmers have turned towards
planting cash crops, such as genetically modified cotton.

As John Pilger notes, the slogan of ‘Shining India,’ invented by an
American advertising firm, disguised the end of any pretence of class
and caste reconciliation or, in other words, social justice. He adds:
‘Monsanto and Pizza Hut, Microsoft and Murdoch were invited to enter
what had been forbidden territory to corporate predators. India would
serve a new deity called “economic growth” and be hailed as a “global
leader,” apparently heading “in what the smart money believes is the
right direction” (Newsweek).’⁵⁶ Pilger continues: ‘Despite a growth rate
of 6.9 per cent and prosperity for some, more Indians than ever are
living in poverty than anywhere on earth, including a third of all
malnourished children. Save the Children says that every year two
million infants under the age of five die.’

But just as 2011 saw a wave of popular uprisings in the Middle East’s
‘Arab Spring,’ perhaps in India there is also the prospect of peaceful
resistance. ‘The voice that the government of India has tried so hard to
silence,’ writes Arundhati Roy, ‘has now massed into a deafening roar.
Hundreds of thousands of unarmed people have come out to reclaim their
cities, their streets and mohallas [neighbourhoods]. They have simply
overwhelmed the heavily armed security forces by their sheer numbers,
and with a remarkable display of raw courage.’⁵⁷

So India’s economic ‘success’ has come at a huge price. What about the
case of China?

‘A Large Statistical Glitch’

In late 2007, a World Bank study revealed that China’s economy was
considerably smaller than had been thought, perhaps by as much as 40 per
cent. ‘What happened was a large statistical glitch,’ reported the New
York Times. But it was a glitch that had huge repercussions: ‘Suddenly
the number of Chinese who live below the World Bank’s poverty line of a
dollar a day jumped from about 100 million to 300 million.’ That is the
same size as the entire population of the United States. The new study
also revealed that the size of India’s economy, too, had probably been
exaggerated. ‘And, by the way, global growth has very likely been slower
than we thought.’⁵⁸ But still we are invited to believe that China’s
economic development is a ‘success.’

In contrast to the prevailing media consensus, Martin Hart-Landsberg, a
professor of economics in Portland, Oregon, and editor of Critical Asia
Studies, noted that China’s achievements were ‘at the expense of
economic problems elsewhere,’ as he told me when I emailed him. He
continued: ‘while investment rates are very high in China, they are low
and falling in most of the rest of East Asia. Their economies have
become increasingly dependent on exporting to China and to succeed they
have been forced to keep wages low.’⁵⁹

China has largely failed to generate new jobs: an endemic feature of
neoliberalism. Indeed, a 2004 study by Alliance Capital Management
reported that manufacturing jobs were being eliminated faster in China
than in any other country. Between 1995 and 2002, China lost more than
15 million factory jobs: 15 per cent of its total manufacturing
workforce.⁶⁰ More recently, David Harvey noted that evidence from China
points to ‘a rising tide of unrest there as the worldwide economic
downturn creat[es] unwelcome and unaccustomed (in China) increases in
unemployment (in early 2009 estimated to be close to 20 million
unemployed) within a recently proletarianised population.’⁶¹

In 2011, citing the latest figures from the US Bureau of Labor
Statistics, Hart-Landsberg observed that the absolute number of
manufacturing workers in China declined from a peak of 126.1 million in
1996 to 112.6 million in 2006.⁶² He concluded: ‘What is especially
significant about [these numbers] is that China is the world’s star
economic performer. If Chinese workers are finding their manufacturing
jobs disappearing and their compensation limited, no wonder that workers
in other countries are facing serious challenges.’ So does this mean
that capitalism doesn’t work? Hart-Landsberg is clear: ‘We don’t have a
broken system. Rather we have a system that works very efficiently to
enrich an ever smaller number of people. Those people think that it is
working just fine.’

Meanwhile, even by the World Bank’s own analysis, China’s poor have been
growing poorer as the country’s economy ‘booms.’ The real income of the
poorest 10 per cent of China’s 1.3 billion people fell by 2.4 per cent
in the two years to 2003. During this time the economy was growing by
nearly 10 per cent a year. Over the same period, the income of China’s
richest 10 per cent rose by more than 16 per cent.⁶³

Tragically, studies of China’s health indicators show a slowdown or even
reversal of trends. A report in 2005 ‘concluded that China’s rates of
improvement in life expectancy were lower than those of East Asia and
the Pacific region as a whole in every decade other than the 1960s, and
fell below the world average in the 1990s.’ The authors ‘observed a
similar trend for infant mortality, noting that China’s advances were
again outpaced by those of high income countries and other East Asian
and Pacific states.’⁶⁴

Hart-Landsberg warns that ‘past health gains from immunizations, water
and sewer infrastructure, education, etc. may now be exhausted. And as
marketization continues, the social infrastructure is being destroyed,
with the consequence that problems are emerging for most Chinese. Social
support/public health care system is not there and health care is now a
market process. Many cannot afford it as they have to pay for access to
it.’⁶⁵

On top of this working class misery, inequality between China’s rich and
poor is appalling and is actually getting worse. The Asian Development
Bank studied the degree of inequality, using the popular Gini
coefficient⁶⁶, in 22 East Asian developing countries. It found that
China had the second highest degree of inequality, trailing only
Nepal.⁶⁷

China’s transformation from one of the most equal, to one of the least
equal, countries is even more striking if we switch our measure of
inequality from the Gini coefficient to income ratios; in particular,
the earnings of the top 20 per cent relative to the bottom 20 per cent
of the population. Using this measure, China had by far the highest
growth in inequality.⁶⁸ Sadly, warns Hart-Landsberger, there is ‘every
reason to believe that these [official] statistics strongly
underestimate the degree of inequality.’⁶⁹

There are further overlooked costs to China’s rapid growth: rising
pollution, destruction of ecosystems and the heightened threat of
climate chaos. Future generations will bear the brunt of these so-called
‘externalities.’ The Worldwatch Institute reported at the end of 2006
that China had slid down the annual Climate Change Performance Index, a
measure of a country’s climate protection efforts, due to its rising
emissions of carbon dioxide. China ranked 29^(th) out of 53 countries in
2006, dropping to 54^(th) out of 56 in the 2007 update.⁷⁰ By the time of
the 2012 update, it was languishing at 57^(th) out of 61, and it was the
country with the largest emissions of carbon dioxide with 23.7 per cent
of the global total (the United States was in second place with 17.9 per
cent).⁷¹

The Failure of Professional Journalism

In The Trouble with Capitalism, Harry Shutt observes that there is
‘little sign of any crack in the monolithic commitment of the political
mainstream to the status quo based on serving profit-maximising producer
interests.’ He continues: ‘Still more disturbing is the apparent refusal
of any established political party or pressure group in the
industrialised world to engage in a serious discussion of the
fundamental flaws of the existing model. This obtuseness, at a time of
manifest breakdown of the established order, seems to be only explicable
in terms of the utter irresponsibility of the ruling elite towards
protecting the public interest and their corresponding indifference to
the upholding of civilised values.’⁷²

The dominant system of economics is unstable, inimical to social justice
and lethally damaging to the environmental support systems on which we
all depend. A major failure in professional journalism has been the
refusal to analyse this; or even to report that real growth rates in the
developed world have been declining since the 1970s. Instead,
corporate-employed journalists and mainstream analysts frequently extol
the alleged spectacular achievements of an ‘unparalleled’ rise in
wealth. One heartening sign of the public’s resistance to being bathed
in incessant propaganda is that a 2009 opinion poll in the United States
showed that only 53 per cent believe that ‘capitalism is better than
socialism.’⁷³

I referred earlier to the desperate attempts by governments to
manipulate official statistics to hype the ‘success’ of global
capitalism. Do commentators in the media really believe that a civilised
society should tolerate an economic system so dependent on deception to
maintain public confidence in ‘free’ and ‘open’ markets? The media’s
omission of rational perspectives on the global economy is particularly
galling in the case of the publicly-funded BBC which professes a
‘commitment to impartiality’ and includes the solemn promise, noted
earlier, ‘to reflect a wide range of opinion and explore a range and
conflict of views so that no significant strand of thought is knowingly
unreflected or under represented.’ As on so many other issues that one
might care to mention, this is simply BBC rhetoric.⁷⁴

Meanwhile, the threat of global economic recession, the horrific
divisions between rich and poor, and worldwide climate chaos, threaten
to engulf us all.


Beyond Indifference

 

  One of the problems that every human being has to face is the world in
  which he is born. His being and the intentions of the world don’t go
  together. The world wants him to serve, to be a slave, to be used by
  those who are in power. And, naturally, he resents it. He wants to be
  himself. The world does not allow anybody to be what he is by nature
  supposed to be. The world tries to mould every person into a
  commodity: useful, efficient, obedient – never rebellious, never
  asserting itself, never declaring its own individuality, but always
  being subservient, almost like a robot.

  Osho¹

 

Authentic Existence and the ‘Outsider Problem’

There is an intense feeling that we all experience during our best
moments; that life has meaning, that it is priceless and filled with
immense potential. The seventeenth century French philosopher Blaise
Pascal expressed this as ‘authentic existence,’ in contrast to
‘inauthentic existence’ in which people tend to waste their lives in
amusements or trivialities. Likewise, the twentieth century German
philosopher Martin Heidegger wrote of: ‘Being that degrades itself in
the mediocrity of everyday life’ and of our ‘forgetfulness of
Existence.’ In other words, we can become so swamped by the minutiae of
just surviving, day by day, that we forget to enjoy the feeling of being
alive in the world. Why is this?

In a series of seven books published in the 1950s and 1960s, the British
author Colin Wilson tackles this existentialist question which he termed
the ‘Outsider problem.’ Wilson’s Outsider is someone who thinks deeply
about society’s prevailing values, and who does not, or refuses to,
conform to the requirements of being a ‘civilised’ or ‘respectable’
person. Put simply, Wilson addresses Socrates’ question, ‘How should I
live?’ and observes that: ‘The man who is interested to know how he
should live instead of merely taking life as it comes, is automatically
an Outsider.’² Examples of Outsiders that Wilson considers are T. E.
Lawrence (‘Lawrence of Arabia’), Friedrich Nietzsche, Vincent Van Gogh,
George Fox (founder of the Quakers) and the Buddha.

As part of an extensive and fascinating overview of mostly Western
literature, art and philosophy, Wilson examines the Outsider’s attempts
to explore the meaning of human life. In this exploration, Wilson
outlines, but then ultimately rejects, the nihilism and meaninglessness
that underlies the output of various existentialist writers and
philosophers in the twentieth century, notably Albert Camus and
Jean-Paul Sartre (‘Man is a useless passion,’ wrote Sartre).

Wilson summarises the impact of Sartre’s existentialism thus: ‘[it]
removed the universal backcloth against which mediaeval man acted out
his dreams, with a sense that everything he did would be brought up on
judgement day. In its place, says Sartre, there is only the infinitude
of space, which means that man’s actions are of no importance to anyone
but himself.’³

Wilson cannot accept that Sartre’s pessimistic view might represent
reality, and he synthesises an alternative view of the human condition
from history, art and literature to counter such pessimism. This is
Wilson’s attempt to develop an optimistic ‘new’ existentialism, building
on the work of several philosophers, notably Edmund Husserl and Alfred
North Whitehead. Wilson draws connections between their philosophical
work, in which the analysis of human experience is paramount, and the
deep insights into the human condition explored in art and literature by
William Blake, Rainer Maria Rilke, Vincent van Gogh, George Bernard
Shaw, Ernest Hemingway, Leo Tolstoy and many others.

As Wilson argues towards the conclusion of his second book, Religion and
the Rebel (1957), ‘the only way one can talk about the problems of
“meaning” in life is by showing them in terms of living people.’
Therein, he argues, lies the great power of the best poets, dramatists
and novelists. ‘True existentialism,’ Wilson says, ‘is the dramatic
investigation of human nature through the medium of art.’⁴

One of Wilson’s favourite existentialists is the Russian writer Fyodor
Dostoyevsky. When Raskolnikov, the central character in Dostoyevsky’s
Crime and Punishment, considers the possibility of being executed for
the murders he has committed, he reflects that ‘he would prefer to stand
on a narrow ledge for all eternity, surrounded by darkness and tempest,
rather than die at once. The fear of death has raised his consciousness
of freedom to a point where he becomes aware of the absolute value of
his existence. The “indifference threshold” has been completely
destroyed.’⁵

Wilson’s concept of the ‘indifference threshold’ is based on the
realisation that: ‘There is a margin of the human mind that can be
stimulated by pain or inconvenience, but which is indifferent to
pleasure.’⁶ He expands further: ‘the recognition that man’s moments of
freedom tend to come under crisis or challenge, and that when things are
going well, he tends to allow his grip on life to slacken.’⁷ As an
example, Wilson again cites Sartre who once wrote that he felt at his
most free and alive when working in the French underground resistance,
while at constant risk of betrayal and death.

Spring Bloom and a Burst Appendix

An example from my own experience of breaking through the ‘indifference
threshold’ was in April 1997 when I fell ill halfway through a
scientific cruise on the British research ship, RRS Discovery. We were
in the northeast Atlantic ocean undertaking physical, chemical and
biological surveys of the spring bloom: the seasonal upsurge in the
production of microscopic marine plant life known as phytoplankton.⁸ The
process is an important natural cycle in the Earth’s climate system. The
spring bloom is the oceanic equivalent of what we observe at the same
time of year on land: a riotous reawakening of plant and animal life.

For me, however, the spring bloom was marked by the acute failure of my
appendix. We were several hundred miles offshore, west of the Spanish
town of Vigo. There were no surgical facilities on board Discovery, and
the nearest ship with suitable facilities – RFA Argus, a British
aviation training ship with onboard hospital – was too distant. I would
have to be evacuated from Discovery by air and taken to hospital in
Vigo.

It took two days before we got close enough to dry land for a Spanish
coastal rescue helicopter to rendezvous with Discovery. It had just gone
five o’clock on a beautiful clear morning, a few minutes after sunrise,
when we caught sight of a distant bright light in the blue sky
indicating the helicopter’s approach. Ensconced in my bulky orange X4
survival suit, I was strapped prone into a covered stretcher and winched
on board the helicopter. As I was being hauled up, I managed to wriggle
one hand free to wave goodbye to the watching scientists, officers and
crew on the Discovery below. Although I was dangling precariously over
the ocean, and was in considerable discomfort from the appendicitis, I
had this intense feeling of being alive. After a helicopter flight of an
hour or so, I was collected by ambulance from the airport and taken to
the hospital in Vigo. That afternoon, I was operated on successfully by
an experienced, no-nonsense surgeon known to his colleagues as ‘The
Knife.’ Foske, my partner, flew out to be with me. A week later I was
back home, recuperating well and with a renewed enthusiasm for life. I
would soon begin working on my first book, Private Planet.⁹

Indifference Arising from Clutching Desire

For Wilson, the indifference threshold ‘was an absolutely fundamental
recognition. It meant that “life-devaluation” – the opposite of freedom
– is due to our curious laziness, to a childish “spoiledness” that gets
resentful and bored in the face of minor problems. And freedom – the
moment of vision, of poetry – is due to a certain unconscious discipline
of the will.’¹⁰

But how does one actually break through the ‘indifference threshold’?
Or, to put it another way, how does one move from ‘inauthentic
existence’ to ‘authentic existence’? Wilson answers: ‘There are two
ways. First of all, one must live constantly in the face of death,
recognising it as the ultimate necessity. (Gurdjieff had also declared
that man could escape from his fallenness if he had an organ that made
him constantly aware of the date of his death.)’ Wilson continues:
‘There is another way… Poetry and myth can bring man [sic] closer to the
realm of pure Being.’¹¹

This is an intriguing conclusion, but it is ultimately nonetheless
frustrating and inadequate. Much though I admire Wilson’s work, a major
failing of his approach is that he skirts around the idea that the
problems of human existence are rooted in the overpowering sense we all
share of some essential self, which we refer to as ‘I’ or ‘me.’ To adopt
a Buddhist perspective, our problem is that we are forever grasping at
an independent self that does not exist in reality.¹² In the Buddhist
view, it is attachment to this illusory self that gives rise to endless
dissatisfaction and suffering as we try to quench our bottomless human
desires. Although this truth seems to evade Wilson, he touches on it
momentarily when he quotes a character called Job Huss from the H. G.
Wells short story The Undying Fire: ‘Man is born as the beasts are born,
a greedy egotism, a clutching egotism, a clutching desire, a thing of
lusts and fears.’¹³ That phrase, ‘a clutching desire,’ is reminiscent of
the Buddhist concept of suffering that arises from attachment to a
self-centred mind.

Wilson also gets close when he recalls the character Mitya in
Dostoyevsky’s classic novel, The Brothers Karamazov, who ‘is made to
realize that the earth is full of suffering human beings, and that no
one can be whole and complete without a sense of kinship with the
suffering of all other living beings.’¹⁴ This powerful realisation, too,
has parallels in Buddhist teachings. The eighth-century Indian sage
Shantideva puts it simply in the classic Guide to the Bodhisattva’s Way
of Life:

  All the happiness there is in this world
  Arises from wishing others to be happy,
  And all the suffering there is in this world
  Arises from wishing ourself to be happy.¹⁵

 

Adopting this selfless approach is a true and worthy demonstration of
Nietzsche’s ‘will to power.’ That such a great philosopher did not
recognise this application of his valuable concept was truly a lost
opportunity in the development of Western thought. We will return to
Nietzsche below.

Contemplating Death

Recall Wilson’s remark above that ‘one must live constantly in the face
of death, recognising it as the ultimate necessity.’ In summarising
Heidegger’s philosophy, Wilson concludes that: ‘We are all trapped in a
world of dreams inside our own skulls, and nothing short of the threat
of immediate death will wake us up to intense appreciation of our
lives.’¹⁶ Or, as Dr. Samuel Johnson expressed it succinctly: ‘when a man
knows he is to be hanged in a fortnight, it concentrates his mind
wonderfully.’ In Christianity, too, there is the notion that one’s Maker
may take you from the present life at any time: a compelling reason for
believers to live out the present moment as though it could be one’s
last.

I have an example from my own life that sometimes gives me pause for
thought. When I was six years of age, one of my best friends was killed
in a road accident in Cumbernauld, a rare event in that new town where
planners had intended that pedestrians and traffic would be kept apart
as much as possible. My family had recently moved home to another town,
Barrhead, and so I wasn’t there when the accident happened. But I knew
the location where the car had hit Barry; it was on the way to a
favourite spot where a few of us used to go and play. I’ve often gone
over in my mind’s eye what might have happened that day: perhaps a
momentary distraction, Barry rushing excitedly across the road instead
of using the underpass, not seeing the car, and the driver not being
able to stop in time. I was told that Barry had died instantly. The
tragic loss of that young life still disturbs me today, over forty years
later. If I happen to be feeling irritated or ungrateful or thwarted in
some way, sometimes I recall Barry and the preciousness of human life;
and how we can never really know in advance the time and manner of our
own death.

In Buddhism, contemplating one’s own death is strongly encouraged in
order to generate the necessary motivation for training the mind on the
path to enlightenment. There is simply no time to waste. Geshe Kelsang
Gyatso explains that the main obstacle to making our human life
meaningful is that we are ‘so attached to worldly activities [that] we
do not have a strong wish to practice Dharma’ (the Buddha’s teachings).
Gyatso is clear what the first step must be: ‘to overcome this obstacle
we need to meditate on death.’¹⁷ Indeed, Shantideva was rather blunt in
admonishing himself in Guide to the Bodhisattva’s Way of Life: ‘This is
no time to sleep, you fool!’

We can also hear this sense of urgency, of the pressing need to wake up
immediately from daily life’s mediocrities and corrupt societal values,
in Nietzsche’s Thus Spoke Zarathustra. In the discourse titled ‘The
Vision and The Enigma,’ the prophet Zarathustra, the mouthpiece for
Nietzsche’s uncompleted philosophy of ‘the revaluation of all values,’
encounters a curious sight:

  A young shepherd did I see, writhing, choking, quivering, with
  distorted countenance, and with a heavy black serpent hanging out of
  his mouth.

  Had I ever seen so much loathing and pale horror on one countenance?
  Had he perhaps gone to sleep? Then had the serpent crawled into his
  throat – there had it bitten itself fast.

  My hand pulled at the serpent, and pulled – in vain! I failed to pull
  the serpent out of his throat. Then there cried out of me: ‘Bite,
  bite!

  ‘Its head off! Bite!’ – so cried it out of me; my horror, my hatred,
  my loathing, my pity, all my good and bad cried with one voice out of
  me.¹⁸

 

Commentator Anthony Ludovici explains the meaning of the parable: ‘the
young shepherd is obviously the man of to-day; the snake that chokes him
represents the stultifying and paralysing social values that threaten to
shatter humanity, and the advice “Bite! Bite!” is but Nietzsche’s
exasperated cry to mankind to alter their values before it is too
late.’¹⁹

The Unanswered Question: What Would Nietzsche’s Superman Actually Do?

Nietzsche believed that man should transform himself into an Übermensch
(the ‘Overman’ or ‘Superman’) in an evolutionary step up from human
life. He demanded greatness and insisted that everyone needs ‘to find
one’s own way.’ Should we go that far, however? I agree with the writer
Michael Tanner in his critical appraisal of Nietzsche: ‘But one hardly
needs to go from that to the extreme of demanding that everyone has the
highest possible profile. By definition, greatness is a rare quality.
That does not mean that most people should be despised or regarded as
eliminable for not possessing or aspiring to it.’²⁰

Indeed not! I’ve not read everything Nietzsche ever wrote but, to my
knowledge, he never explained exactly what it was the Übermensch was
supposed to do with his superhuman abilities. Perhaps this was a
deliberate omission by the philosopher to avoid being overly
prescriptive. More plausibly, in my view, it was simply because
Nietzsche’s vision ultimately failed him. (Although we must, of course,
bear in mind that his productive life was tragically cut short: his last
eleven years were spent insane.) Certainly, there is no indication on
Nietzsche’s part that the Superman should use his advanced powers to
reduce suffering and to boost happiness amongst all people; indeed,
amongst all living beings. On the contrary, Nietzsche abhorred the
concept of compassion, or ‘pity’ as he called it, believing it to be a
prime characteristic of a discredited and weak ‘slave’ morality, as
opposed to a worthy or ‘noble’ morality.

In The Anti-Christ, written just before his final collapse, Nietzsche
explains why he held this disparaging view of compassion: ‘One loses
force when one pities. The loss of force which life has already
sustained through suffering is increased and multiplied even further by
pity.’²¹ He reinforces the message: ‘The weak and ill-constituted shall
perish: first principle of our philanthropy. And one shall help them to
do so. What is more harmful than vice? – Active sympathy for the
ill-constituted and weak.’²² This is a shocking statement. It is
difficult to reconcile it with the interpretation sometimes proffered
that Nietzsche was simply attacking the misguided morals of those who
would wish to intervene in the lives of others.

Although we should certainly not accept everything that Nietzsche
argued, Tanner’s view of one of Nietzsche’s major themes is worth
noting, namely that: ‘What he [Nietzsche] portrays, in book after book,
is the gradual but accelerating decline of Western man into a state
where no values any longer impress him.’²³

Nietzsche defines the values that, for him, constitute ‘good’ and ‘bad’:

  What is good? – All that heightens the feeling of power, the will to
  power, power itself in man.

  What is bad? – All that proceeds from weakness.

  What is happiness? – The feeling that power increases – that a
  resistance is overcome.²⁴

 

The will to power should indeed entail overcoming a resistance: namely,
surmounting Wilson’s ‘indifference threshold’ in order that we come to
feel truly alive, creative and connected with others. But again, we have
to ask: is this sufficient? Is surmounting the ‘indifference threshold’
only about making me feel better? What would Nietzsche’s Superman
actually do with his amazing talents and noble morality? As mentioned
earlier, the question has perhaps never been adequately answered.

Total Compassion, Not Total Indifference

Matthieu Ricard, a French Buddhist monk, describes the search for
meaning in almost Nietzschean terms as ‘a constant attempt to break out
of and blow apart all the tight, encrusting layers of illusion.’²⁵
Ricard explains that the path to wisdom and compassion involves
transforming the mind. But rather than leading to a state of detachment
or even nihilism, as detractors of Buddhism sometimes claim, ‘the more
you persevere in this process of inner transformation, the more you find
that wisdom, serenity, and joy break through to you and impregnate your
whole being – and that, unlike the pleasures of the world, they’re
completely independent of any outer circumstances. They can be
experienced anywhere, at any time, and increase the more you use
them.’²⁶

In his 1970 book Poetry and Mysticism Wilson writes highly of Buddhism,
highlighting its scientific approach to studying consciousness and how
it rejects unverified belief or dogma. However, he ultimately rejects
Buddhism because, he says, it has too ‘negative’ an aim.²⁷ It is
worthwhile quoting the relevant section from Wilson’s Poetry and
Mysticism at length as it indicates some basic misunderstandings about
Buddhism, perhaps still commonplace in the West, that we can then
address afterwards:

  ‘[A]nyone who has ever fallen under the spell of Buddhism – or other
  eastern religion, for that matter – will have discovered the drawback.
  You can determinedly withdraw your mind from the objects of sense,
  assure yourself that you are free of all desire – and nothing whatever
  happens. You just sit there. You cannot “contemplate” merely by
  wanting to contemplate. In fact, you soon realise that contemplation
  is closely bound up with desire. When you first perform that mental
  act of rejecting your desires and obsessions, the feeling of freedom
  is magnificent, and the mind is launched like a rocket, powered, by
  the desire you are rejecting. This is why religious conversions are
  such emotionally violent experiences. When there is nothing more to
  reject, the mind becomes static. And there is a world of difference
  between serenity and mere lack of motion.’²⁸

 

In the above paragraph, Wilson would have us believe that he has
actually managed to extinguish all his desires – highly unlikely unless
he were on the verge of enlightenment! – and that he then found himself
‘just sitting there,’ doing nothing. His mind became ‘static.’ Wilson
says elsewhere that achieving such a state allows one to be indifferent
to problems that may be afflicting us (or others). However, as Ricard
explains, to achieve enlightenment is not a supreme state of
indifference, but exactly its opposite: ‘[T]he goal of Buddhism is a
complete and ultimate understanding of the phenomenal world, both inner
and outer. Subtracting oneself from reality solves nothing at all.
Nirvana is the very opposite of indifference toward the world. It’s
infinite compassion and love toward all beings in their totality.’²⁹

Wilson concludes his rejection of Buddhism as the ‘solution’ to the
‘Outsider problem’: ‘I would not go so far as to reject the whole
Buddhist concept of contemplative objectivity; it can be achieved in
flashes. But I am inclined to believe that when the aspirant sits
cross-legged and concentrates the gaze at the end of his nose, his
immediate aim should not be a state of contemplation. It is too
negative. The mind requires a more positive aim.’³⁰

In fact, the positive aim that Wilson has managed to overlook is the
elimination of suffering and the promotion of happiness amongst all
living beings, everywhere. What could be more positive than that?
Perhaps we should not be too hard on Wilson, however. During his major
phase of working out an approach to the ‘new existentialism’ in the
1950s and 1960s, accurate and accessible books about Buddhism,
particularly about Mahayana Buddhism with its central emphasis on
compassion and love, were few and far between in the West. For much of
the twentieth century, Westerners who wrote about Buddhism tended to
present it as an austere philosophy of detachment and an empty, dead
universe. The supposed aim of the practising Buddhist was to achieve a
supreme state of detachment or worldly indifference; to be totally
unswayed by life’s vicissitudes. This is a deep misunderstanding.³¹

By way of contrast, Ricard, the Buddhist monk, points out that ‘inner
equanimity is neither apathy nor indifference. It’s accompanied by inner
jubilation, and by an openness of mind expressed as unfailing
altruism.’³² That ‘inner jubilation’ echoes Nietzsche’s joyful
affirmation of life as expressed in his writings. However, a key
attribute that should go hand in hand with this inner jubilation is
unfailing altruism; unlike Nietzsche’s call for a ‘noble morality’ that
despises ‘pity’ as a weakness. There is a world of difference between
joy as the selfish will to power, and joy as the compassionate will to
serve and empower others.

Transforming Suffering into Freedom

Marcus Aurelius, the Roman emperor and philosopher, exhorted in his
famous Meditations: ‘It’s time you realized that you have something in
you more powerful and miraculous than the things that affect you and
make you dance like a puppet.’³³

A useful starting point might be to ask ourselves a few questions such
as: what am I afraid of? What makes me anxious? Losing my health, my
hair, my teeth, my looks? If you have children, perhaps you fear for
them: for their health, the risk that they’ll get wrapped up in drugs or
crime, or that they’ll miss out on a good education. If you’re not a
parent, perhaps you desperately wish that you were. Or perhaps you’d
prefer to remain childless, but fear becoming a parent accidentally.

Are you in love, looking for love or falling out of love? Do you fear
being alone in your old age, perhaps even dying alone? And what about
feelings of inadequacy? About not having a slim, well-toned body, or not
being clever enough, or not having the ‘right’ clothes, gadgets,
education, luxurious home or several holiday destinations through the
year. Fear, anxiety, loneliness, insecurity, suffering. And, anyway, why
should any of this matter in a book that has devoted so much attention
to politics, war and the state of the world?

One answer arises from the basic principle that we surely do not wish to
live in a world where nobody is concerned about anyone else. We are all
united in wishing to be happy, to be free from suffering. Arguing the
case for social justice and ecological sustainability with accurate
facts, figures, quotes, references, examples and proposals is all very
well. It is necessary; but it is not sufficient. We – and, in
particular, activists of all persuasions – bandy around words like
‘sustainability,’ ‘community,’ ‘solidarity,’ ‘ecology,’ ‘peace,’ ‘human
rights’ and ‘freedom.’ And yet, we so often become uncomfortable or even
dismissive if asked, ‘what motivates you?’, ‘how do you remain committed
to social change?’, ‘why bother?’, or even ‘how’s life with you?’

These questions are so often deemed irrelevant to political activism and
organising; an impediment, or simply a distraction, to the primary task
of confronting state-corporate power or building a movement from the
ground up. Why is it considered strong to be driven by anger at
injustices in the world, but considered weak to take time out to examine
ourselves and what it takes to make us cry, laugh, sad, happy, enthused
or fulfilled?

Something my father once said struck me: ‘Nobody asked to be brought
into this world.’ This was in the context of how difficult life can be
and how, simple and saccharine as it may sound, we ought to look out for
each other. It is not a particularly original observation, of course,
but at that moment it really resonated with me.³⁴ Life can be hard; even
for us in the ‘privileged’ and ‘rich’ countries of the West. The fact is
we all, at some time, encounter stress, heartache, illness, frustration
and ennui; perhaps depression and even despair. We should recognise
these all too human frailties and afflictions in each other without
scorn or discomfort, and without regarding it as a distraction from the
political project of building a just and peaceful society. In fact,
rather than regarding such issues as a distraction, they should be
recognised as utterly central to what we would like to achieve: true
peace, freedom and happiness.

‘Go Ahead, Make My Day!’

From the first day when a baby realises that she is a separate entity
from her mother, there is a striving to reproduce that primary tie; to
connect with other individuals, and with human society as a whole. As
the German psychologist Erich Fromm explained so well, the fear of being
alone, of being an atomised individual in society, underlies the fear of
genuine freedom: not so much freedom from things, such as poverty,
repetitive work or damaging relationships; but the freedom to do things,
to take responsibility for one’s actions and thoughts, to cut the
umbilical cord of dependency on ‘higher’ forms of authority, and to grow
as a fully-integrated person.

The consequences of this fear can be harmful indeed: ‘in our effort to
escape from aloneness and powerlessness,’ wrote Fromm, ‘we are ready to
get rid of our individual self either by submission to new forms of
authority or by a compulsive conforming to accepted patterns.’³⁵ From
there it is a slippery slope to simply knuckling under, getting on with
life, doing whatever our ‘benign’ leaders want, or simply letting them
get on with whatever it is they do; whether it be handing over yet more
public resources and power to corporations, introducing ever more
draconian legislation to protect domestic ‘security,’ or pulverising yet
another already impoverished and devastated nation.

I was motivated to put these thoughts down, partly because of an
exchange with someone I had on email following the launch of the US-UK
attacks on Afghanistan in October 2001. My correspondent is a decent
person, a loving father, and someone with strong environmentalist
leanings. And yet he told me: ‘The world isn’t fair, never has been,
never will be, and it’s survival of the fittest whether we like it or
not, so if we want to survive and maintain our pampered life-styles, we
stay the fittest – and that doesn’t necessarily mean the nicest if
you’re not part of our tribe.’ I was quite taken aback by this outburst.

I suspect, and it would admittedly be hard to verify this, that such a
cynical ‘pragmatic’ view is held by a far greater number of Westerners
than we might like to think. It is a selfish notion that seems to accord
with Darwinian evolution with its dictate of ‘survival of the fittest.’
Applied inappropriately to human societies, it seems to imply that
‘might is right.’ On this view, competition is what drives human
behaviour; or, at the very least, it is a major component in human
makeup. Compassion, altruism and kindness are but evolutionary
adaptations, so we are told, that improved our fitness to survive and
flourish. As psychologist Steven Pinker puts it: ‘Family feelings are
designed to help our genes replicate themselves.’³⁶ In other words, we
might put ourselves out for a close relative, to the extent of risking
our lives to save him or her, but we would be less likely to do so for
someone not related to us, goes the argument. Pinker adds that the
‘tragedy of reciprocal altruism is that sacrifices on behalf of
nonrelatives cannot survive without a web of disagreeable emotions like
anxiety, mistrust, guilt, shame, and anger.’³⁷

For example, we might well feel anxious about, and even angry towards,
individuals who take unfair advantage of our kindly acts in order to
accrue benefits for themselves. This may be as simple as feeling
resentful at having had one’s colleague round to our home not just once,
but twice, and still not having received a dinner invitation in return!
Or, to use Pinker’s examples: gaining from, but not contributing to, the
public good, such as hunting animals for food, building a lighthouse
that keeps everyone’s ships off the rocks, or banding together to invade
neighbours’ territories or to repel their invasions.

A successful thriving society requires cooperation and a measure of
trust and honour between its members. Those who cheat are an unfair
burden on society, and ‘law-abiding’ members of the group must punish
them. Otherwise cheaters could end up destroying the cohesion, even the
very survival, of the whole group. Consequently, says Pinker, anger
‘evolved from systems for aggression and was recruited to implement the
cheater-punishment strategy demanded by reciprocal altruism.’³⁸

But is this depiction of anger as beneficial, providing evolutionary
advantages, entirely accurate? Psychologist Martin Seligman, pioneer of
the burgeoning field of positive psychology, cautions: ‘We deem it
honest, just, and even healthy to express our anger. So we shout, we
protest, and we litigate. “Go ahead, make my day,” warns Dirty Harry.
Part of the reason we allow ourselves this luxury is that we believe the
psychodynamic theory of anger. If we don’t express our rage, it will
come out elsewhere – even more destructively, as in cardiac disease. But
this theory turns out to be false; in fact, the reverse is true.
Dwelling on trespass and the expression of anger produces more cardiac
disease and more anger.’³⁹

Anne Harrington, a science historian at Harvard University, points out
the systematic failings of science in the investigation of deep human
values such as altruism and compassion. These values tend to be simply
eliminated from scientific analysis, says Harrington: ‘Historically, the
more deeply our sciences have probed reality, the less relevant concepts
like compassion become. Behind altruism is strategizing for genetic
fitness.’ In other words, as psychologist Daniel Goleman adds, the
scientific reduction of altruism to notions of ‘genetic fitness’ is ‘how
evolutionary theory explains away such selflessness.’⁴⁰

Evolutionary theory is, of course, one of the most successful scientific
theories of all times. But one must be careful in using it to ‘explain’
human qualities, particularly if such explanations are one-sided. We
will look at this again in the final chapter. For now, let us bear in
mind Seligman’s wise words: ‘I believe that evolution has favored both
good and bad traits, and any number of adaptive roles in the world have
selected for morality, cooperation, altruism, and goodness, just as any
number have also selected for murder, theft, self-seeking, and
terrorism.’⁴¹

Seligman explicitly rejects pessimistic depictions of selfish human
nature, or of anger being innate. This approach, he argues, is
scientifically unsound: ‘Current dogma may say that negative motivation
is fundamental to human nature and positive motivation merely derives
from it, but I have not seen a shred of evidence that compels us to
believe this […] This dual-aspect view that positive and negative traits
are equally authentic and fundamental is the basic motivational premise
of Positive Psychology.’⁴²

Letting Go of Old Bad Habits by Focusing on Others

Returning now to the individual, it is all too easy for personal
attitudes to be shaped by our own narrow bundle of inwardly-directed
anxieties. The German philosopher Ernst Cassirer expressed it well: ‘We
live much more in our doubts and fears, our anxieties and hopes about
the future, than in our recollections or in our present experiences.’⁴³

Fear and anxiety so often dominate our reaction to people and the world
around us. Isn’t this terribly sad? By looking primarily inwards, at our
own problems, which thus tend to multiply and magnify, we can too easily
become attached to feelings of negativity, even misery. This almost
becomes a medal of honour, a bundle of suffering that we must carry
around on our backs wherever we go; excess baggage that we are loath to
set down.

As psychotherapist Howard Cutler notes: ‘When it comes down to it, many
of us resist giving up our misery – a vexing and baffling feature of
human behavior I often observed in the past when treating psychotherapy
patients. As miserable as some people might be, for many there is a kind
of perverse pleasure in the self-righteous indignation one feels when
one is treated unfairly. We hold on to our pain, wear it like a badge,
it becomes part of us and we are reluctant to give it up. After all, at
least our characteristic ways of looking at the world are familiar.
Letting go of our customary responses, as destructive as they may be,
may seem frightening, and often that fear abides on a deeply ingrained
subconscious level.’⁴⁴

That fear of letting go of our habitual tendencies can be conquered, or
at least assuaged, by focusing on the needs of others, rather than our
own. Seligman says simply: ‘When we are happy, we are less self-focused,
we like others more, and we want to share our good fortune even with
strangers. When we are down, though, we become distrustful, turn inward,
and focus defensively on our own needs. Looking out for number one is
more characteristic of sadness than of well-being.’⁴⁵

On the other hand, Seligman points out the evolutionary role of positive
emotions: ‘They broaden our abiding intellectual, physical, and social
resources, building up reserves we can draw upon when a threat or
opportunity presents itself. When we are in a positive mood, people like
us better, and friendship, love, and coalitions are more likely to
cement. In contrast to the constrictions of negative emotion, our mental
set is expansive, tolerant, and creative. We are open to new ideas and
new experience.’⁴⁶

The conscious effort to undertake small acts of kindness for others is a
good place to start. Though such acts may initially feel somewhat
forced, it is worth the effort to weaken the fears, doubts and anxieties
that afflict us all. It is a simple and fun pragmatic scientific
experiment, at minimal cost, that anyone can try.⁴⁷ As Stefan Einhorn
observes in The Art of Being Kind: ‘Next time you are wondering whether
to mind your own business, ask yourself: If it isn’t my business, whose
it? Whose task is it to be a fellow human being?’⁴⁸

When to begin? Now! As Marcus Aurelius wisely observed: ‘there is a
limit to the time assigned you, and if you don’t use it to free yourself
it will be gone and will never return.’⁴⁹


10

 


Freedom at Last?

 

  A young monk asked the Master, ‘How can I ever get emancipated?’ The
  Master replied, ‘Who has ever put you in bondage?’

  Advaita lesson¹

 

My dad was a Post Office telephone engineer following his period of
national service in the 1950s. It was a job he enjoyed. He worked in a
number of telephone exchanges which no longer exist or have been
converted into offices in or near Glasgow: Clydebank, Duntocher,
Maryhill and Govan. Part of the job’s attraction was the relative
autonomy he had. Solving problems – fixing apparatus involving relays,
fuses and cables – was a welcome challenge. On top of that, there was a
healthy dose of camaraderie amongst the engineers and other employees. A
few, like my dad, were interested in left-wing politics, and that played
a part in his ongoing education as much as learning about telephony. But
he always hankered after university, an opportunity that had eluded him,
partly due to bouts of poor health when at secondary school. Then,
around the late 1960s, an opportunity arose. With a shortage of good
teachers, the government was trying to encourage people from industry to
consider a career in teaching. Financial support was available to attend
university and then train for a certificate of education to teach in
secondary schools.

Dad had been interested in nature, the countryside and geology ever
since he used to take bicycle trips in the 1940s to Loch Lomond and the
Trossachs with friends from Knightswood, a suburb on the northwest of
Glasgow where he grew up.² It was a wrench to leave a promising career
as a telephone engineer, but it was a chance he felt compelled to grab.
And so he ended up as a mature student of geography at Glasgow
University in 1970. He was not yet thirty-five which seems quite young
to me now! I was eight and Kenneth, my brother, was five.

For some reason I’ve never quite fathomed, we moved from Cumbernauld to
Barrhead just before dad started his degree course. Supposedly the
commuting was easier from Barrhead; maybe it’s marginally quicker. But,
ironically, we ended up back in Cumbernauld several years later and I
commuted to Glasgow University every day from there. Mum worked hard at
various part-time jobs through dad’s spell at university to help make up
for the drop in income. He was thoroughly in his element as a student,
particularly when it came to physical geography and geology, enhancing
his appreciation of the Scottish countryside; something that he passed
on to Kenneth and me.

Regulating the University Mind

Dad used to take us to the Glasgow University campus in the west end of
the city, just off Byres Road in Hillhead. Gilbert Scott’s Gothic
creation, fulfilling its mundane task as the main university
administration building, sits atop Gilmorehill, overlooking the
Kelvingrove Art Gallery and Museum and the west end of Glasgow, then
further afield to the hill ranges of the Campsies and Kilpatricks, and
beyond to the Highlands. These remain awe-inspiring views. It felt like
another world when wandering around those lovely Victorian buildings on
campus, soaking up the atmosphere of history and learning, and imagining
being a student there one day.

We would walk through the quadrangles to find the university bookshop
or, better still, climb the winding staircase to the Hunterian museum
with its marvellous collection of rocks, minerals, fossils, coins and
other treasures, including Roman artefacts found locally. Yes, the
Romans made it this far north, beyond Hadrian’s Wall; traces of the
Antonine Wall across central Scotland can still be seen to this day. To
an impressionable youngster, the world’s horizons were expanded beyond
my imagination. No wonder, despite toying with the idea of studying
elsewhere, I ended up a student in the same place a few years later.

Four years of studying physics and astronomy and, no mean feat this, how
best to evade the persistent hawkers of the Socialist Worker newspaper
on the steps leading up to the Queen Margaret students’ union. I hope
they are still there to this day; perhaps the sons and daughters of my
generation.

Twenty years ago, as mentioned earlier in this book, I moved back from
industry, ending a career with Shell as an exploration geophysicist, to
a university environment. Higher education is increasingly under
pressure to build links with commercial interests and to develop a
culture of ‘entrepreneurship,’ while boosting student numbers (think of
all those lovely big fees they have to pay now) and maintaining
standards of excellence in research and teaching.

I didn’t realise it then, back when I was an undergraduate in the 1980s,
but now I can see that universities and other institutions of higher
learning are even more important than I had realised. This is a
privileged sector where critical thought and enquiry into human society,
the natural world and the cosmos ought to be the norm; not where
overwhelming pressure to conform to state-corporate interests should be
exerted on teaching and research agendas.

How can academic ‘collaboration’ with large corporations which are,
after all, centralised systems of illegitimate power, not lead to
compromise, distortion or worse? It is clearly not in the interests of
such institutions to promote rational and honest study into the problems
of a corporate-shaped society. It is in their interests to commandeer
publicly-funded research while co-opting supposedly neutral and
objective academia as ‘partners.’ And all the better if highly trained
university researchers working in narrow, focused disciplines remain
disconnected from the interests of academics in other disciplines or,
more importantly, from the concerns of the general populace.

‘To work on a real problem (like how to eliminate poverty in a nation
producing eight hundred billion dollars’ worth of wealth each year) one
would have to follow that problem across many disciplinary lines without
qualm, dealing with historical materials, economic theories, political
obstacles,’ observed historian Howard Zinn, author of The People’s
History of the United States, who died in 2010.³ ‘Specialisation ensures
that one cannot follow a problem through from start to finish. It
ensures the functioning in the academy of the system’s dictum: divide
and rule.’ Zinn provided a potent example: ‘Note how little work is done
in political science on the tactics of social change. Both students and
teacher deal with theory and reality in separate courses; the
compartmentalisation safely neutralises them.’⁴

Any management vision of how the university sector, or any place of
higher education, ought to develop that does not recognise the nature of
the iniquitous capitalist society in which the university finds itself
embedded is short-sighted. And, moreover, any such ‘vision’ that is not
committed to making radical changes in the way society is structured is
tacitly, if not actively, supporting the status quo. The same argument
applies to any major institution in society.

As mentioned, universities are under increasing pressure to commit to
commercialisation of research and innovation. But this is not matched by
any stated commitment to the right to dissent or express scepticism
about working with transnational corporations or, indeed, any commitment
to undertake critical studies of the dominance of elite state-corporate
forces in society. If the latter is not an issue of serious university
concern, the silence could, and should, be interpreted as going along
with an inequitable system of economics that supports global poverty,
military terror and environmental devastation.

There is considerable evidence that ‘commercialisation’ of university
research is, in fact, a public subsidy for private interests.⁵ Should we
not be concerned by any public perception that universities are
providing intellectual support for corporate usurpation of the global
commons, and state violence carried out by the powerful nations of the
West?

‘When in the ancient world the whole economic structure was based on
personal slavery, the greatest intellects did not notice it,’ wrote Leo
Tolstoy. ‘To Xenophon and Plato and Aristotle and to the Romans it
seemed that things could not be otherwise, and that slavery was an
inevitable and natural outcome of wars without which the existence of
humanity was unthinkable.’⁶

The typical university intellectual of today is too often largely
ignorant of, or silent about, the personal slavery upon which today’s
global economic structure is built. Perhaps this is unsurprising given
that, as sober professionals, academics are not supposed to step outside
constrained fields of knowledge to criticise the private interests that
threaten the global climate system, push for war and inflict mass human
rights violations. Professionals are supposed to restrict public
statements to topics that do not reflect badly on their employers or
funding sources. But adopting such an ‘impartial,’ ‘apolitical’ role
ensures acquiescence in a state capitalist society that is built upon
greed, violence and ignorance.

The Disciplined Professional

Zinn noted that the centralisation of political power and corporate
wealth ensures that the universities ‘produce people who will fit into
existing niches in the social structure rather than try to change the
structure… These larger interests [established power] are internalized
in the motivations of the scholar: promotion, tenure, higher salaries,
prestige – all of which are best secured by innovating in prescribed
directions.’ This occurs not as the result of any grand conspiracy, ‘but
through the mechanism of a well-oiled system, just as the irrationality
of the economic system operates not through any devilish plot but
through the profit motive and the market…’⁷

It is difficult to put one’s head above the parapet for fear of
contravening terms and conditions of employment, or out of simple fear
of approbation or ridicule. Take just one very minor example from my own
experience. A few years ago, when I was still working at the National
Oceanography Centre, I forwarded an email from a colleague on the main
campus of the University of Southampton, asking for volunteers to
monitor a military exercise that would be taking place in and around the
docks which is where NOC is based. I was reprimanded, politely but
firmly, by the Centre’s director because, by the terms of my employment
with the Natural Environment Research Council, my action constituted
unacceptable political activity while at work.

Here’s another example. In 2002, Mark Levene, a friend and historian at
the University of Southampton, and I set up the Forum For The Study Of
Crisis In The 21^(st) Century, or ‘Crisis Forum’ for short.⁸ This brings
together activists and academics to analyse the nature of the global
crisis facing humanity, with the twin threats of climate change and
nuclear annihilation being two very visible symptoms; and to help
empower ‘ordinary’ people to surmount this crisis. By its very nature,
the Crisis Forum is interdisciplinary, bringing people together with
numerous overlapping skills and interests. But obtaining funds for this
initiative from any of the UK’s research councils proved a fruitless
affair. This is a familiar story, of course, which has seen countless
good causes appeal to corporate sources for grant money, struggle on a
shoestring budget or simply fold.

Jeff Schmidt, a former editor at Physics Today, examined the whole
intriguing phenomenon of conformity and obedience to power in an
excellent book called Disciplined Minds. The ‘qualifying attitude’ of a
disciplined professional is, he writes, ‘an uncritical, subordinate one,
which allows professionals to take their ideological lead from their
employers and appropriately fine-tune the outlook that they bring to
their work. The resulting professional is an obedient thinker, an
intellectual property whom employers can trust to experiment, theorize,
innovate and create safely within the confines of an assigned ideology.
The political and intellectual timidity of today’s most highly educated
employees is no accident.’⁹

This applies very much to academics, a highly privileged class of
professionals after all, who ‘generally avoid the risk inherent in real
critical thinking and cannot properly be called critical thinkers. They
are simply ideologically disciplined thinkers.’ Although not excluding
scientists and engineers, Schmidt’s focus here is on those in arts and
humanities departments in universities: ‘Real critical thinking means
uncovering and questioning social, political and moral assumptions;
applying and refining a personally developed worldview; and calling for
action that advances a personally created agenda… Ideologically
disciplined thinkers, especially the more gung-ho ones, often give the
appearance of being critical thinkers as they go around deftly applying
the official ideology and confidently reporting their judgments.’¹⁰

The silence and acquiescence of academics is a significant obstacle to
peace and justice. This is because their research and teaching fit into
a grand narrative where the essentially benign motives of governments
tend to be taken for granted, and where radical challenges to the
establishment are frowned upon (so thank goodness for students and staff
who are currently participating in various protest movements). The
historian Mark Curtis, whom we have met several times before in this
book, notes: ‘It still amazes me how many people in NGO [nongovernmental
organisation] circles, where I have often worked, retain essentially
liberal outlooks – prepared to accept that reform within the existing
system is the only required, or possible, strategy and often barely
aware of the ideological role of the mainstream media. Governments are
often still viewed in good faith and their public claims accepted,
rather than being automatically dismissed or even questioned, as I think
should be the default position. This outlook is based partly on
knowledge, which is not surprising given the silence of academics and
mainstream media reporting. It may be partly due to fears of the
consequences at the workplace of adopting a more “radical”
perspective.’¹¹ But these fears, while partly understandable, have
significant repercussions for those on the receiving end of brutal state
power. As Edward Herman rightly noted in the aftermath of the first Gulf
War: ‘it is the function of experts and the mainstream media to
normalize the unthinkable for the general public.’¹²

In truth, being a neutral, impartial and apolitical ‘professional’ is
impossible. Not to challenge the status quo is to countenance the misery
of fellow human beings in Afghanistan, Iraq, Palestine and here at home
in our poorest, neglected neighbour-hoods. To ignore the might of the
military establishment is to boost terror at home and abroad. To remain
silent in the face of the corporate hijacking of the energy economy is
to bow before possibly terminal climate catastrophe. Perhaps if
academics – and ‘professionals’ generally – took a stronger, more
critical stance on state and corporate policies, we would take one small
step closer to a world based on peace, wisdom and compassion.

Predatory Urges, Plastic Brains and Empowerment

I once received an email from a Media Lens reader quoting Curtis’s
accurate observations that: ‘Britain is a major, systematic contributor
to much of the world’s suffering and horrors and this contribution
arises from the basic economic and political priorities that governments
pursue at home and abroad. These fundamental policy stances are the
result of planning broadly determined by the domestic structures of
society which define “national interests.”’¹³

But the emailer suggested that such horrors were sadly unsurprising,
even inevitable. His reasoning ran as follows: ‘in our highly “civilized
cultures” our predatory nature manifests itself in theft, murder,
manipulation, abuse, and other sociopathic behavior.’ There is a strong
innate tendency, ran his argument, for governments to prey on each other
as well as individuals; a tendency that stems directly from the
predatory instinct in humans. In short: ‘We are hopelessly enslaved to
our DNA’s predatory urges.’

This is the classic depiction of our species as ‘killer ape,’ the term
popularised in the 1950s by Robert Ardrey, an American journalist and
anthropologist. In 1966, the book On Aggression by animal behaviourist
Konrad Lorenz became a bestseller. Lorenz believed that irrational human
passions, such as cruelty and blood lust, underpin an innate destructive
trend in human nature that leads inexorably to wars. Ardrey’s and
Lorenz’s views were echoed more recently by philosopher John Gray when
he described humans in his book Straw Dogs as ‘weapon-making animals
with an unquenchable fondness for killing.’¹⁴

Richard Davidson and Anne Harrington note that this mischaracterisation
of our species has been ‘the dominant note of the biobehavioral sciences
in the West.’ It is a ‘tragic-machismo’ approach that focuses on ‘our
potential for violence, explor[ing] the genetic and biochemical bases of
our capacity for selfishness, depression, and anxiety.’¹⁵ Erich Fromm
warned that the real factors behind war were overlooked in such an
approach, noting that Lorenz’s book ‘appeals to the thinking of many
people today who prefer to believe that our drift towards violence and
nuclear war is due to biological factors beyond our control, rather than
to open their eyes and see that it is due to social, political and
economic circumstances of our own making.’¹⁶

So we have to be cautious not to make categorical statements about human
nature, particularly any flawed and sweeping thesis of humans as
predatory ‘killer apes.’ In fact, the Dutch psychologist and
primatologist Frans de Waal dismisses the thesis as ‘veneer theory,’
pointing out, in particular, that: ‘War is not an insuppressible urge.
It is an option.’¹⁷ In de Waal’s view there has been an over-emphasis in
modern culture on the view ‘that we have selfish genes, that human
goodness is a sham, and that we act morally only to impress others.’ De
Waal continues: ‘But if all that people care about is their own good,
why does a day-old baby cry when it hears another baby cry? This is how
empathy starts. Not very sophisticated perhaps, but we can be sure that
a newborn doesn’t try to impress. We are born with impulses that draw us
to others and that later in life make us care about them.’¹⁸ And Fromm
notes: ‘Human nature is not fixed, and culture thus is not to be
explained as the result of fixed human instincts; nor is culture a fixed
factor to which human nature adapts itself passively and completely.’¹⁹

It is dubious practice to identify attributes of society, such as
rapacious capitalist behaviour, with supposed fixed characteristics of
the human species such as innate aggression. Fromm cautions: ‘Human
nature can never be observed as such, but only in its specific
manifestations in specific situations.’²⁰ Indeed, Fromm developed the
concept of ‘social character’ to describe this interaction between one’s
individual character and the society in which one is embedded. Fromm
explains: ‘The average family is the “psychic agency” of society, and by
adjusting himself to his family the child acquires the character which
later makes him adjusted to the tasks he has to perform in social life.
He acquires that character which makes him want to do what he has to do
and the core of which he shares with most members of the same social
class or culture. The fact that most members of a social class or
culture share significant elements of character, and that one can speak
of a “social character” representing the core of a character structure
common to most people of a given culture, shows the degree to which
character is formed by social and cultural patterns.’²¹

In Fromm’s powerful holistic analysis, then, human aggressiveness is not
an isolated behavioural trait, but part of a syndrome linking individual
and society in which aggression is found together with other traits in
the system such as strict hierarchy, dominance, class division and so
on. But not all societies throughout history have been marked by such
hierarchies, divisions and aggression. There are examples, too, of
societies characterised largely by cooperation, trust and altruism.²²
Summarising the available archaeological and anthropological evidence,
anthropologist Richard Lee notes: ‘Before the rise of the state and the
entrenchment of social inequality, people lived for millennia in
small-scale kin-based social groups, in which the core institutions of
economic life included collective or common ownership of land and
resources, generalised reciprocity in the distribution of food, and
relatively egalitarian political relations.’²³

Psychologist Steve Taylor argues in The Fall that large groups of
humanity underwent a collective psychological shift around 6000 years
ago as a result of severe environmental changes which began in the
Middle East and central Asia. In the resultant desperate struggle for
survival, an ‘Ego Explosion’ saw the rise of people with a more defined
sense of individuality and a pronounced technological outlook. But it
also led to social pathologies like male domination, social inequality
and warfare. The evidence, says Taylor, suggests that: ‘early human
beings, and the native peoples who have survived until recent times, had
a more unified and peaceful kind of psyche than us, and lived in a state
of relative contentment. Many anthropologists have been struck by the
apparent serenity of native peoples.’²⁴

In short, human nature is dynamic, displaying considerable variations
according to circumstances and context, rather than being fixed,
predetermined or static. The depiction of homo sapiens as ‘predatory’ is
therefore one-dimensional; or worse, plain wrong.

The Multidimensional Human Being

Predatory urges are part of humanity’s makeup; but so too are
cooperation, empathy and love. Psychologist Steven Pinker, who at times
strains to emphasise the importance of our DNA in ‘explaining’ human
nature, notes also that there is ‘an evolutionary basis for altruism.’
He observes that ‘sociobiology shows that a sense of justice has a deep
foundation in people’s minds.’²⁵ Pinker adds: ‘evolution endowed us with
a moral sense, and we have expanded its circle of application over the
course of history through reason (grasping the logical
interchangeability of our interests and others’), knowledge (learning of
the advantages of cooperation over the long term), and having sympathy
(having experiences that allow us to feel other people’s pain).’²⁶

In a similar vein, evolutionary expert Elliott Sober points out that:
‘biologists now universally acknowledge that altruism can evolve and
actually has done so. The picture of nature as thoroughly red in tooth
and claw is one-sided. It is no more adequate than the rosy picture that
everything is sweetness and light. Kindness and cruelty both have their
place in nature, and evolutionary biology helps explain why.’²⁷ Sober
highlights the evolutionary success of cooperation: ‘Groups of altruists
do better than groups of selfish individuals, so altruism can evolve,
even though selfish individuals do better than altruists in the same
group.’²⁸

This may have been the evolutionary seed for the development of
compassion, even if altruistic behaviour was at first directed towards
one’s offspring only. But how was compassion later extended to much
wider circles in human society, even encompassing complete strangers?
Sober puts the question thus: ‘it is not puzzling why some compassion
should evolve and replace the trait of having no compassion at all; what
is puzzling is how extended compassion could evolve and replace limited
compassion.’²⁹ He offers the possible explanation that the capacity to
feel extended compassion is correlated with the capacity to feel
compassion toward one’s offspring; there was an adaptive advantage in
parents being moved by the cries of their children. A side effect of
this ‘evolutionary event’ is that the cries of any baby can move us.³⁰

To emphasise what Sober is saying: the development of extended
compassion, which may confer no adaptive benefit of its own, is,
nonetheless, consistent with the theory of evolution. If this still
seems puzzling, consider an enlightening argument that Charles Darwin
had with Alfred Russel Wallace, the scientist who independently proposed
the mechanism of natural selection. As Sober explains, Wallace’s view
was that ‘natural selection cannot explain mental abilities that provide
no help in surviving and reproducing.’ For example, keen eyesight is
useful in hunting, but why should natural selection favour the ability
to devise new scientific theories, write symphonies or paint
masterpieces? Wallace argued that natural selection could explain
practical skills, not ‘higher’ abilities. But Darwin countered that the
separation of ‘practical’ and ‘higher’ abilities is an illusion; the
same mental abilities that helped our ancestors survive and reproduce
now allow us to pursue intellectual activities that may have no
practical benefit.³¹ Extended compassion likely developed as such a
‘higher’ ability. There is also a growing body of evidence that
developing and practising compassion has practical benefits, both for
others and for oneself, including a significant reduction in stress
levels and a boost to one’s well-being.³²

Escaping Our Hardwiring

The American civil rights activist Malcolm X once observed that, as
adults, we can become locked into static patterns of thought and
behaviour that cut off options for individual growth, renewal and
empowerment: ‘Children have a lesson adults should learn, to not be
ashamed of failing, but to get up and try again. Most of us adults are
so afraid, so cautious, so “safe,” and therefore so shrinking and rigid
and afraid that it is why so many humans fail. Most middle-aged adults
have resigned themselves to failure.’³³

It’s a cogent observation, offering the potential for improvement and
empowerment. And it’s backed by evidence. A major finding in
neuroscience in recent years is the extent to which our brains display
advanced levels of ‘neural plasticity.’ We are not forever hardwired for
rigid modes of behaviour; we are not static slaves to our DNA. There is
a remarkable degree to which we can change ingrained patterns of
thought, intention and practice.

Psychologist Daniel Goleman addresses this in an inspiring book,
Destructive Emotions And How We Can Overcome Them.³⁴ In the first
chapter, Goleman presents remarkable results from experiments into the
mental traits of a Buddhist monk who focused on generating a state of
compassion during meditation. The monk’s brain patterns were monitored
during this meditation. The research, conducted by Richard Davidson of
the University of Wisconsin, revealed high levels of activity in the
monk’s left prefrontal cortex, the region of the brain associated with
positive states of mind such as zeal, enthusiasm, joy, vigour and mental
buoyancy. It appears that such enhanced levels of positive emotions can
be attained by conscious effort and discipline over years of meditation
practice.³⁵ The notion that we are ‘hopelessly enslaved to our predatory
urges’ is unfounded.

As well as insights into human nature from evolutionary science,
psychology and neurobiology, we can look at human history. There are, of
course, plenty of examples of horror, cruelty and violence. But
consider, too, the fundamental desires of people everywhere, throughout
history and across all cultures, for peace and freedom. As Zinn puts it:
‘People are not naturally violent or cruel or greedy, although they can
be made so. Human beings everywhere want the same things: they are moved
by the sight of abandoned children, homeless families, the casualties of
war; they long for peace, for friendship and affection across lines of
race and nationality.’³⁶

The person I mentioned earlier in this chapter who wrote to me about
humanity’s ‘predatory urges’ was right in one respect, however: that
people can, and do, combine to create oppressive institutions and
structures in society. The transnational corporation is one prominent
example, as are the powerful governments who act all too often as agents
for corporate interests. But there are people around the world who are
resisting these organs of brutal, illegitimate power. Zinn, once again,
offers wisdom and hope: ‘Only the corrective of historical perspective
can lighten our gloom. Note how often in this [20^(th)] century we have
been surprised. By the sudden emergence of a people’s movement, the
sudden overthrow of a tyranny, the sudden coming to life of a flame we
thought extinguished. We are surprised because we have not taken notice
of the quiet simmerings of indignation, of the first faint sounds of
protest, of the scattered signs of resistance that, in the midst of our
despair, portend the excitement of change.’³⁷

In short, there is an integral link between ‘lighten[ing] our gloom’ and
the potential for both personal and societal improvement. Just as we, as
individuals, are not hardwired for selfishness and aggression, so are
injustice and oppression not necessarily fixed features of human
society.

‘This is a Damn Good Show Tonight!’

In July 1943, the Allies undertook a series of bombing raids over
Hamburg that killed more than 45,000 people. The raids were so massive,
and the resultant heat so intense, that asphalt on the streets burst
into flame, people were cooked to death in air-raid shelters and
pedestrians were sucked off the pavements like leaves into a vacuum
cleaner. Eight square miles of the city were incinerated. The raids,
codenamed Operation Gomorrah, were later called the ‘Hiroshima of
Germany.’³⁸

Ted Groom, an RAF flight engineer in those raids told a reporter over
sixty years later: ‘Today, I would think “Poor sods.” But at the time,
when you’re young, you just think “Cor, this is a damn good show
tonight!” I never thought about them, because I could remember London,
Coventry and all these places. To me it was something that they’d asked
for.’³⁹

That defiant phrase, ‘something they’d asked for,’ has its roots in the
propaganda offensive that was unleashed on the home population in an
attempt to justify Allied atrocities during wartime. Leaders throughout
history have always argued that those fighting on the other side were
inferior creatures: ‘the Hun,’ ‘nips,’ ‘spooks,’ ‘wogs,’ ‘beasts,’
‘dogs’ and so on. In the Second World War, civilian populations found
themselves targeted for the first time. As the German writer Jorg
Friedrich explains, both the Nazis and the Allies argued that ‘the
cities and their production and their morale contributed to warfare. So
warfare is not simply the business of an army, it’s the business of a
nation. Therefore everyone is a target.’ Friedrich, author of The Fire:
the Bombing of Germany 1940-45, continues: ‘That is how Churchill and
Hitler changed the nature of warfare. That is what Bin Laden says. The
idea is we all deserve it. You and me and those German, British, and
Japanese civilians in the mass graves: they all deserve it.’⁴⁰

And yet, on 1 September 1939 – on the eve of war – US President
Roosevelt had sent out a letter to the governments of Germany, Poland,
Italy, France and the UK, pleading for civilian populations to be spared
from aerial bombardment: ‘The ruthless bombing from the air of civilians
in unfortified centers of population during the course of the
hostilities which have raged in various quarters of the earth during the
past few years, which has resulted in the maiming and in the death of
thousands of defenseless men, women, and children, has sickened the
hearts of every civilized man and woman, and has profoundly shocked the
conscience of humanity.’

Roosevelt continued: ‘I am therefore addressing this urgent appeal to
every government which may be engaged in hostilities publicly to affirm
its determination that its armed forces shall in no event, and under no
circumstances, undertake the bombardment from the air of civilian
populations of unfortified cities, upon the understanding that these
same rules of warfare will be scrupulously observed by all of their
opponents.’⁴¹

Less than one year later, the fine words had been all but forgotten and
‘total war’ was underway. No British cities had yet been bombed, but
already a case for ‘retaliatory bombing of Germany’ was being prepared.
Winston Churchill asked the new minister of information, Duff Cooper, to
‘arrange that discreet reference should be made in the press to the
killing of civilians in France and the Low Countries, in the course of
German air attacks.’ However, the press should not actually mention
British retaliation. On 15 May 1940, Permanent Under-Secretary Cadogan
wrote in his diary: ‘Cabinet this morning decided to start bombing Ruhr.
Now the “Total War” begins!’⁴²

It takes constant propaganda, backed by the hard sell of ‘patriotism’
and professed commitment to ‘freedom’ and ‘democracy,’ to enable states
to fight wars. Pacifism in the face of Hitler’s forces was simply no
good: ‘If you let the Nazis kill everyone, you allowed civilization to
be destroyed’ was the dominant view. In reply, the writer Christopher
Isherwood argued that: ‘Civilization dies anyhow of blood poisoning the
moment it takes up its enemies’ weapons and exchanges crime for
crime.’⁴³

Gandhi, too, rejected the notion of fighting violence with violence. A
Dutch correspondent had written to him saying that ‘Nazi youths had
become machines. Nonviolent methods were hopeless against robots.’
Gandhi disagreed. ‘No man can be turned into a permanent machine.
Immediately the dead weight of authority is lifted from his head, he
begins to function normally.’⁴⁴

Even when there is massive public resistance to war, such as was seen in
the build-up to the West’s 2003 attack on Iraq, influential institutions
such as the mass media and academia do not stray far from the
state-sanctioned line. They do not need to be told. As George Orwell
once explained: ‘Circus dogs jump when the trainer cracks his whip, but
the really well-trained dog is the one that turns his somersault when
there is no whip.’⁴⁵

The insidious patriotic propaganda is often subtle. Take the BBC’s
Martin Bell, for instance. He praised the stoicism of British forces
stationed in Iraq: ‘The troops just get on with it. They always have.
They always will.’⁴⁶ I emailed Bell, pointing out that twenty years ago
the Soviet press no doubt said very similar things about Soviet troops
stationed in Afghanistan.⁴⁷ I asked him: ‘How does your BBC article
differ from those old Soviet news pieces?’ Bell didn’t respond.

Robert Fisk, the veteran reporter of The Times and then the Independent,
who has seen more than his fair share of wars, sums up how it works: ‘We
bomb. They suffer. Then we turn up and take pictures of their wounded
children.’⁴⁸

‘Just War’ or Just Another War?

For many, the Second World War was a ‘just war’: one fought for a
righteous cause. The evil of Nazism had to be defeated. The genocidal
slaughter of the Jews and other groups had to be stopped. But as Mark
Kurlansky observes in his book Nonviolence: ‘Contrary to popular postwar
claims, the Holocaust was not stopped by the war. In fact, it was
started by it.’⁴⁹

The escalating violence and chaos of war played a contributory role in
enabling the Nazi authorities to carry out the concentration and
extermination of millions of people in Europe. It is a myth that Allied
leaders and commanders were unaware of what was going on. Kurlansky
points out that formerly secret documents, since released, show that
Allied governments and military commanders ‘were well aware of the
genocide in progress and consciously chose not to interfere with it.’⁵⁰
British intelligence were deciphering and reading reports from death
camps as early as 1943. The postwar claim that the British and Americans
did not know what was happening is simply not true.

Following the end of the war, an unparalleled era of peace and
prosperity dawned. So goes received wisdom. Again, Kurlansky points out
the truth: ‘While the conventional thinking of the World War II
generation was that their war had secured the peace, albeit at a
tremendous cost, those who grew up in the postwar period understood that
there was no peace, that World War II had simply laid the groundwork for
the Cold War, which was an umbrella term for more than one hundred
shooting wars between 1945 and 1989.’⁵¹

The ‘Cold War’ encompassed the horrors of Indochina and Latin America in
which the hands of successive US governments were steeped in blood,
leaving millions dead and many more living in a kind of hell.

Kurlansky also rips apart the ‘just war’ basis of the eighteenth-century
American war of independence against Britain. The war was, like all
wars, cruel and bloody and avoidable. ‘The United States of America was
founded by a war,’ notes Kurlansky, ‘and so it needed to be a “good
war.” The creation of this founding myth, the rewriting of history,
began immediately after the war, while everyone with short-term memory
knew otherwise. Collective amnesia was a small further sacrifice for
nation building.’⁵²

Collective amnesia also facilitated the myth of the ‘founding fathers’:
Thomas Jefferson, James Madison and the other eighteenth-century
architects of the American state. These supposedly benign figures were
certainly not radicals: they perpetuated slavery and also laid the
groundwork for the later genocide of some ten million native peoples.⁵³
As historian Dee Brown observes in Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee: ‘the
policy makers in Washington invented Manifest Destiny, a term which
lifted land hunger to a lofty plane. The Europeans and their descendants
were ordained by destiny to rule all of America. They were the dominant
race and therefore responsible for the Indians – along with their lands,
their forests, and their mineral wealth.’⁵⁴

Native Americans often felt compelled to resist the white man’s
‘Manifest Destiny’ by retaliating with their own violence. But they were
hopelessly overwhelmed by the greater power of the invader-occupiers: a
pattern repeated endlessly throughout history and around the globe.
Kurlansky summarises: ‘In the vast history of European colonialism,
there are few incidents of non-violent resistance by indigenous people,
leaving unanswered the question of whether this would have worked. What
is unanswerable is that nothing they did try worked. The indigenous
people of five continents were facing an intractable enemy from a sixth
continent [Europe] that was convinced that they had the right to steal
the land on other continents and destroy the inhabitants as peoples and
cultures, and, in fact, that this was the proper thing to do. The
Europeans had not only the public and the clergy, but the
intelligentsia, the thinkers and philosophers, backing up their program
of genocide.’⁵⁵

‘A Saint is Less Dangerous than a Rebel’

For centuries, Western academics have provided the intellectual backing
for Western state power, human rights abuses and even atrocities. As
demanded by the requirements of growing European imperial power, much
intellectual effort was expended on rationalising war, colonialism and
slavery. Kurlanksy cites the example of Alberico Gentili, an Italian who
became an Oxford professor of civil law in the late sixteenth century.
Gentili developed the concept of defensive warfare to include the
principle of the pre-emptive strike which has proved so useful to the
aggressors of the present day. ‘No one ought to wait to be struck unless
he is a fool,’ Gentili wrote.⁵⁶

A lineage can be traced to the present era, in which academics – such as
Canada’s Michael Ignatieff (since turned politician) and Britain’s
Timothy Garton Ash – have provided sterling service to state power. Both
stood solidly behind the 1999 Nato bombing of Yugoslavia, with Garton
Ash wrongly declaring that the attack was intended to stop ‘something
approaching genocide.’⁵⁷ Ignatieff and Garton Ash, and others of their
ilk, are no rabid neo-conservatives; but instead are ostensibly
progressive, liberal commentators. They are part of the current tranche
of those enlightened souls who throughout history have performed a
useful service to the state: ‘the liberal defence of murder,’ to use the
apt phrase coined by writer Richard Seymour.⁵⁸

Edward Herman – who, as we saw above, deplores the dishonourable
intellectual task of ‘normalizing the unthinkable’⁵⁹ – notes that:
‘Ignatieff has swallowed [then president] Bush’s claim to be striving to
“bring freedom everywhere,” an ideological premise that allows him to
rationalize anything the Bush administration does externally because it
is in a noble cause – based solely on the fact that Bush says that that
is his aim.’⁶⁰

Garton Ash, a professor of European Studies at Oxford University, has
also been an ivory-tower cheerleader for dealing with Iran, although
backing away from dropping bombs this time: ‘Now we face the next big
test of the west: after Iraq, Iran.’ Overlooking that Iraq was not a
‘big test’ but the supreme international crime, Garton Ash was now
building up Iran as the next ‘threat,’ warning: ‘we in Europe and the
United States have to respond. But how?’⁶¹ That Europe and the United
States might, in fact, represent the biggest ‘threat’ to global peace is
unthinkable.

As well as intellectual brainpower, religion has been called into state
service. It is glaringly obvious that ostensibly Christian leaders,
notably Cameron, Brown, Blair, Obama and Bush, eschew Jesus’s teachings
on love, peace and nonviolence. In fact, they have trampled the
Christian message underfoot while pretending to exalt it. Bush and Blair
are known to have prayed together and Bush even claimed that he was
doing God’s bidding. This co-opting of religion by the state is embedded
in history, as Kurlanksy highlights: ‘Though most religions shun warfare
and hold nonviolence as the only moral route toward political change,
religion and its language have been co-opted by the violent people who
have been governing societies. If someone were to come along who would
not compromise, a rebel who insisted on taking the only moral path,
rejecting violence in all its forms, such a person would seem so
menacing that he would be killed, and after his death he would be
canonized or deified, because a saint is less dangerous than a rebel.
This has happened numerous times, but the first prominent example was a
Jew named Jesus.’⁶²

Jesus’s teachings on love, even love for one’s enemy, and the growing
band of admirers he accrued, were regarded as a severe threat by the
Roman authorities. In more modern times we saw a powerful example of
nonviolent resistance in Gandhi’s satyagraha (‘truth force’) movement.
This played a significant role in ousting British colonial power from
India, leading to independence in 1947. Kurlansky’s analysis of the
power of Gandhi’s philosophy and actions demands more space than this
discussion permits and the reader is strongly encouraged to get hold of
his book.

Time to Wake Up

My own reaction on reading Kurlanksy’s book, Nonviolence, was one of
strengthened hope; of realising the significant potential for opening up
new paths characterised by peaceful resistance.⁶³ There are alternatives
to present-day policies and priorities, all too often characterised by
violence, fear, greed, power and domination at all levels, from the
individual up to states and beyond. Sadly, the media typically report
violence and war as givens in life, even selling the supposed
attractions of the attendant adrenaline rush.

In one newspaper interview, Jeremy Bowen, now the BBC’s Middle East
editor, recounted his reaction on seeing his first corpse in 1989: ‘I
was still in my late twenties. I had seen dead bodies and heard shots
fired in anger for the first time and I was having fun. I was starting
to feel like a proper reporter.’⁶⁴

For Bowen, arriving on the battlefield marked the true start of his
career. He was, he admitted candidly, drawn to violent ‘hot spots’ in a
manner ‘reminiscent of that of a recovering crack cocaine addict.’
Indeed, he even referred to ‘the war drug.’ He felt ‘indestructible,’
‘elated and out of control,’ ‘merry and hysterical.’ Today, he
recognises he was ‘drinking a potentially lethal cocktail from a very
dangerous cup.’ As for young journalists ‘who hanker for the excitement
of the conflict zone,’ his advice is ‘Good luck to ’em.’ Bowen explains:
‘You make a name for yourself, you have some fantastic experiences, see
amazing things, live on the edge – for a young person that’s pretty
attractive. You can go to a place where there are no rules. I used to
love all that. You didn’t have to worry about paying the gas bill and
those mundane things. I used to take absolute pride in thinking, “I
don’t know what I’m doing next week.” I felt quite superior, if truth be
told, rather unattractively. I felt a bit smug and superior towards
people who plan their lives.’

Although Bowen himself is now an older and wiser man in this respect, he
is likely describing the mindset of the younger, supposedly objective
and dispassionate, reporters who appear in war zones on our screens
every day. This attitude is a vital persuasive element in the propaganda
matrix that churns out news and commentary, with a sheen of hi-tech
glamour, into the nation’s living rooms.

But there are hopeful signs of resisting the power of propaganda, even
by those who are literally in the front line, doing the bidding of their
political masters who sit comfortably back home. Kurlansky writes: ‘The
miracle is that despite films, books, television, toys, plaques on
buildings and monuments in parks, lessons in school, and the
encouragement of parents, most human beings enter the military with a
strong disposition against killing. It turns out that we are not built
for killing other people. The purpose of basic training is to brainwash
out this inhibition and turn the recruit into an efficient killer.’⁶⁵

Aaron Beck, the founder of cognitive therapy, notes that military
leaders recognise that intensive training is required to overcome the
inner resistance to pulling the trigger or thrusting the bayonet into
other human beings. Indeed, during both World Wars and then the Korean
War, most American infantrymen did not fire their guns when engaging the
enemy. The closer one is to the victim, moving from shelling and bombing
to throwing grenades and fighting hand to hand, the greater the
resistance to killing. Beck notes: ‘Recognition of the low firing rate
in previous wars induced the American army to initiate a formal program
of “deconditioning” during the Vietnam War. In addition to the standard
“kill, kill, kill” shouted by drill sergeants, the program called for
repeated practice in attacking the presented image of the Enemy – for
example, using realistic man-shaped targets on the shooting range. The
combination of physical, moral, and ideological distancing and the
activation of loyalty to the unit, commander, and company attenuated the
human image of the Enemy soldiers and allowed for the projection of a
diabolical image onto them.’⁶⁶

What is so remarkable is that some soldiers still reject this military
brainwashing. There are heartening examples, admittedly all too few, of
those who refuse to be complicit in state murder in Iraq, Afghanistan or
the occupied Palestinian territories, for instance. One of these brave
individuals is Jeremy Hinzman, a US war resister over Iraq, who was
clear: ‘I can’t bring myself to shoot another person. If people want to
criticize me for that, then I’m honoured to be criticized because I’m
not a killer.’⁶⁷

Claude Anshin Thomas, a US veteran of Vietnam who later became a
Buddhist monk, wrote of his training: ‘During basic training I was
taught to hate. On the firing range we were shooting at targets that
resembled people. We were learning to kill human beings. We had to be
taught how to do that – that is the work of the military.’⁶⁸ He added:
‘The enemy was everyone unlike me, everyone who was not an American
soldier. This conditioning is an essential ingredient in the creation of
a good soldier. Soldiers are trained to see anything other as dangerous,
threatening, and potentially deadly. You dehumanize the enemy. You
dehumanize yourself. My military training ultimately taught me to
dehumanize a whole race of people. There was no distinction between the
Vietcong, the regular Vietnamese army, and the Vietnamese general
population.’⁶⁹

Thomas described his journey though war and his efforts to cope with the
effects of war as a ‘pilgrimage’: ‘I’ve learned a great deal about
myself and about the human condition on pilgrimage. I’ve witnessed the
universality of suffering, how we all share the same essential problems,
and the devastating and long-lasting effects of violence and war. What
leads me to continue my practice is the most profound sense of
responsibility not to let any of the lives that have been lost in any
war be wasted. Those lives have been sacrificed to help us to wake up to
the senselessness of war. War is not something that happens externally
to us. In my understanding and in my experience, it is a collective
expression of individual suffering. If we want war stopped, then we must
wake up.’⁷⁰ Central to this process of waking up⁷¹ is a commitment to
nonviolence as an active force, not merely passive resistance:
‘Nonviolence means strongly standing up for truth and compassion in the
midst of confrontation – and doing so without aggression.’⁷²

In the foreword to Kurlansky’s book, the Dalai Lama also emphasises this
crucial active component of nonviolence: ‘I think it is important to
acknowledge here that nonviolence does not mean the mere absence of
violence. It is something more positive, more meaningful than that. The
true expression of nonviolence is compassion, which is not just a
passive emotional response, but a rational stimulus to action. To
experience genuine compassion is to develop a feeling of closeness to
others combined with a sense of responsibility for their welfare.’⁷³

And so, if we really want war to stop, if we want peace instead, we can
make it happen. It starts with each of us. It starts with you.


Notes

 

1. The Golden Rule of State Violence

  1 Noam Chomsky, Interventions, Penguin Books, London, 2007/2008, p.
  101.

  2 Leading article, ‘Can Britain regain its ethical role?’, Independent
  on Sunday, 11 September 2011.

  3 Noam Chomsky, ‘What we should have done after 9/11,’ Salon.com, 6
  September 2011; www.salon.com/2011/09/06/9_11_imperialism/

  4 Mark Curtis, Unpeople: Britain’s Secret Human Rights Abuses,
  Vintage, London, 2004, p.3

  5 Ibid., p. 3.

  6 Noam Chomsky, ‘The new war against terror,’ delivered at the
  Massachusetts Institute of Technology on 18 October 2001;
  www.chomsky.info/talks/20011018.htm. For video, see:
  www.youtube.com/watch?v=cvGszlFoa6M&feature=related#t=10m52s

  7 Mark Curtis, Web of Deceit: Britain’s Real Role in the World,
  Vintage, London, 2003, p. 94

  8 Mark Curtis, Secret Affairs: Britain’s Collusion with Radical Islam,
  Serpent’s Tail, London, 2010, p. x

  9 For an even longer historical view see the appropriately titled book
  by John Newsinger, The Blood Never Dried: A People’s History of the
  British Empire, Bookmarks Publications, London, 2006

  10 Edward Herman, Beyond Hypocrisy: Decoding the News in an Age of
  Propaganda, South End Press, Boston, 1992, p. 44

  11 George Orwell, ‘Notes on Nationalism,’ 1945;
  http://orwell.ru/library/essays/nationalism/english/e_nat

  12 Today, I would say that the interests of the poor are not so much
  being neglected, as trampled upon.

  13 Although the experienced environment writer Robert Edwards notes an
  inconsistency here with the SNP’s apparent support for nuclear-powered
  submarines: ‘SNP under fire for backing nuclear submarines on the
  Clyde,’ Sunday Herald, 11 September 2011;
  www.robedwards.com/2011/09/snp-under-fire-for-backing-nuclear-submarines-onthe-clyde.html

  14 ‘Carbuncle Awards, Scotland,’ Glasgow Architecture website,
  www.glasgowarchitecture.co.uk/carbuncle_awards.htm; accessed 19
  December 2011

  15 BBC online, ‘Cumbernauld wins carbuncle award,’ 21 November 2001,
  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/scotland/1667935.stm; accessed 22 June 2009

  16 Lest the attempt at gentle humour fall flat, let me make clear that
  I had a happy childhood! Let me also clarify the chronology here: we
  moved from Cumbernauld to Barrhead in 1969. We then moved back to
  Cumbernauld in 1974, where my dad had his first teaching position,
  just before I started at Our Lady’s High secondary school

  17 George Jones and Jonathan Petre, ‘Bloody Sunday: Full inquiry, cost
  £400m. July 7 bombs: No inquiry, “too expensive,”’ Daily Telegraph, 5
  July 2006

  18 Niall Ó Dochartaigh, ‘Politics of Bloody Sunday left untold,’
  Guardian website, 16 June 2010;
  www.guardian.co.uk/commentisfree/2010/jun/16/bloody-sunday-saville-inquiry

  19 Chris Harman, A People’s History of the World: From the Stone Age
  to the New Millennium, Verso, London, 1999/2008, p. 544

  20 Sidney Lens, The Forging of the American Empire: From the
  Revolution to Vietnam: A History of U.S. Imperialism, Pluto Press,
  London, 1971/2003, p. 357

  21 Ibid., p. 352 (emphasis added)

  22 Ibid., p. 357

  23 Garry Wills, Bomb Power: The Modern Presidency and the National
  Security State, The Penguin Press, New York, 2010, pp. 78-79.

  24 David Miller and William Dinan, A Century of Spin: How Public
  Relations Became the Cutting Edge of Corporate Power, Pluto Press,
  London, 2008, p. 129.

  25 Ibid., p. 130

  26 Ibid., p. 130

  27 Noam Chomsky, Imperial Ambitions: Conversations With Noam Chomsky
  on the Post-9/11 World, Interviews with David Barsamian, Hamish
  Hamilton, London, 2005, p. 57

  28 Noam Chomsky, ‘“Losing” the world: American decline in perspective,
  part 1,’ Guardian website, 14 February 2012;
  www.guardian.co.uk/commentisfree/cifamerica/2012/feb/14/losing-the-world-american-decline-noam-chomsky

  29 Jonathan Cook, Israel and the Clash of Civilisations: Iraq, Iran
  and the Plan to Remake the Middle East, Pluto Press, London, 2008, p.
  10

  30 In this book, I will use ‘corporate news’ to refer to the output of
  the major news broadcasters and major press outlets, whether they are
  explicitly commercial, profit-led organisations (often part of large
  transnational corporations) or not. I will include the publicly-funded
  BBC because, as will be shown, it tends to conform strongly to the
  corporate-driven news agendas of the other news organisations.
  Moreover, the BBC is strongly influenced and kept in line by the
  state, despite occasional protestations to the contrary by both
  politicians and senior BBC management, and could perhaps be more
  correctly described as an organ of ‘state-corporate’ news. Although at
  first sight the Guardian and the Observer might appear to be different
  – they are owned by the ‘nonprofit’ Scott Trust, as their editors and
  senior columnists like to remind readers – the papers’
  commercial-establishment ties, and their skewed news agendas and
  limited range of commentary perspectives, simply place them at the
  acceptable ‘liberal’ end of the corporate news spectrum. For more
  details, see Chapter 13, ‘Liberal Press Gang,’ of Newspeak in the
  21^(st) Century by David Edwards and David Cromwell, Pluto Press,
  London, 2009

  31 Greg Philo and Mike Berry, More Bad News from Israel, Pluto Press,
  London, 2011, p. 378

  32 Ibid., p. 217

  33 ITV early evening News, 12 October 2000, cited in Philo and Berry,
  More Bad News from Israel, p. 184

  34 BBC1 lunchtime News, 16 October 2000, cited in Philo and Berry, p.
  184

  35 ITV early evening News, 8 March 2002, cited in Philo and Berry, p.
  265

  36 BBC, 19 May 2001, cited in Philo and Berry, p. 265

  37 B’Tselem, ‘Operation Cast Lead, 27 December 2008 to 18 January
  2009,’ www.btselem.org/gaza_strip/castlead_operation, accessed 19
  December 2011

  38 Philo and Berry, More Bad News from Israel, pp. 340-341

  39 Ibid., p. 341

  40 Ibid., p. 392

  41 Ibid., p. 344

  42 Ibid., p. 344

  43 Ibid., pp. 385-386

  44 Ibid., pp. 389-390

  45 Ibid., p. 390

  46 BBC News Intro, uploaded on 10 December 2008;
  www.youtube.com/watch?v=wY4IpgQWzzw. See also comedian Bill Bailey’s
  amusing take on the religiosity of the BBC News intro, ‘Apocalyptic
  Rave’: www.youtube.com/watch?v=kTykyFZQ-g; and on the portentous theme
  tune of ITV’s News at Ten: ‘News at Ten – Cosmic Jam’;
  www.youtube.com/watch?v=QdcdEgqQjOw&feature=related

  47 Email from Jeremy Bowen to a Media Lens reader, 23 June 2011

  48 Media Alert, ‘Three Little Words: WikiLeaks, Libya, Oil,’ Media
  Lens, 22 June 2011; http://bit.ly/l6HYgL

  49 Helen Boaden, ‘Value of Journalism’ Speech given at The BBC College
  of Journalism and POLIS international conference,’ 10 June 2011;
  www.bbc.co.uk/pressoffice/speeches/stories/boaden_lse.shtml

  50 David Edwards and David Cromwell, Guardians of Power: The Myth of
  the Liberal Media, Pluto Press, London, 2006. Edwards and Cromwell,
  Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century.

  51 Francis Elliott, ‘Media Diary – Helen the hidden,’ Independent, 26
  November 2006

  52 BBC News, ‘BBC complaints process “too complex,” Lords says,’ 29
  June 2011; www.bbc.co.uk/news/uk-politics-13949966

  53 Email to Helen Boaden from David Cromwell, ‘Value of Journalism
  Speech: missing section,’ 13 June 2011, full version of email archived
  at: www.medialens.org/forum/viewtopic.php?t=3212

  54 James Curran and Jean Seaton, Power Without Responsibility: The
  Press and Broadcasting in Britain, Routledge, 5^(th) edition,
  1981/1997, p. 122

  55 John Pilger, Hidden Agendas, Vintage, 1998, p. 496

  56 Matt Wells, ‘Study deals a blow to claims of anti-war bias in BBC
  news,’ Guardian, 4 July 2003

  57 Email from Andrew Burgin to Media Lens, 14 March 2003

  58 John Pilger, ‘The real first casualty of war,’ New Statesman, 24
  April 2006

  59 ‘The Reith Diaries,’ Charles Stewart (editor), Collins, 1975, entry
  for 11 May 1926, quoted in John Eldridge (editor), The Glasgow Media
  Group Reader, Volume 1: News Content, Language and Visuals, Routledge,
  London, 1995, p. 29

  60 Email from BBC Press Office to David Cromwell, 16 June 2011

  61 Aldous Huxley, Brave New World, 1932, Chapter 5;
  www.huxley.net/bnw/five.html

  62 John Pilger, ‘The War on Democracy,’ New Statesman, 19 January
  2012.

2. Shoring up the Edifice of Benign Power

  1 Leo Tolstoy, Government is Violence: Essays on Anarchism and
  Pacifism, Phoenix Press, 1990, p. 82

  2 In 1993, I successfully applied for a research position in satellite
  remote sensing of the oceans at the James Rennell Centre for Ocean
  Circulation, based in Chilworth, which later became part of the
  National Oceanography Centre, Southampton

  3 For further details, see David Cromwell, Private Planet: Corporate
  Plunder and the Public Fight Back, Jon Carpenter, Charlbury, 2001, pp.
  25-32

  4 Ibid.

  5 David Edwards, The Compassionate Revolution: Radical Politics and
  Buddhism, Green Books, Totnes, 1998

  6 UNICEF, ‘Iraq surveys show “humanitarian emergency,”’ 12 August
  1999; www.unicef.org/newsline/99pr29.htm

  7 John Pilger, ‘Squeezed to death,’ Guardian, 4 March 2000

  8 Elaine Sciolino, ‘How Tough Questions and Shrewd Mediating Brought
  Iraqi Showdown to an End,’ New York Times, 23 November 1997

  9 Speech by Hans von Sponeck, ‘A Day and Night for the People of
  Iraq,’ organised by the Mariam Appeal, Kensington Town Hall, London, 6
  May 2000

  10 Denis Halliday, former UN humanitarian coordinator in Baghdad,
  resignation speech, 30 September 1998. Cited in ‘Let Iraq solve
  problems with Saddam,’ Matthew Rothschild, The Times Union (Albany,
  New York), 13 November 1998

  11 John Pilger, ‘Squeezed to death’; see note 7

  12 Interview with David Edwards, March 2000, Media Lens;
  www.medialens.org/articles/the_articles/articles_2001/iraqdh.htm

  13 Speech by John Pilger, ‘A Day and Night for the People of Iraq,’
  organised by the Mariam Appeal, Kensington Town Hall, London, 6 May
  2000.

  14 Email from David Edwards, May 2000

  15 Robert Fisk of the Independent was a rare exception. Even more
  powerfully, John Pilger relentlessly exposed the scandal in his
  regular columns in the small-circulation weekly, New Statesman

  16 Quoted in Norman Finkelstein, The Holocaust Industry: Reflections
  on the Exploitation of Jewish Suffering, Verso, London, 2000/2003, p.
  21

  17 John Pilger, ‘Having a fun time in New Orleans: the latest recruits
  (sorry, “alumni”) of latter-day Reaganism,’ New Statesman, 13 November
  1998

  18 Martin Howard, ‘Flights over Iraq,’ letter, Independent, 26 June
  2000

  19 Steven Lee Myers, ‘U.S. Jets Strike 2 Iraqi Missile Sites 30 Miles
  Outside Baghdad,’ New York Times, 25 February 1999

  20 Bill Clinton, president’s radio address, 14 September 1996;
  http://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Presidential_Radio_Address_-_14_September_1996

  21 Howard, letter; see note 18

  22 Peter Hinchcliffe, letter, Independent, 29 April 2000

  23 Interview with David Edwards; see note 12. For a thorough and
  moving insider’s examination of the devastating nature of UN sanctions
  on Iraq, see Hans von Sponeck, A Different Kind of War: The UN
  Sanctions Regime in Iraq, Berghahn Books, New York, 2006

  24 John Pilger, speech; see note 13

  25 Cook lost his post after the 2001 General Election. He resigned as
  leader of the House of Commons on the eve of war in March 2003 and
  died two years later while hill-walking in Sutherland, Scotland

  26 John Pilger, ‘Squeezed to death’; see note 7. See also 60 Minutes
  clip: www.youtube.com/watch?v=FbIX1CP9qr4

  27 Norman Solomon, ‘Bush’s implicit answer to Cindy Sheehan’s
  question,’ Fairness and Accuracy in Reporting, 4 September 2005;
  www.fair.org/index.php?page=2661

  28 Bruce Ramsay, ‘Against the case for war,’ Seattle Times opinion
  blog, 18 July 2005;
  http://blog.seattletimes.nwsource.com/stop/archives/008101.html

  29 As was tragically seen in Madrid on 11 March 2004 and in London on
  7 July 2005

  30 Finkelstein, The Holocaust Industry, p. 146

  31 Natasha Walter, ‘We need more, not fewer, memorials to our crimes,’
  Independent, 17 July 2000

  32 William Blum, Killing Hope: U.S. Military and C.I.A. interventions
  since WWII, updated edition, Common Courage Press, Monroe (Maine),
  2003

  33 See ‘Table: Britain and Global Deaths’ in Mark Curtis, Unpeople:
  Britain’s secret human rights abuses, Vintage, London, 2004, pp.
  310-317

  34 Mark Curtis, Unpeople. Curtis also used the term ‘unpeople’ in
  earlier books to describe ‘human beings who impede the pursuit of high
  policy and whose rights, often lives, therefore become irrelevant.’
  (The Ambiguities of Power: British Foreign Policy Since 1945, Zed
  Books, London, 1995, p. 116)

  35 John Pilger, ‘Whatever the Defence Secretary says, the killing of
  82 Iraqi civilians is a crime, which has achieved nothing,’ New
  Statesman, 22 January 1999; Felicity Arbuthnot, ‘Operation Desert
  Slaughter,’ ColdType, February 2008;
  www.coldtype.net/Assets.08/pdfs/0208.DesertSlaughter.pdf

  36 John Pilger, Hidden Agendas, Vintage, London, 1998, p. 53

  37 Cited, Howard Zinn, The Zinn Reader, Seven Stories Press, New York,
  1997, p. 582

  38 George Orwell, ‘The Freedom of the Press,’ proposed preface to
  Animal Farm; www.orwell.ru/library/novels/Animal_Farm/english/efp_go

  39 This was the proclamation from the very early days of New Labour’s
  ascension to power in 1997 and cited repeatedly; for example: Michael
  Binyon, ‘Cook makes grand entrance for role on world stage,’ The
  Times, 13 May 1997. The claim of an ‘ethical dimension’ to UK foreign
  policy, often conflated to ‘ethical foreign policy,’ was always a sham
  and even in mainstream policy and media circles became something of an
  albatross around Labour’s neck. John Kampfner, former editor of New
  Statesman, wrote a book called ‘Blair’s Wars’ (2003) which, as the
  title implies, demonstrated Blair’s propensity to invade and attack
  countries around the globe. Regarding the arms trade, Kampfner notes
  that: ‘From his first day in office Blair was eager not to antagonise
  British arms companies, and BAE Systems in particular, which developed
  extremely close relationships with senior figures in Downing Street.
  Its Chairman, Dick Evans, was one of a very small group of outsiders
  whose requests to see Blair were always granted.’ (p. 15) One Downing
  Street source said of Evans: ‘Whenever he heard of a problem he’d be
  straight on the phone to Number 10 and it would get sorted.’ (p. 170)

  40 The work by the Campaign against Sanctions on Iraq
  (www.casi.org.uk/), based at the University of Cambridge, and Voices
  in the Wilderness UK (http://www.voices.netuxo.co.uk/), as well as
  many other groups and activists, was superlative. John Pilger’s
  journalism (www.johnpilger.com), including his forensic and moving ITV
  documentary, Paying the Price (cited in the main text), was a rare gem
  in the morass of ‘mainstream’ reporting. Also see von Sponeck, A
  Different Kind of War.

  41 Interview with David Edwards; see note 12

  42 ‘All wrong on Iraq,’ The Economist, US edition, 8 April 2000

  43 Michael Littlejohns, ‘Support grows for “smart” Iraq sanctions,’
  Financial Times, 2 June 2001

  44 Hans von Sponeck and Denis Halliday, ‘The hostage nation,’
  Guardian, 29 November 2001

  45 Andrew Marr, ‘Is it possible that no news is good news?’,
  Independent, 16 March 2001

  46 BBC 6 o’clock news, 4 October 2001

  47 Edward Herman, ‘Anti-terrorism as a cover for terrorism,’ ZNet
  daily commentary, 5 October 2001;
  www.zcommunications.org/zspace/commentaries/958

  48 Ibid.

  49 Cited in Phil Scraton (editor), Beyond September 11: An Anthology
  of Dissent, Pluto Press, London, 2002, p. 228

  50 ReliefWeb, ‘Alarming food crisis in northern Afghanistan, 21
  February 2002; http://reliefweb.int/node/96265

  51 Email, January 2002. This is also a phrase that appears in BBC
  documents providing ‘producers’ guidelines definitions of
  impartiality,’ e.g. the 2004 Neil report, ‘The BBC’s journalism after
  Hutton,’ www.bbc.co.uk/info/policies/text/neil_report.html; accessed
  27 June 2004

  52 John Pilger, introduction to Phillip Knightley, The First Casualty:
  The War Correspondent as Hero and Myth-Maker from the Crimea to
  Kosovo, Prion Books, 2000, p. xiii

  53 See Edwards and Cromwell, Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century, for
  copious examples of BBC propaganda and slippery evasions to public
  challenges

  54 Louise Jury, ‘Dyke vision,’ Independent, 4 February 2002

  55 At least, no advertising appears on the BBC at home. But it does
  overseas. See Owen Gibson, ‘A global revolution,’ Guardian, 15
  September 2008

  56 Interview with John Pilger, 3 June 2001, Media Lens;
  www.medialens.org/articles/interviews/john_pilger.php

  57 Interview with David Edwards; see note 12

  58 Cited by James Curran and Jean Seaton, Power Without
  Responsibility: The Press and Broadcasting in Britain, 5^(th) edition,
  Routledge, London, 1981/1997, p. 170

  59 Dan Hind, The Return of the Public, Verso, London, 2010, pp. 55-56

  60 Erich Fromm, The Art of Being, Constable, London, 1993, p. 13

  61 Noam Chomsky, Pirates and Emperors, Old and New, new edition, Pluto
  Press, London, 2002, p. 16

  62 Ibid., p. 16

  63 Andrew Buncombe, ‘US warns Iraq it will get nuclear response,’
  Independent, 12 December 2002

  64 Andrew Grice, ‘Putting the world to rights: a busy day in Downing
  Street,’ Independent, 10 January 2003

  65 Curtis, The Ambiguities of Power, p. 3

  66 Ibid., p. 3

  67 In Scraton, Beyond September 11, p. 21

  68 BBC online, ‘Kissinger quits as 9/11 inquiry chief,’ 14 December
  2002; http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/americas/2574741.stm

  69 BBC Radio 4 Today programme, 21 January 2003

  70 Richard Norton-Taylor, ‘Scepticism over papers detailing chemical
  warfare preparations,’ Guardian, 25 January 2003

  71 BBC online, ‘Iraq “preparing for chemical war,”’ 24 January 2003;
  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/middle_east/2690163.stm

  72 Norton-Taylor, Guardian; see note 70.

  73 Email from Richard Sambrook, BBC director of news, to a Media Lens
  reader, 10 January 2003

  74 Email from Sambrook to Media Lens, 23 January 2003

  75 Joseph Kishore, ‘The reality of the Iraq war,’ World Socialist Web
  Site, 21 December 2011;
  www.wsws.org/articles/2011/dec2011/pers-d21.shtml

  76 News transcript, ‘Remarks by Defense Secretary Panetta at the U.S.
  Forces-Iraq End of Mission Ceremony,’ U.S. Department of Defense, 15
  December 2011;
  www.defense.gov/transcripts/transcript.aspx?transcriptid=4946

  77 Donna Miles, ‘Panetta: Campaign to Establish Sovereign Iraq Was
  “Worth It,”’ American Forces Press Service, 16 December 2011;
  www.defense.gov/news/newsarticle.aspx?id=66515

  78 ‘Iraq Deaths,’ Just Foreign Policy,
  www.justforeignpolicy.org/node/156; ‘January 2008 – Update on Iraqi
  Casualty Data,’ Opinion Research Business,
  www.opinion.co.uk/Newsroom_details.aspx?NewsId=120

3. How To Cover Your Tracks After Promoting War

  1 Email from David Mannion to David Cromwell, 16 August 2004.

  2 Editorial, ‘The Times and Iraq,’ New York Times, 26 May 2004

  3 Chris Hedges, ‘The Myth of The New York Times, in Documentary Form,’
  Truthdig, 6 July 2011;
  www.truthdig.com/arts_culture/item/the_myth_of_the_new_york_times_in_documentary_form_20110706/

  4 Howard Kurtz, ‘The Post on WMDs: An Inside Story. Prewar Articles
  Questioning Threat Often Didn’t Make Front Page,’ Washington Post, 12
  August 2004

  5 Mike Whitney, ‘Mea Culpas at the Washington Post,’ ZNet, 14 August
  2004,
  www.zcommunications.org/mea-culpas-atthe-washington-post-by-mike-whitney

  6 John Pilger, ‘Why are wars not being reported honestly?’, Guardian,
  10 December 2010

  7 Matt Wells, ‘Study deals a blow to claims of anti-war bias in BBC
  news,’ Guardian website, 4 July 2003;
  www.guardian.co.uk/media/2003/jul/04/Iraqandthemedia.politicsandthemedia

  8 John Pilger, ‘Why are wars not being reported honestly?’; see note 6

  9 See note 6

  10 David Miller, ‘Media Apologies?’, ZNet, 15 June 2004;
  www.zcommunications.org/media-apologies-by-david-miller

  11 Email from Observer editor Roger Alton to David Cromwell, 17 August
  2004

  12 Nick Davies, Flat Earth News: An Award-winning Reporter Exposes
  Falsehood, Distortion and Propaganda in the Global Media, Vintage,
  London, 2008. For Vulliamy’s anguished and ultimately evasive response
  to being asked about this repeated rejection, see David Edwards and
  David Cromwell, Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century, Pluto Press, London,
  2009, pp. 5-6

  13 Milan Rai, peace activist and author, e.g. War Plan Iraq: Ten
  Reasons Against War With Iraq, Arrow Publications, St Leonards-on-Sea,
  2002; Regime Unchanged: Why the War on Iraq Changed Nothing, Pluto
  Press, London, 2003

  14 Nick Cohen, ‘Blair’s just a Bush baby,’ Observer, 10 March 2002

  15 Email from Roger Alton to reader, 15 March 2002

  16 Leader, ‘Iraq: the case for decisive action,’ Observer, 19 January
  2003

  17 John Pilger, ‘Betrayal of a noble legacy,’ New Statesman, 1
  February 2003

  18 David Rose, ‘Betrayed by this immoral war,’ Evening Standard, 10
  May 2004. Unfortunately, Rose has continued his bad journalism with
  science-bashing articles about climate change which ‘show the same
  uncritical reliance on dodgy sources that caused [his] catastrophic
  mistakes about Iraq.’ (George Monbiot, ‘David Rose’s climate science
  writing shows he has not learned from previous mistakes,’ Guardian
  blog, 8 December 2010;
  www.guardian.co.uk/environment/georgemonbiot/2010/dec/08/david-rose-climate-science)

  19 Andrew Rawnsley, ‘The voices of doom were so wrong,’ Observer, 13
  April 2003

  20 Ben Summerskill, email forwarded to Media Lens, 20 February 2003

  21 Email from Roger Alton to reader, 14 February 2003

  22 Email to Media Lens, March 2003

  23 Email from David Mannion to David Cromwell, 16 August 2004.

  24 John Draper, ITN, 22:30 News, 20 February 2001

  25 ITN, 27 August 2002

  26 Glen Rangwala and Dan Plesch, ‘A Case to Answer: Summary,’
  originally published at http://impeachblair.org/A_Case_To_Answer.pdf,
  August 2004; then available as a short book from Spokesman Books,
  Nottingham, October 2004

  27 Ibid.

  28 Editorial, ‘Diplomacy is still the best weapon – UN unity can still
  be achieved,’ Observer, 16 March 2003

  29 ITN Evening News at 18:30, 19 December 2002

  30 ITN Lunchtime News, 17 January 2003

  31 ITN, Lunchtime News, 3 April 2003

  32 ITN Evening News, 9 April 2003

  33 Tonight with Trevor McDonald, ITV, 11 April 2003

  34 ITN, Lunchtime News, 24 April 2003

  35 ITN, Lunchtime News, 8 September 2003

  36 Editorial, ‘So where are they, Mr Blair?’, Independent on Sunday,
  20 April 2003

  37 Editorial, Independent on Sunday, ‘The Real War On Terror,’ 4 May
  2003

  38 William Drozdiak, ‘NATO General Predicts Victory in Two Months,’
  Washington Post, 24 May 1999

  39 Fairness and Accuracy in Reporting, ‘Washington Post a “useful
  tool” for NATO?’, 28 January 2000; www.fair.org/index.php?page=1891

  40 Editorial, ‘If there is to be a war, the world needs to know why,’
  Independent on Sunday, 15 December 2002

  41 See Edwards and Cromwell, Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century; in
  particular, Chapter 5 on the Downing Street Memos

  42 Editorial, ‘This war is wrong but unstoppable. So we must fight for
  the peace,’ Independent on Sunday, 30 March 2003

  43 Editorial, ‘A little bit of candour and humility needed, Mr Blair,’
  Independent on Sunday, 25 July 2004.

  44 Editorial, ‘The case is damning. It must be answered,’ Independent
  on Sunday, 17 August 2003.

  45 Email from Michael Williams to David Cromwell, 18 August 2004.

  46 Email from David Cromwell to Michael Williams, 18 August 2004.

  47 David Edwards and David Cromwell, Guardians of Power: The Myth of
  the Liberal Media, Pluto Press, London, 2006; Edwards and Cromwell,
  Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century.

  48 Email from Roger Mosey to David Cromwell, 16 August 2004.

  49 Email from David Cromwell to Roger Mosey, 18 August 2004.

  50 The 2003 Hutton Inquiry into the death of weapons inspector Dr
  David Kelly (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hutton_inquiry) and the 2004
  Butler Inquiry into the intelligence surrounding Iraq’s supposed
  weapons of mass destruction
  (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Butler_Inquiry).

  51 Email from Roger Mosey to David Cromwell, 25 August 2004.

  52 Judith Townend, ‘Jeremy Paxman: US state evidence requires more
  suspicion after Iraq WMD “hoodwink,”’ journalism.co.uk, 29 October
  2009; www.journalism.co.uk/2/articles/536290.php

  53 Steven Pinker, The Blank Slate: The Modern Denial of Human Nature,
  Penguin, London, 2002, p. 280.

  54 Stephen Glover, ‘Press were wrong on Iraq,’ Independent, 11 August
  2008.

  55 Stephen Glover, ‘It has its faults, but we should be proud of the
  British press,’ Independent, 6 October 2008.

  56 [1] Stephen Glover, ‘It has its faults, but we should be proud of
  the British press,’ Independent, 6 October 2008. [2] Stephen Glover,
  ‘Press were wrong on Iraq,’ Independent, 11 August 2008. [3] Email to
  Stephen Glover, ‘No mea culpa from the British press,’ 19 August 2008;
  www.medialens.org/forum/viewtopic.php?p=9849 [4] Hans von Sponeck, A
  Different Kind of War: The UN Sanctions Regime in Iraq, Berghahn
  Books, New York, 2006. [5] Including the Independent whose ‘anti-war
  stance’ was endlessly hobbled with serious omissions and distortions:
  see Edwards and Cromwell, Guardians of Power. The performance of the
  ‘impartial’ BBC was also abysmal. [6] Just Foreign Policy,
  www.justforeignpolicy.org/iraq/iraqdeaths.html; ‘Update on Iraqi
  casualty data,’ Opinion Research Business, January 2008;
  www.opinion.co.uk/Newsroom_details.aspx?NewsId=120

  57 Stephen Glover, ‘An Iraq inquiry should examine Murdoch’s role,’
  Independent, 22 June 2009

  58 Editorial, ‘Once more with feeling,’ Guardian, 3 May 2005

  59 Jonathan Cook, ‘The dangerous cult of the Guardian,’ Counterpunch,
  28 September 2011;
  www.counterpunch.org/2011/09/28/the-dangerous-cult-of-the-guardian/

  60 Richard Beeston, ‘The war went wrong. Not the build-up. Stop
  obsessing about the legality of invading Iraq. The campaign itself was
  the real disaster,’ The Times, 26 February 2009

  61 John Theobald, The Media and the Making of History, Ashgate,
  Aldershot, 2004, p. 182

  62 BBC reporter Reeta Chakrabarti, BBC One News, 6 pm, 24 February
  2009

  63 Reeta Chakrabarti, email, forwarded to Media Lens, 2 March 2009

  64 BBC reporter Hugh Sykes, email to a Media Lens reader, 31 March
  2009.

4. Promoting Public Ignorance

  1 Harold Lasswell, quoted in Alex Carey, Taking the Risk Out of
  Democracy: Corporate Propaganda versus Freedom and Liberty, University
  of Illinois Press, Champaign, 1995/1997, p. 23

  2 Michael Parenti, introduction to Matthew Alford, Reel Power:
  Hollywood Cinema and American Supremacy, Pluto Books, London, 2010, p.
  xiii

  3 Dan Hind, The Threat To Reason: How the Enlightenment was hijacked
  and how we can reclaim it, Verso, London, 2007, p. 49

  4 Justin Lewis, Constructing Public Opinion: How Political Elites Do
  What They Like And Why We Seem To Go Along With It, Columbia
  University Press, New York, 2001

  5 Jeff Zeleny and Megan Thee-Brennan, ‘New Poll Finds a Deep Distrust
  of Government,’ New York Times, 25 October 2011

  6 Noam Chomsky, Hegemony or Survival: America’s Quest for Global
  Dominance, Hamish Hamilton, London, 2003, pp. 168-169

  7 Cited in Noam Chomsky, Hopes and Prospects, Hamish Hamilton, London,
  2010, p. 47

  8 Ibid., p. 15

  9 Carey, Taking the Risk out of Democracy, p. 75

  10 ‘Tony Blair’s speech to the US Congress,’ Guardian website, 18 July
  2003; www.guardian.co.uk/politics/2003/jul/18/iraq.speeches

  11 Alford, Reel Power, p. 21

  12 William Blum, ‘American exceptionalism – A survey,’ The Anti-Empire
  Report, Number 100, 2 December 2011;
  http://killinghope.org/bblum6/aer100.html

  13 All these examples are cited in Ibid.

  14 ‘State of the Union 2012: Obama speech transcript,’ Washington Post
  website, 24 January 2012;
  www.washingtonpost.com/politics/state-of-the-union-2012-obama-speech-excerpts/2012/01/24/gIQA9D3QOQ_story.html?hpid=z1

  15 Glenn Greenwald, ‘Bob Schieffer, Ron Paul and journalistic
  “objectivity,”’ Salon.com, 24 November 2011;
  www.salon.com/2011/11/24/bob_schieffer_ron_paul_and_journalistic_objectivity/singleton/;
  italics in original

  16 John Pilger, ‘Once again, war is prime time and journalism’s role
  is taboo,’ New Statesman, 1 December 2011

  17 WikiLeaks, Twitter, 8 October 2011;
  http://twitter.com/#!/wikileaks/status/123025905328209920

  18 Newsnight, BBC2, 11 August 2008

  19 Michael Harrison, ‘Iraq crisis: three mystery ships are tracked
  over suspected weapons’ cargo,’ Independent, 19 February 2003

  20 Nigel Morris and Ben Russell, ‘Alarm over cargo ships tracked by
  intelligence,’ Independent, 20 February 2003

  21 Peter Beaumont, http://talk.guardian.co.uk, 5 June 2003

  22 Email from Michael Harrison to David Cromwell, 19 June 2003

  23 Email from David Cromwell to Michael Harrison, 16 July 2003

  24 Email from Michael Harrison to David Cromwell, 22 July 2003

  25 Edward Herman and Noam Chomsky, Manufacturing Consent, Vintage,
  London, 1988/1994, p. 208

  26 ‘Tony Blair’s speech to the US Congress’; see note 10.

  27 Jawaharlal Nehru, The Oxford Dictionary of Political Quotations,
  Antony Jay (editor), Oxford University Press, Oxford, 1996/1997, p.
  265

  28 Robert Fisk, ‘The Fall Of Saddam: Final Proof That War Is About The
  Failure Of The Human Spirit,’ Independent, 10 April 2003

  29 Johann Hari, ‘If this war with Iraq is to be a moral war, it must
  be fought in a moral way,’ Independent, 7 March 2003. To his credit,
  Hari later admitted he was wrong to have supported the war

  30 Sami Ramadani, ‘Iraqis Distrust The US And Its Promises Of
  Democracy,’ letter to the editor, Independent, 20 September 2003

  31 Today, BBC Radio 4, 14 November 2003

  32 Email from the BBC’s Sarah Montague to David Cromwell, 15 November
  2003

  33 Cited in John Pilger, Heroes, Vintage, London, 1986/2001, p 273

  34 Medact, ‘Continuing Collateral Damage: The health and environmental
  costs of war on Iraq,’ 11 November 2003,
  www.medact.org/article_publications.php?articleID=152

  35 Email to the BBC’s Sarah Montague from David Cromwell, 16 November
  2003

  36 Sidney Lens, The Forging of the American Empire: From the
  Revolution to Vietnam: A History of U.S. Imperialism, 1971/2003, Pluto
  Press, London, p. 21

  37 Ibid., p. 178

  38 See, for example, the final chapter, ‘Force and Opinion,’ of
  Deterring Democracy, Noam Chomsky, Vintage, London, 1991, pp. 351-405

  39 Ibid., p. 303

  40 Dilip Hiro, ‘One Iraqi, One Vote?’, New York Times, 27 January 2004

  41 Justin Huggler, ‘Rebels storm police and army bases leaving 19
  Iraqi security men dead,’ Independent on Sunday, 15 February 2004

  42 Naomi Klein, ‘Appointocracy – The model for George Bush’s Iraq,’
  Guardian, 24 January 2004

  43 Jon Smith, ‘Blair confirms Iraq probe No. 4,’ PA News, Independent,
  3 February 2004

  44 Paul Waugh, ‘After Hutton, the verdict: 51% say Blair should go,’
  Independent, 7 February 2004

  45 ‘Q&A: Iran nuclear issue,’ BBC News online, 9 November 2011;
  www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-117094280

  46 ‘Seymour Hersh: Propaganda Used Ahead of Iraq War Is Now Being
  Reused over Iran’s Nuke Program,’ Democracy Now!, 21 November 2011;
  www.democracynow.org/2011/11/21/seymour_hersh_propaganda_used_ahead_of

  47 Editorial, ‘Iran: Bolting the stable door,’ Guardian, 10 November
  2011

  48 Perhaps in response to public complaints, the title of the blog
  piece was later changed. Julian Borger, ‘IAEA due to expose Iranian
  nuclear weapons design and testing facility,’ Global Security blog, 7
  November 2011;
  www.guardian.co.uk/world/julian-borger-global-security-blog/2011/nov/07/iran-nuclear-weapons

  49 Julian Borger, ‘Iran may be researching nuclear warhead, claims
  watchdog,’ Guardian website, 8 November 2011;
  www.guardian.co.uk/world/2011/nov/08/iran-reasearch-nuclear-warhead-watchdog

  50 David E. Sanger and William J. Broad, ‘U.N. Agency Says Iran Data
  Points to A-Bomb Work,’ New York Times, 8 November 2011

  51 Editorial, ‘Iran’s nuclear menace,’ Daily Telegraph, 9 November
  2011

  52 Editorial, The Times, 10 November 2011

  53 http://wikileaks.org/cable/2009/10/09UNVIEVIENNA478.html

  54 http://wikileaks.org/cable/2009/07/09UNVIEVIENNA331.html

  55 http://wikileaks.org/cable/2009/10/09UNVIEVIENNA478.html

  56 Julian Borger, ‘Nuclear Wikileaks: Cables show cosy US relationship
  with IAEA chief,’ Guardian website, 30 November 2010;
  www.guardian.co.uk/world/julian-borger-global-security-blog/2010/nov/30/iaea-wikileaks

  57 Mehdi Hasan, ‘There is no nuclear threat – but if we attack Iran,
  there soon will be,’ New Statesman, 11 November 2011

  58 John Pilger, ‘The smearing of a revolution,’ New Statesman, 6
  October 2011.

  59 Hersh, Democracy Now!, see note 46.

  60 Seymour Hersh, ‘Iran and the I.A.E.A.,’ The New Yorker Blog, 18
  November 2011;
  www.newyorker.com/online/blogs/comment/2011/11/iran-and-the-iaea.html

  61 Hersh, Democracy Now!; see note 46

  62 Hersh, The New Yorker Blog; see note 60.

  63 Ibid

  64 James Reynolds, BBC Iran correspondent, ‘UN nuclear agency IAEA:
  Iran “studying nuclear weapons,”’ BBC News online, 9 November 2011;
  www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-15643460

  65 Sanger and Broad, New York Times; see note 50

  66 Email from James Reynolds to David Cromwell, 9 November 2011

  67 ‘Iran nuclear issue is “deep concern” – world powers,’ BBC news
  online, 17 November 2011;
  www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-15771534

  68 Email from David Cromwell to James Reynolds, 18 November 2011

  69 ‘IAEA Iran Report Spins Intelligence,’ The Real News Network, 13
  November 2011;
  http://therealnews.com/t2/index.php?option=com_content&task=view&id=31&Itemid=74&jumival=7585

  70 ‘IAEA Iran Report Fit Facts to Strengthen Hardliners,’ The Real
  News Network, 17 November 2011;
  http://therealnews.com/t2/index.php?option=com_content&task=view&id=31&Itemid=74&jumival=7597

  71 Email from James Reynolds to David Cromwell, 21 November 2011

  72 Email from David Cromwell to James Reynolds, 22 November 2011

  73 Email from James Reynolds to David Cromwell, 22 November 2011.

5. Global Climate Crime

  1 James Hansen, The Storms of my Grandchildren: The Truth About the
  Coming Climate Catastrophe and Our Last Chance to Save Humanity,
  Bloomsbury, London, 2009, p. 171

  2 John Tirman, ‘Why do we ignore the civilians killed in American
  wars?’, Washington Post, 6 January 2012

  3 Richard Wachman, ‘FSA probes scandal of “missing” Shell reserves,’
  Observer, 14 March 2004

  4 See, for example, The Carbon War: Dispatches from the End of the Oil
  Century by Jeremy Leggett, Penguin, London, 1999

  5 Houghton, J.T.; Meira Filho, L.G.; Callander, B.A.; Harris, N.;
  Kattenberg, A., and Maskell, K. (editors), Climate Change 1995: The
  Science of Climate Change, Contribution of Working Group I to the
  Second Assessment Report of the Intergovern-mental Panel on Climate
  Change, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, 1996

  6 Roger Highfield, ‘Screen saver weather trial predicts 10 deg rise in
  British temperatures,’ Daily Telegraph, 31 January 2005

  7 John Vidal, ‘Global warming causes 300,000 deaths a year, says Kofi
  Annan thinktank,’ Guardian website, 29 May 2009;
  www.guardian.co.uk/environment/2009/may/29/1

  8 Solomon, S., D. Qin, M. Manning, Z. Chen, M. Marquis, K.B. Averyt,
  M. Tignor and H.L. Miller (editors), Climate Change 2007: The Physical
  Science Basis, Contribution of Working Group I to the Fourth
  Assessment Report of the Intergovern-mental Panel on Climate Change,
  Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, 2007

  9 United Nations Environment Programme Yearbook 2009, New Science and
  Developments in Our Changing Environment, Chapter 3: Climate Change,
  UNEP, Nairobi, Kenya, p. 21; www.unep.org/yearbook/2009/

  10 NASA Goddard Institute for Space Studies, ‘NASA Research Finds 2010
  Tied for Warmest Year on Record,’ press release, 12 January 2011;
  www.giss.nasa.gov/research/news/20110112/

  11 Phil England, ‘Tax on carbon: The only way to save our planet?’,
  Independent, 4 January 2011.

  12 James Randerson, ‘UK’s ex-science chief predicts century of
  “resource” wars,’ Guardian, 13 February 2009.

  13 Email from David Cromwell to James Randerson, 13 February 2009.

  14 Email from James Randerson to David Cromwell, 13 February 2009.

  15 Email from David Cromwell to James Randerson, 13 February 2009.

  16 E. F. Schumacher, Small is Beautiful: A Study of Economics as if
  People Mattered, Abacus, London, 1973/1974.

  17 Editorial, ‘Science: Collision Course,’ Guardian, 24 August 2009.

  18 Royal Society, ‘Geoengineering the climate. Science, governance and
  uncertainty,’ 1 September 2009;
  http://royal-society.org/policy/publications/2009/geoengineering-climate/

  19 Royal Society, ‘Stop emitting CO2 or geoengineering could be our
  only hope,’ press release, 28 August 2009;
  http://royalsociety.org/Stop-emitting-CO2-or-geoengineering-could-be-our-only-hope/

  20 James Lovelock, ‘Medicine for a feverish planet: kill or cure?’,
  Guardian, 1 September 2008.

  21 David Cromwell and Mark Levene (editors), Surviving Climate Change:
  The Struggle to Avert Global Catastrophe, Pluto Press, London, 2007.

  22 Susan George, The Lugano Report: On Preserving Capitalism in the
  Twenty-first Century, Pluto Press, London, 1999.

  23 Ross Gelbspan, The Heat is On: The Climate Crisis, The Cover-up,
  The Prescription, Perseus Books, Reading, 1998, p. 154.

  24 Alastair McIntosh, Hell and High Water: Climate Change, Hope and
  the Human Condition, Birlinn, Edinburgh, 2008, p. 10

  25 Email from James Hansen to David Cromwell, 18 June 2009

  26 Cited by Joe Romm, ‘Climate-Control Policies Cannot Rely on Carbon
  Capture and Storage: That’s My Side of The Economist Debates,’ Climate
  Progress blog, 22 November 2011;
  http://thinkprogress.org/romm/2011/11/22/375143/climate-control-policies-cannot-rely-on-carbon-capture-and-storage-the-economist-debates/

  27 Greenpeace International, ‘Who’s holding us back? – How
  carbon-intensive industry is preventing effective climate
  legislation,’ 23 November 2011; available at
  http://www.green-peace.org/dirtydozen

  28 Tzeporah Berman, ‘Politicians Need to Listen to the People, Not the
  Polluters,’ Climate rescue blog, Greenpeace International, 23 November
  2011;
  www.greenpeace.org/international/en/news/Blogs/climate/politicians-need-to-listen-tothe-people-not-/blog/37985/

  29 Richard Black, ‘Climate talks end with late deal,’ BBC News online,
  11 December 2011; www.bbc.co.uk/news/science-environment-16124670

  30 ‘Global carbon emissions reach record 10 billion tonnes –
  threatening two degree target,’ University of East Anglia, press
  release, 4 December 2011;
  www.uea.ac.uk/mac/comm/media/press/2011/December/globalcarbonproject

  31 Editorial, ‘Climate change: ambition gap,’ Guardian, 13 December
  2011

  32 Editorial, ‘Durban delivered hope in the end,’ Independent, 12
  December 2011

  33 Editorial, ‘A Change of Climate,’ The Times, 12 December 2011

  34 ‘Climatic Research Unit email controversy,’ Wikipedia;
  www.green-peace.org/dirtydozen

  35 Damian Carrington, ‘Climate deal: A guarantee our children will be
  worse off than us,’ Environment blog, Guardian website, 11 December
  2011;
  www.guardian.co.uk/environment/damian-carrington-blog/2011/dec/11/durban-climate-change-conference-2011-climate-change

  36 Fiona Harvey and John Vidal in Durban, ‘Durban deal will not avert
  catastrophic climate change, say scientists,’ Guardian website, 11
  December 2011;
  www.guardian.co.uk/environment/2011/dec/11/durban-climate-change-deal

  37 Union of Concerned Scientists, ‘UCS Expert Offers Immediate
  Reaction on the Durban Climate Negotiations’ Outcome,’ UCS News
  Center, 11 December 2011;
  www.ucsusa.org/news/press_release/ucs-expert-offers-reaction-to-durban-1360.html

  38 Kamcilla Pillay, ‘Africa will cook, warn experts,’ Independent
  Online [South Africa], 12 December 2011;
  www.iol.co.za/dailynews/africa-will-cook-warn-experts-1.1196490

  39 See website of the Global Commons Institute at www.gci.org.uk and
  also Aubrey Meyer’s chapter, The Case for Contraction and Convergence,
  in Cromwell and Levene (editors), Surviving Climate Change, 2007.

  40 Aubrey Meyer, email, 11 December 2011; also archived under ‘COP-17
  Outcome: “The Economics of Genocide Continues,”’ Global Commons
  Institute, News, 13 December 2011; www.gci.org.uk/news.html

  41 Pillay, Independent Online; see note 38

  42 David Edwards and David Cromwell, Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century,
  Pluto Press, London, 2009, pp. 75-76

  43 Joel Bakan, The Corporation: The Pathological Pursuit of Profit and
  Power, Constable, London, 2004

  44 Franz J. Broswimmer, Ecocide: A Short History of the Mass
  Extinction of Species, Pluto Press, London, 2002; Richard Douthwaite,
  The Growth Illusion: How Economic Growth Has Enriched the Few,
  Impoverished the Many, and Endangered the Planet, updated edition,
  Green Books, Totnes, 1999

  45 Nafeez Mosaddeq Ahmed, A User’s Guide to the Crisis of
  Civilization: And How to Save It, Pluto Press, London, 2010; David
  Cromwell, Private Planet: Corporate Plunder and the Fight Back, Pluto
  Press, London, 2001; Alastair McIntosh, Soil and Soul: People versus
  Corporate Power, Aurum Press, London, 2001/2002

  46 Bélen Balanya, Ann Doherty, Olivier Hoedeman, Adam Ma’anit, Erik
  Wesselius, Europe, Inc.: Regional and Global Restructuring and the
  Rise of Corporate Power, Pluto Press, London, 2000; William Dinan and
  David Miller (editors), Thinker, Faker, Spinner, Spy: Corporate PR and
  the Assault on Democracy, Pluto Press, London, 2007; David Miller and
  William Dinan, A Century of Spin: How Public Relations Became the
  Cutting Edge of Corporate Power, Pluto Press, London, 2008

  47 Sharon Beder, with Wendy Vaney and Richard Gosden, This Little
  Kiddy Went to Market: The Corporate Capture of Childhood, Pluto Press,
  London, 2009; Tim Kasser, The High Price Of Materialism, The MIT
  Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts, 2002

  48 Noam Chomsky, Deterring Democracy, Vintage, London, 1992; Noam
  Chomsky, Hegemony or Survival: America’s Quest for Global Dominance,
  Hamish Hamilton, London, 2003; Noam Chomsky, Failed States: The Abuse
  of Power and The Assault on Democracy, Hamish Hamilton, London, 2006;
  John Perkins, Confessions of an Economic Hit Man, Ebury Press, London,
  2004/ 2006

  49 John McMurtry, Value Wars: The Global Market Versus the Life
  Economy, Pluto Press, London, 2002; John Perkins, Confessions of an
  Economic Hit Man, 2004/2006; John Pilger, The New Rulers of the World,
  Verso, London, 2002

  50 William Blum, Killing Hope: U.S. Military and C.I.A. interventions
  since WWII, updated edition, Common Courage Press, Monroe, Maine,
  2003; Edward S. Herman and David Peterson, The Politics of Genocide,
  Monthly Review Press, New York, 2010; John Perkins, Confessions of an
  Economic Hit Man, 2004/2006. Noam Chomsky notes sardonically, but
  accurately, that the ‘international community’ is a ‘technical term
  referring to Washington and whoever happens to agree with it.’ (Hopes
  and Prospects, pp. 196-197).

  51 David Berry and John Theobald (editors), Radical Mass Media
  Criticism: A Cultural Genealogy, Black Rose Books, Montreal, 2006;
  Edwards and Cromwell, Guardians of Power, 2006; Edwards and Cromwell,
  Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century, 2009; Edward Herman and Noam Chomsky,
  Manufacturing Consent, Vintage, London, 1988/1994; Jeffery Klaehn
  (editor), Filtering the News: Essays on Herman and Chomsky’s
  Propaganda Model, Black Rose Books, Montreal, 2005; Jeffery Klaehn
  (editor), Bound By Power: Intended Consequences, Black Rose Books,
  Montreal, 2006; Jeffery Klaehn (editor), The Political Economy of
  Media and Power, Peter Lang, New York, 2010; John Pilger, Hidden
  Agendas, Vintage, London, 1998.

  52 Herman and Chomsky, Manufacturing Consent

  53 See Chapter 2 of Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century by Edwards and
  Cromwell.

6. Power’s Assault on Democracy

  1 Alex Carey, Taking the Risk Out of Democracy: Corporate Propaganda
  versus Freedom and Liberty, University of Illinois Press, Champaign,
  1995/1997, p. 21

  2 Ibid., p. ix

  3 Thomas Friedman, quoted in John Pilger, The New Rulers of the World,
  Verso, 2001, p. 114

  4 Quoted in Noam Chomsky, Hegemony or Survival: America’s Quest for
  Global Dominance, Hamish Hamilton, London, 2003, p. 15

  5 Corporate Watch, ‘What’s Wrong with Corporate Social
  Responsibility?’, 2006, p. 2; www.corporatewatch.org/?lid=2670

  6 Larry Elliott, ‘Blue chips see the green light,’ Guardian, 12 June
  2006

  7 Corporate Watch, ‘What’s Wrong with Corporate Social
  Responsibility?’, p. 2; see note 5.

  8 Email to Greenpeace’s Stephen Tinsdale from David Cromwell, 17
  January 2002.

  9 Email from Stephen Tinsdale to David Cromwell, 28 January 2002.

  10 ‘Silence is Green,’ Media Lens media alert, 3 February 2005;
  http://bit.ly/qIHIem

  11 See earlier description of Herman and Chomsky’s propaganda model in
  Chapter 5.

  12 David Cromwell, ‘Bay in the Dock,’ Guardian, 24 January 2001.

  13 Mark Achbar, Jennifer Abbott and Joel Bakan, The Corporation,
  documentary, 2003; www.youtube.com/view_play_list?p=FA50FBC214A6CE87;
  Joel Bakan, The Corporation: The Pathological Pursuit of Profit and
  Power, Constable, London, 2004.

  14 Bakan, The Corporation, pp. 70-71

  15 Noam Chomsky interviewed in documentary, The Corporation, 2003; see
  note 13

  16 Email to John Vidal of the Guardian from David Cromwell, 4
  September 2006

  17 Abigail Townsend, ‘So companies should be nicer,’ Independent on
  Sunday, 18 June 2006

  18 Abigail Townsend, ‘Rust in the pipes is corroding BP’s shiny
  reputation,’ Independent on Sunday, 13 August 2006

  19 Editorial, ‘Sick set of priorities,’ Morning Star, 20 November 2006

  20 John Vidal, Tania Branigan and James Randerson, ‘Global warming:
  Could scrapping these...…save this?’, Guardian, 4 November 2006

  21 Rob Edwards, ‘Replacing Trident system to cost £100bn,’ Sunday
  Herald, 10 February 2007

  22 Greenpeace, ‘£97 billion for Trident: five times government
  estimates,’ 18 September 2009;
  www.greenpeace.org.uk/blog/peace/trident-costs-are-running-out-control-20090917

  23 Barry Mason, ‘Britain: Income inequality at a record high,’ World
  Socialist Web Site, 4 June 2009;
  www.wsws.org/articles/2009/jun2009/inco-j04.shtml

  24 Polly Toynbee, ‘If Cameron can climb on my caravan, anything is
  possible,’ Guardian, 22 November 2006.

  25 Mark Curtis, Web of Deceit: Britain’s Real Role in the World,
  Vintage, London, 2003, p. 217.

  26 Richard Norton-Taylor, ‘Beware of Trident-Lite,’ Guardian, 23
  November 2006

  27 Email from David Cromwell to Polly Toynbee, 22 November 2006

  28 Email from Polly Toynbee to David Cromwell, 23 November 2006

  29 Email from David Cromwell to Deborah Orr, 14 February 2007

  30 Deborah Orr, ‘These are the cold hard facts: Britain is failing an
  entire generation of children,’ Independent, 14 February 2007

  31 Martin Luther King, ‘On racism, poverty, capitalism, and other big
  questions,’ The Southern Christian Leadership Conference Presidential
  Address, 16 August 1967; www.hartford-hwp.com/archives/45a/628.html

  32 Amartya Sen, quoted in Howard Zinn, A Power Governments Cannot
  Suppress, City Lights Books, San Francisco, 2007, p 210

  33 James Daley, ‘Independent News & Media close to APN deal,’
  Independent, 13 February 2007

  34 Nigel Morris, ‘Bleak view of the gulf between people and
  government,’ Independent, 27 February 2006

  35 Leader, Independent, 28 February 2006

  36 Leader, Guardian, 28 February 2006

  37 Jonathan Freedland, ‘Without power of our own, we wait on the whims
  of politicians,’ Guardian, 1 March 2006

  38 Both articles by Rachel Sylvester and Alice Thomson, Daily
  Telegraph, 27 February 2006

  39 Rachel Sylvester, ‘Will the iPod generation see off party politics
  as we know it?’, Daily Telegraph, 27 February 2006

  40 ‘Political system faces “meltdown”’, BBC News online, 27 February
  2006, http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/uk_politics/4753876.stm

  41 Gordon Brown, ‘We have renewed Britain; now we must champion it,’
  Guardian, 27 February 2006

  42 Power to the People, ‘The Report of Power: An independent inquiry
  into Britain’s Democracy,’ 27 February 2006;
  http://citizensinquiry.org/report/index.php, p.29

  43 Tania Brannigan, ‘Inquiry proposes radical overhaul of party
  funding,’ Guardian, 27 February 2006

  44 Power Report, p. 163; see note 42

  45 Ibid., p. 164

  46 Ibid., p. 165

  47 Ibid., p. 244

  48 Ibid., p. 245

  49 Ibid., p. 245

  50 Ibid., pp. 244-245

  51 Tim Luckhurst, ‘Time to take sides,’ Independent, 1 July 2003

  52 Thomas Ferguson, Golden Rule: Investment Theory of Party
  Competition and the Logic of Money-driven Political Systems,
  University of Chicago Press, 1995

  53 Power Report, p. 258; see note 42

  54 Robert McChesney, Rich Media, Poor Democracy: Communication
  Politics in Dubious Times, The New Press, New York, 2000, p. 260

  55 Quoted, ibid., p. 112

  56 Quoted in Christopher Hill, The World Turned Upside Down: Radical
  Ideas During the English Revolution, Penguin, London, 1972/1991, p. 72

  57 Ibid., pp. 365-366

  58 Cited in Chris Harman, A People’s History of the World: From the
  Stone Age to the New Millennium, Verso, London, 1999/2008, p. 315

  59 Carey, Taking the Risk out of Democracy, p. 80

  60 Quoted in Noam Chomsky, Rogue States: The Role of Force in World
  Affairs, Pluto Press, London, 2000, p. 120

  61 Elizabeth Fones-Wolf, Selling Free Enterprise: The Business Assault
  on Labour and Liberalism, 1945-60, University of Illinois Press,
  Champaign, 1994, p. 6

  62 Carey, Taking the Risk out of Democracy, p. 27

  63 Ibid., p. 24

  64 Edwards and Cromwell, Guardians of Power, pp. 156-157

  65 Curtis, Web of Deceit, pp. 210-211

  66 Noam Chomsky, Failed States: The Abuse of Power and The Assault on
  Democracy, Hamish Hamilton, London, 2006, p. 149

  67 Noam Chomsky, Understanding Power, edited by Peter R. Mitchell and
  John Schoeffel, The New Press, 2002, p. 70

  68 Denis Campbell, ‘Trust in politicians hits an all-time low,’
  Observer, 27 September 2009.

7. Endless Echoes

  1 Gar Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, Vintage Books,
  New York, 1995/1996, p. 3

  2 Memo to President Truman from Secretary of War Henry Stimson and
  Brigadier General Leslie Groves, 25 April 1945; cited in Tsuyoshi
  Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy: Stalin, Truman, and the Surrender of
  Japan, Harvard University Press, Cambridge, 2005, p. 66

  3 There is significant doubt as to whether a single identifiable
  formal US ‘decision’ to use the atomic bomb was taken, rather than the
  momentum of the Manhattan Project and war itself leading almost
  inexorably towards the tragedies of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. Brigadier
  General Groves, the head of the Manhattan Project, described Truman as
  ‘a little boy on a toboggan,’ the headlong rush carrying the president
  along until the bomb was dropped. (Cited in Peter J. Kuznick, ‘The
  decision to risk the future: Harry Truman, the Atomic Bomb and the
  Apocalyptic Narrative,’ Japan Focus, 23 July 2007;
  http://japanfocus.org/-Peter_J_-Kuznick/2479) Historian Barton
  Bernstein writes that: ‘The reason careful historians cannot find
  records of a top-level A-bomb “decision” is not because there was a
  fear by US policy-makers and advisers of keeping records or mentioning
  the bomb (quite a few diaries of the time mention it, usually in
  now-easy-to-decipher code), but, rather, because there was no need for
  an actual “decision” meeting. Such a meeting would have been required
  if there had been a serious question about whether or not to use the
  bomb on Japan. No one at or near the top in the US government raised
  such a question; no one at the top objected before Hiroshima and
  Nagasaki to use of the weapon on the enemy.’ (Barton J. Bernstein,
  H-Diplo Roundtable Reviews, Volume VII, No. 2 (2006), Tsuyoshi
  Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy: Stalin, Truman, and the Surrender of
  Japan, Review (Barton J. Bernstein, Stanford University), p 15;
  http://www.h-net.org/~diplo/roundtables/PDF/Bernstein-HasegawaRoundtable.pdf

  4 For a careful review of the relevant historical literature, see
  Barton J. Bernstein, ‘Introducing the Interpretative Problems of
  Japan’s 1945 Surrender: A Historiographical Essay on Recent Literature
  in the West,’ Chapter 1 of The End of the Pacific War: Reappraisals,
  edited by Tsuyoshi Hasegawa, Stanford University Press, Stanford, 2007

  5 Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, p. 147

  6 For a summary of the book and further details, see:
  http://www.hup.harvard.edu/catalog/HASRAC.html. The most comprehensive
  discussion to date on the issues raised by Hasegawa’s book, featuring
  exchanges with several critics, are to be found in the H-Diplo Book
  Roundtable Reviews session at
  www.h-net.org/~diplo/roundtables/#hasegawa

  7 Bernstein, H-Diplo Roundtable Reviews, pp. 1-2

  8 Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, p. 140

  9 Ibid., pp. 298-299

  10 Not all A-bomb historians, or even revisionist historians,
  subscribe to the ‘race’ framework for interpreting the evidence.
  Bernstein notably dissents from this view, at least as expressed in
  the H-Diplo Roundtable Reviews. See note 3 above for full reference

  11 China was not invited to Potsdam, which was a meeting between the
  Big Three of the United States, the Soviet Union and the UK. However,
  the approval of Chiang Kai-shek, China’s Nationalist leader, was
  sought for the Potsdam Proclamation, and his name, unlike Stalin’s,
  appears on the Proclamation. Truman flatly rejected Stalin’s request
  to add the Soviet leader’s name to the Proclamation after it had been
  issued. See Chapter 4 of Racing the Enemy for further details

  12 Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, p. 178

  13 Ibid., p. 176

  14 Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb; in particular,
  Chapters 18 and 24

  15 Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, p. 152

  16 I note ‘supposed’ because there is a strong argument, given at
  greater length in Racing the Enemy, that Japan did not, in fact,
  reject the Proclamation. See, in particular, p. 211 of Racing the
  Enemy, where Hasegawa writes: ‘He [Kiichiro Hiranuma, chairman of the
  Privy Council], asked [Foreign Minister] Togo whether it was true as
  the Soviet declaration stated, that the Japanese government had
  formally rejected the Potsdam Proclamation. Togo said that it was not
  true. Baron Hiranuma asked: “What, then, is the basis for their claim
  that we rejected the Potsdam Proclamation?” Togo simply replied: “They
  must have imagined that we did.”’

  17 Peter J. Kuznick, ‘The decision to risk the future: Harry Truman,
  the Atomic Bomb and the Apocalyptic Narrative,’ Japan Focus, 23 July
  2007; http://japanfocus.org/-Peter_J_-Kuznick/2479

  18 Ibid., cited

  19 Ibid., cited

  20 Ibid., cited

  21 Ibid., cited

  22 Ibid., cited

  23 Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, p. 238

  24 Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, pp. 299-300

  25 Oliver Kamm, ‘Terrible, but not a crime,’ Guardian, 6 August 2007

  26 For a more careful and authoritative discussion, see Bernstein,
  ‘Introducing the Interpretative Problems of Japan’s 1945 Surrender,’
  in Hasegawa, The End of the Pacific War, p. 15. Bernstein argues that
  the likelihood goes the other way: dropping the atomic bomb caused
  more suffering

  27 Oliver Kamm, ‘Media Lens once more,’ 17 October 2007;
  http://oliverkamm.typepad.com/blog/2006/10/media_lens_once.html;
  ‘Media Lens vs. historical understanding,’ 13 December 2006;
  http://oliverkamm.typepad.com/blog/2006/12/media_lens_vs_h.html; for
  an appraisal of Kamm, see the Media Lens media alert:
  http://bit.ly/jCJ3gY

  28 Email from Tsuyoshi Hasegawa to David Cromwell, 5 December 2007.

  29 Hasegawa, The End of the Pacific War, p. 129. Chapter 4 of this
  book is a contribution by Hasegawa which is a comprehensive critique
  of anti-revisionist arguments made by Sadao Asada and Richard B.
  Frank, author of Downfall: The End of the Japanese Imperial Empire,
  Random House, New York, 1999

  30 Hasegawa, The End of the Pacific War, p. 131

  31 Email from Tsuyoshi Hasegawa to David Cromwell, 5 December 2007

  32 Kuznick, ‘The decision to risk the future’; see note 17

  33 Passport, Newsletter of the Society for Historians of American
  Foreign Relations (SHAFR), December 2003;
  www.shafr.org/newsletter/2003/december/kort.htm

  34 Barton Bernstein, ‘Marshall, Leahy, and Casualty Issues – A Reply
  to Kort’s Flawed Critique,’ Passport, SHAFR newsletter, August 2004,
  www.shafr.org/newsletter/2004/august/bernstein.htm

  35 Email from Tsuyoshi Hasegawa to David Cromwell, 5 December 2007

  36 Barton Bernstein, ‘Reconsidering the “Atomic General”: Leslie R.
  Groves,’ Journal of Military History 67 (July 2003): 883-920; footnote
  46 on page 910

  37 Such as article cited in note 25

  38 Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, p. 7

  39 Ibid., p. 7

  40 Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, p. 299

  41 Cited in Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, p. 295. See also Bernstein,
  ‘Introducing the Interpretative Problems of Japan’s 1945 Surrender’;
  in particular, p 31

  42 Japan’s top military and civil leaders, the so-called ‘Big Six,’
  gambled heavily, and disastrously, on maintaining neutrality with the
  Soviet Union. Their reason for this policy was that Japan was ‘waging
  a life-or-death struggle against the United States and Britain.’
  Should the Soviets enter the war, it would ‘deal a death blow to the
  Empire.’ (Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, pp. 71-72)

  43 Bernstein, cited in Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, p. 295

  44 Email from Gar Alperovitz, 5 December 2007

  45 Hasegawa, Racing the Enemy, pp. 172-173

  46 Ibid., p. 99

  47 Kuznick, ‘The decision to risk the future’; see note 17

  48 Hasegawa, The End of the Pacific War, p. 144.

  49 Ibid., p. 144

  50 Ibid., p. 144

  51 Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, p. 12

  52 Robert Messer, cited by Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic
  Bomb, p. 204

  53 For this quote, and a summary of Truman’s deceptions, see
  Alperovitz, The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb, pp. 512-514

  54 Garry Wills, Bomb Power: The Modern Presidency and the National
  Security State, The Penguin Press, New York, 2010, jacket notes

  55 See Chapter 4

  56 Leonard Doyle, ‘First test for Obama’s more engaging foreign policy
  plan,’ Independent, 30 March 2009.

8. The Madness of the Global Economy

  1 Ronald Wright, A Short History of Progress, Canongate, Edinburgh,
  2004/2006

  2 Martin Wolf, ‘Why regulators should intervene in bankers’ pay,’
  Financial Times, 16 January 2008

  3 Anatole Kaletsky, ‘Relax. Our economy isn’t manic depressive,’ The
  Times, 24 January 2008

  4 Hamish McRae, ‘The markets are bad, but don’t panic just yet,’
  Independent, 23 January 2008

  5 The term ‘masters of the universe’ as deployed in Tom Wolfe’s 1987
  novel, The Bonfire of the Vanities, about banking, greed, racism,
  ambition and class

  6 Sean O’Grady, ‘Davos. Wealth, power and a sprinkling of stardust,’
  Independent, 22 January 2008

  7 Jonathan Freedland, ‘The free-marketeers abhor the crutch of the
  state – until they start limping,’ Guardian, 23 January 2008

  8 George W. Bush, quoted, Democracy Now!, ‘Economics Journalist Robert
  Kuttner on the “Most Serious Financial Crisis Since the Great
  Depression”’, 23 January 2008;
  www.democracynow.org/2008/1/23/recession

  9 David Harvey, The Enigma of Capital: And the Crises of Capitalism,
  Profile Books, London, 2010, p. 5

  10 George Monbiot, ‘The planet is now so vandalised that only total
  energy renewal can save us,’ Guardian, 25 November 2008

  11 John Pilger, ‘The War on Democracy,’ New Statesman, 19 January 2012

  12 Harry Shutt, Beyond the Profits System: Possibilities for a
  Post-Capitalist Era, Zed Books, London, 2010, p. 36

  13 In 2012, no doubt at least partly because of public anger at his
  actions, Goodwin was stripped of his knighthood

  14 Patrick Wintour, ‘Brown’s new year message hails end of “free
  market dogma,”’ Guardian, 1 January 2009

  15 The unpopular invasion-occupations of Iraq and Afghanistan surely
  played a significant role too

  16 David Smith, Kate Walsh and Michael Woodhead, ‘Merkel’s stab in the
  dark,’ Sunday Times, 23 May 2010

  17 Harry Shutt, Beyond the Profits System, p 6

  18 Noam Chomsky, Hopes and Prospects, Hamish Hamilton, London, 2010,
  pp. 222-223

  19 Joel Bakan, The Corporation: The Pathological Pursuit of Power and
  Profit, Constable Books, London, 2004

  20 See Harvey, The Enigma of Capital.

  21 Email from Harry Shutt to David Cromwell, 28 January 2008

  22 Gerry Gold and Paul Feldman, A House of Cards: From fantasy finance
  to global crash, Lupus Books, London, 2007, p. 28

  23 Email from Harry Shutt to David Cromwell, 28 January 2008

  24 See Harry Shutt, The Decline of Capitalism: Can a Self-Regulated
  Profits System Survive?, Zed Books, London, 2005, pp. 104-105

  25 David Harvey, A Brief History of Neoliberalism, Oxford University
  Press, Oxford, 2005, p. 154

  26 Shutt, The Decline of Capitalism, pp. 36-37

  27 Franz J. Broswimmer, Ecocide: A Short History of the Mass
  Extinction of Species, Pluto Press, London, 2002

  28 Harvey, A Brief History of Neoliberalism, pp. 10-11

  29 Ibid., p. 57

  30 Chomsky, Hopes and Prospects, p. 91

  31 Harvey, A Brief History of Neoliberalism, pp. 118-119

  32 Ruth Blakeley, State Terrorism and Neoliberalism: The North in the
  South, Routledge, London, 2009.

  33 Ibid., p. 19

  34 See, for example, Noam Chomsky and Edward Herman, The Washington
  Connection and Third World Fascism: The Political Economy of Human
  Rights, Vol. 1, South End Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts, 1979;
  Edward Herman, The Real Terror Network: Terrorism in Fact and
  Propaganda, South End Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts, 1982; William
  Blum, Killing Hope: US Military and CIA Interventions since World War
  11, Common Courage Press, Monroe, Maine, 1995

  35 See note 16

  36 Email from David Smith to David Cromwell, 28 May 2010. The David
  Harvey quote is on page 260 of The Enigma of Capital

  37 Email from David Smith to David Cromwell, 28 May 2010

  38 Extracts from the BBC Editorial Guidelines;
  www.bbc.co.uk/bbctrust/assets/files/pdf/review_report_research/impartiality_21century/f_editorial_guidelines_extracts.txt;
  accessed 13 January 2012

  39 Email from David Cromwell to Martin Wolf, 2 October 2008

  40 Martin Wolf, ‘Congress decides it is worth risking depression,’
  Financial Times, 1 October 2008

  41 Email to David Cromwell from Martin Wolf, 2 October 2008

  42 Email to Martin Wolf from David Cromwell, 2 October 2008

  43 Email to David Cromwell from Martin Wolf, 2 October 2008.

  44 Email to Martin Wolf from David Cromwell, 2 October 2008

  45 Media Lens message board: www.medialens.org/board A few journalists
  feign moral disapproval, or perhaps genuinely feel outraged, when
  email exchanges are made public. But then, are they not commentators
  in the public domain? Are the topics under discussion of such delicacy
  that the journalists should be shielded from the population? It would
  be different if genuinely confidential or private matters were being
  discussed. Any journalistic umbrage is more likely a cover for the
  fear that they would say one thing in private and another in public;
  or perhaps simply that they are aware that their views do not bear up
  under challenge

  46 Joe Emersberger, posted 4 October 2008;
  www.medialens.org/forum/viewtopic.php?t=2855

  47 Ibid

  48 Hamish McRae, ‘The markets are bad, but don’t panic just yet,’
  Independent, 23 January 2008

  49 Email to Hamish McRae from David Cromwell, 23 January 2008

  50 Naomi Klein, Shock Doctrine: The Rise of Disaster Capitalism,
  Penguin, London, 2007

  51 David Kotz, ‘The Role of the State in Economic Transformation:
  Comparing the Transition Experiences of Russia and China,’ Political
  Economy Research Institute, University of Massachusetts at Amherst, 1
  October 2004;
  www.peri.umass.edu/fileadmin/pdf/working_papers/working_papers_51-100/WP95.pdf

  52 Palagummi Sainath, ‘India 2007: High growth, low development,’ The
  Hindu, 24 December 2007

  53 Cited in Harvey, The Enigma of Capital, p. 223

  54 John Pilger, ‘Glossy façades can’t hide an Indian spring,’ New
  Statesman, 30 December 2011

  55 Special correspondent, ‘Farmers’ suicides nothing but genocide,
  says Vandana Shiva,’ The Hindu, 9 May 2006.

  56 John Pilger, ‘Glossy façades can’t hide an Indian spring’; see note
  54.

  57 Ibid., cited

  58 Eduardo Porter, ‘China shrinks,’ New York Times, 9 December 2007

  59 Email from Martin Hart-Landsberg to David Cromwell, 26 January 2008

  60 Jeremy Rifkin, ‘Return of a Conundrum,’ Guardian, 2 March 2004

  61 Harvey, The Enigma of Capital, p. 66

  62 Martin Hart-Landsberg, ‘Globalization And Its Consequences,’
  Reports from the Economic Front, 6 June, 2011;
  http://media.lclark.edu/content/hart-landsberg/2011/06/06/globalization-and-its-consequences/

  63 Richard McGregor, ‘China’s poorest worse off after boom,’ Financial
  Times, 21 November 2006

  64 Report cited in Sanjay Reddy, ‘Death in China, Market Reforms and
  Health,’ New Left Review, 45, May/June 2007, p. 62; article available
  at www.columbia.edu/~sr793/8DeathinChinaNLR45.pdf

  65 Email from Martin Hart-Landsberg to David Cromwell, 26 January 2008

  66 See http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gini_coefficient

  67 Asian Development Bank, ‘Inequality in Asia, Key Indicators 2007,
  Special Chapter Highlights,’ p. 3; http://www.adb.org/statistics/

  68 Ibid., p. 7

  69 Email from Martin Hart-Landsberg to David Cromwell, 26 January 2008

  70 Hua Zhang, ‘China’s Climate Change Performance Worsening,’
  Worldwatch Institute, 23 November 2006;
  http://www.worldwatch.org/node/4748

  71 Climate Change Performance Index 2012: Overall Results,
  Germanwatch.org, 13 January 2012;
  http://www.germanwatch.org/klima/ccpi12tm.pdf

  72 Harry Shutt, The Trouble with Capitalism: An Enquiry into the
  Causes of Global Economic Failure, Pluto Press, London, 1998/2009

  73 Rasmussen Reports, ‘Just 53% Say Capitalism Better Than Socialism,’
  9 April 2009;
  http://www.rasmussenreports.com/public_content/politics/general_politics/just_53_say_capitalism_better_than_socialism

  74 See David Edwards and David Cromwell, Guardians of Power: The Myth
  of the Liberal Media, Pluto Books, London, 2006; David Edwards and
  David Cromwell, Newspeak in the 21^(st) Century, Pluto Books, London,
  2009.

9. Beyond Indifference

  1 Osho, The Book of Man, Penguin, New Delhi, 2002/2004, p. 30.

  2 Colin Wilson, The Outsider, Phoenix, London, 1956/2001, p 66

  3 Colin Wilson, Introduction to the New Existentialism, Hutchinson,
  London, 1966, p. 152

  4 Colin Wilson, Religion and the Rebel, Ashgrove Press, Bath,
  1957/1984, p. 300

  5 Wilson, Introduction to the New Existentialism, p. 129

  6 Wilson, The Outsider, p. 295

  7 Ibid., p. 295

  8 Meric A. Srokosz et al., RRS Discovery Cruise 227, 15 April-16 May
  1997, ‘Plankton patchiness studies by ship and satellite: P2S3,’
  Southampton Oceanography Centre Cruise Report No. 12;
  http://eprints.soton.ac.uk/309/

  9 David Cromwell, Private Planet: Corporate Plunder and the Fight
  Back, Jon Carpenter, Charlbury, 2001

  10 Wilson, The Outsider, p. 295

  11 Colin Wilson, Beyond The Outsider: The Philosophy of the Future,
  Arthur Baker Limited, London, 1965, pp. 97-98

  12 This subtle though important concept need not detain us here. But
  see, for example, the section titled ‘The Emptiness of I’ in Geshe
  Kelsang Gyatso’s Eight Steps to Happiness: The Buddhist Way of Loving
  Kindness, Tharpa, Thulverston, 2000, pp. 191-195

  13 Quoted in Wilson, Beyond the Outsider, p. 33

  14 Wilson, The Outsider, p. 201

  15 Shantideva’s Guide to the Bodhisattva’s Way of Life, translated by
  Neil Elliott under guidance from Geshe Kelsang Gyatso, Tharpa
  Publications, Ulverston, 2002, p. 134

  16 Wilson, Introduction to the New Existentialism, p. 25

  17 Geshe Kelsang Gyatso, The Meditation Handbook, Tharpa Publications,
  London, 1990/1995, p. 37

  18 Friedrich Nietzsche, Thus Spake Zarathustra, Dover Publications,
  Mineola, 1883-1885/1999, p. 109

  19 Ibid., p. 249

  20 Michael Tanner, Nietzsche: A Very Short Introduction, Oxford
  University Press, Oxford, 2000, p. 95

  21 Friedrich Nietzsche, Twilight of the Idols and The Anti-Christ,
  Penguin Classics, London, 1888/2003, p. 130

  22 Nietzsche, The Anti-Christ, p. 128

  23 Tanner, Nietzsche, pp. 36-37

  24 Nietzsche, The Anti-Christ, p. 127

  25 Jean-François Revel and Matthieu Ricard, The Monk and the
  Philosopher: A Father and Son Discuss the Meaning of Life, Schocken
  Books, Random House, New York, 2000, p. 314

  26 Ibid., p. 318

  27 I believe, also, that Wilson cannot accept that Buddhism refutes
  the concept of an independently existing self. Instead, Wilson is
  attracted to philosopher Edmund Husserl’s notion of a ‘transcendental
  ego’ or a ‘real self.’ We do not explore these concepts further here

  28 Colin Wilson, Poetry and Mysticism, Hutchinson & Co., London, 1972,
  p. 30

  29 Revel and Ricard, The Monk and the Philosopher, p. 177.

  30 Wilson, Poetry and Mysticism, p 30

  31 An easy and yet powerful place to start is The Art of Happiness: A
  Handbook for Living by the Dalai Lama and Howard C. Cutler, Coronet
  Books, London, 1998. Also highly recommended is Eight Steps to
  Happiness: The Buddhist Way of Loving Kindness by Geshe Kelsang
  Gyatso, Tharpa Publications, Ulverston, 2000/2001

  32 Revel and Ricard, The Monk and the Philosopher, p. 32

  33 Marcus Aurelius, Meditations, translation by Gregory Hays, Phoenix,
  London, 2003, p. 194

  34 Paul Gilbert, a practising clinical psychologist, addresses this
  important point at length in his excellent book, The Compassionate
  Mind, Constable & Robinson, London, 2009/ 2010

  35 Erich Fromm, Fear of Freedom, Routledge, London, 1942/2002, p. 116

  36 Steven Pinker, How The Mind Works, Penguin, London, 1997, p. 30

  37 Steven Pinker, The Blank Slate: The Modern Denial of Human Nature,
  Penguin, London, 2002, p. 256

  38 Pinker, The Blank Slate, p. 272

  39 Martin Seligman, Authentic Happiness: Using the New Positive
  Psychology to Realize Your Potential for Lasting Fulfillment, Nicholas
  Brealey Publishing, London, 2003, p. 69

  40 Daniel Goleman, Destructive Emotions And How We Can Overcome Them:
  A Dialogue with the Dalai Lama, Bloomsbury, London, 2003, p. 280

  41 Seligman, Authentic Happiness, p. xiii

  42 Ibid., p. 211

  43 Ernst Cassirer, An Essay on Man, Yale University Press, New Haven
  and London, 1944/1992, p. 53

  44 The Dalai Lama and Howard C. Cutler, The Art of Happiness at Work,
  Hodder and Stoughton, London, 2003, p. 30

  45 Seligman, Authentic Happiness, p. 43.

  46 Ibid., p. 35

  47 Danny Wallace does a fine job of showing this in his funny book,
  Join Me: The True Story of a Man Who Started a Cult by Accident, Ebury
  Press, London, 2004

  48 Stefan Einhorn, The Art of Being Kind, translated by Neil Smith,
  Sphere, London, 2005/2006, p. 81

  49 Aurelius, Meditations, p. 20.

10. Freedom at Last?

  1 David Michie, Buddhism for Busy People: Finding Happiness in an
  Uncertain World, Snow Lion Publications, Ithaca, New York, 2008, p.
  117.

  2 Bryan Cromwell, Bankhead: The Story of a Primary School at War,
  Clydeside Press, Glasgow, 2001. Bryan Cromwell, Fighting the Bug:
  Disease, Diet and Education in Early Knightswood, Spiderwize,
  Clashnessie, 2008.

  3 Howard Zinn, A People’s History of the United States: 1492-Present,
  Perennial Classics edition, HarperCollins, New York, 1980/1999.

  4 Howard Zinn, The Politics of History, second edition, University of
  Illinois Press, Urbana, 1990, p. xx.

  5 See, for example, the chapter titled ‘Silent Science: The Corporate
  Takeover of the Universities’ in George Monbiot, Captive State: The
  Corporate Takeover of Britain, MacMillan, London, 2000, and the report
  Degrees of Capture, co-published by PLATFORM, Corporate Watch and the
  New Economics Foundation, March 2003;
  www.platformlondon.org/carbonweb/showitem.asp?article=99&parent=9.
  Scientists for Global Responsibility published an extensive report,
  Science and the Corporate Agenda: The detrimental effects of
  commercial influence on science and technology, 12 October 2009
  (www.sgr.org.uk/publications/science-and-corporate-agenda). See also
  Stuart Parkinson, Science and the corporate university in Britain,
  openDemocracy, 16 December 2011;
  www.opendemocracy.net/ourkingdom/stuart-parkinson/science-and-corporate-university-in-britain.
  In the United States, the Union of Concerned Scientists published a
  report in February 2012 titled Heads They Win, Tails We Lose: How
  Corporations Corrupt Public Science;
  www.ucsusa.org/scientific_integrity/abuses_of_science/how-corporations-corrupt-science.html

  6 Leo Tolstoy, ‘What shall we do?’, The Free Age Press, London, ca.
  1905, p 104; www.archive.org/details/whatshallwedo00tolsrich

  7 Zinn, The Politics of History, p. 9

  8 Crisis Forum web site, www.crisis-forum.org.uk

  9 Jeff Schmidt, Disciplined Minds: A Critical Look at Salaried
  Professionals and the Soul-Battering System that Shapes Their Lives,
  Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Lanham, 2000, p. 16

  10 Ibid., p. 41

  11 Mark Curtis, Unpeople: Britain’s Secret Human Rights Abuses,
  Vintage, London, 2004, p. 322

  12 Edward Herman, ‘The Banality of Evil,’ essay from Herman’s book,
  Triumph of the Market: Essays on Economics, Politics and the Media,
  South End Press, Boston, 1995;
  www.thirdworld-traveler.com/Herman%20/BanalityEvil_Herman.html

  13 Mark Curtis, The Ambiguities of Power: British Foreign Policy Since
  1945, Zed Books, London, 1995, p. 4

  14 John Gray, Straw Dogs: Thoughts on Humans and Other Animals, Granta
  Books, London, 2002/2003, p. 92

  15 Richard J. Davidson and Anne Harrington (editors), Visions of
  Compassion: Western Scientists and Tibetan Buddhists Examine Human
  Nature, Oxford University Press, Oxford, 2002, p. v.

  16 Erich Fromm, The Anatomy of Human Destructiveness, Pimlico, London,
  1973/1997

  17 Frans de Waal, Our Inner Ape: The Best and Worst of Human Nature,
  Granta Books, London, 2005, p. 137.

  18 Ibid., p. 2

  19 Erich Fromm, Man for Himself: An Enquiry into the Psychology of
  Ethics, Routledge, 1947/2003, London, p. 15

  20 Ibid., p. 17

  21 Ibid., p. 44

  22 See, for example, Fromm, The Anatomy of Human Destructiveness, pp.
  228-247, and references therein

  23 Cited in Chris Harman, A People’s History of the World: From the
  Stone Age to the New Millennium, Verso, London, 1999/2008, p. 3

  24 Steve Taylor, The Fall: The Insanity of the Ego in Human History
  and The Dawning of a New Era, O-Books, Winchester, 2004, p. 22

  25 Steven Pinker, The Blank Slate: The Modern Denial of Human Nature,
  Penguin, London, 2002, p. 111

  26 Ibid., p. 188

  27 Sober, ‘Kindness and Cruelty in Evolution,’ in Davidson and
  Harrington, Visions of Compassion, p. 54

  28 Ibid., p. 53. See also Unto Others: The Evolution and Psychology of
  Unselfish Behavior by Elliott Sober and David Sloan Wilson, Harvard
  University Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts, 1998

  29 Sober, ‘Kindness and Cruelty in Evolution,’ in Davidson and
  Harrington, Visions of Compassion, p. 62

  30 See also Peter Singer, The Expanding Circle: Ethics and
  Sociobiology, Clarendon Press, Oxford, 1981

  31 Sober, ‘Kindness and Cruelty in Evolution,’ in Davidson and
  Harrington, Visions of Compassion, p. 64

  32 See Sharon Begley, Train Your Mind, Change Your Brain: How a New
  Science Reveals Our Extraordinary Potential to Transform Ourselves,
  Ballantine Books, New York, 2007; Daniel Goleman, Destructive Emotions
  And How We Can Overcome Them: A Dialogue with the Dalai Lama,
  Bloomsbury, London, 2003; The Dalai Lama and Howard C. Cutler, The Art
  of Happiness: A Handbook for Living, Coronet Books, London, 1998; Paul
  Gilbert, The Compassionate Mind: A New Approach to Life’s Challenges,
  Constable & Robinson, London, 2009/2010; Jonathan Haidt, The Happiness
  Hypothesis: Putting Ancient Wisdom and Philosophy To the Test of
  Modern Science, William Heinemann, London, 2006; Matthieu Ricard,
  Happiness: A Guide To Developing Life’s Most Important Skill, Atlantic
  Books, London, 2003/2007; Sharon Salzberg, Lovingkindness: The
  Revolutionary Art of Happiness, Shambhala Publications, Boston, 1995;
  Martin E. P. Seligman, Authentic Happiness: Using the New Positive
  Psychology to Realize Your Potential for Lasting Fulfillment, Nicholas
  Brealey Publishing, London, 2003

  33 Malcolm X with Alex Haley, The Autobiography of Malcolm X, Penguin
  Books, London, 1965/2001, p. 37. See also the in-depth biography by
  Manning Marable, Malcolm X: A Life of Reinvention, Allen Lane, London,
  2011

  34 Goleman, Destructive Emotions And How We Can Overcome Them;
  especially Chapter 1

  35 See David Edwards, ‘Animal Rights – The Case For Kindness,’
  Cogitation, Media Lens, 4 August 2004; http://bit.ly/GCiR94

  36 Howard Zinn, You Can’t Be Neutral on a Moving Train: A Personal
  History of Our Times, Beacon Press, Boston, 2002, p. 208

  37 Ibid., p. 10

  38 en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bombing_of_Hamburg_in_World_War_II; accessed
  17 February 2012

  39 Quoted in Stuart Jeffries, ‘Fanning the flames,’ Guardian, 23
  December 2006.

  40 Ibid.

  41 Quoted in Nicholson Baker, Human Smoke: The Beginnings of World War
  II, the End of Civilization, Simon and Schuster, London, 2008, p. 134

  42 Ibid., p. 182.

  43 Ibid., p. 209

  44 Ibid., p. 218

  45 George Orwell, ‘As I please,’ essay, Tribune, 7 July 1944

  46 Martin Bell, ‘An army Christmas in Iraq,’ BBC news online, 23
  December 2006; news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/programmes/from
  _our_own_correspondent/6200511.stm

  47 The propaganda does indeed have remarkable parallels. Nikolai
  Lanine served with the Soviet Army during its 1979-1989 occupation of
  Afghanistan, and now lives and works as a peace activist in Canada.
  See the media alert he did with Media Lens: ‘Invasion – A Comparison
  of Soviet and Western Media Performance,’ 20 November 2007;
  http://bit.ly/zFAQ3b

  48 Robert Fisk, The Great War for Civilization: The Conquest of the
  Middle East, Fourth Estate, London, 2005, p. 1161

  49 Mark Kurlansky, Nonviolence: The History of a Dangerous Idea,
  Jonathan Cape, London, 2006, p. 135

  50 Ibid., p. 136

  51 Ibid., p. 158

  52 Ibid., p. 83

  53 Dee Brown, Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee: An Indian History of the
  American West, Washington Square Press, New York, 1970/1981; Winona
  LaDuke with Sean Cruz, The Militarization of Indian Country, Honor the
  Earth, Minneapolis, 2011; Zinn, A People’s History of the United
  States

  54 Brown, Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee, p. 8

  55 Kurlansky, Nonviolence, p. 65

  56 Ibid., p. 61

  57 Timothy Garton Ash, ‘Imagine no America,’ Guardian, 19 September
  2002

  58 Richard Seymour, The Liberal Defence of Murder, Verso, London, 2008

  59 See note 12 above

  60 Edward Herman, ‘Michael Ignatieff on Israeli Self-Defense and Serb
  Ethnic Cleansing. Faith-Based Analysis,’ 25 August 2006;
  www.zcommunications.org/michael-ignatieff-on-israeli-self-defense-and-serb-ethnic-cleansing-by-edward-herman

  61 Timothy Garton Ash, ‘Let’s make sure we do better with Iran than we
  did with Iraq,’ Guardian, 12 January 2006

  62 Kurlansky, Nonviolence, pp. 14-15

  63 See also Mehdi Hasan, ‘The power of a dangerous idea,’ New
  Statesman, 13 December 2011

  64 Ian Burrell, ‘Jeremy Bowen: The Man in the Middle,’ Independent, 11
  December 2006

  65 Kurlansky, Nonviolence, pp. 179-180

  66 Aaron T. Beck, Prisoners of Hate: The Cognitive Basis of Anger,
  Hostility, and Violence, Perennial, New York, 1999/2000, p. 223

  67 ‘Voices,’ newsletter from Voices in the Wilderness UK, ‘U.S. war
  resisters,’ October-November 2008, p. 4; www.voicesuk.org

  68 Claude Anshin Thomas, At Hell’s Gate: A Soldier’s Journey from War
  to Peace, Shambhala, Boston, 2004, p 6

  69 Ibid., p. 7

  70 Ibid., p. 131

  71 See also Steve Taylor, Waking from Sleep: Why Awakening Experiences
  Occur and How to Make Them Permanent, Hay House, London, 2010

  72 Thomas, At Hell’s Gate, p. 87

  73 Quoted in Kurlansky, Nonviolence, p. xi.


Bibliography

 

  Achbar, Mark (editor). 1994. Manufacturing Consent: Noam Chomsky and
  the Media, Black Rose Books, Montreal.

  Ahmed, Nafeez Mosaddeq. 2010. A User’s Guide to the Crisis of
  Civilization: And How to Save It, Pluto Press, London.

  Alford, Matthew. 2010. Reel Power: Hollywood Cinema and American
  Supremacy, Pluto Books, London.

  Alperovitz, Gar. 1995/1996. The Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb,
  Vintage Books, New York.

  Aurelius, Marcus. 2003. Meditations, translation by Gregory Hays,
  Phoenix, London.

  Bakan, Joel. 2004. The Corporation: The Pathological Pursuit of Profit
  and Power, Constable, London.

  Baker, Nicholson. 2008. Human Smoke: The Beginnings of World War II,
  the End of Civilization, Simon and Schuster, London.

  Balanya, Bélen, Ann Doherty, Olivier Hoedeman, Adam Ma’anit and Erik
  Wesselius. 2000. Europe, Inc.: Regional and Global Restructuring and
  the Rise of Corporate Power, Pluto Press, London.

  Beck, Aaron T. 1999/2000. Prisoners of Hate. The Cognitive Basis of
  Anger, Hostility, and Violence, Perennial, New York.

  Beder, Sharon, with Wendy Vaney and Richard Gosden. 2009. This Little
  Kiddy Went to Market: The Corporate Capture of Childhood, Pluto Press,
  London.

  Begley, Sharon. 2007. Train Your Mind, Change Your Brain: How a New
  Science Reveals Our Extraordinary Potential to Transform Ourselves,
  Ballantine Books.

  Berry, David and John Theobald (editors). 2006. Radical Mass Media
  Criticism: A Cultural Genealogy, Black Rose Books, Montreal.

  Blakeley, Ruth. 2009. State Terrorism and Neoliberalism: The North in
  the South, Routledge, London.

  Blum, William. 2003. Killing Hope: U.S. Military and C.I.A.
  interventions since WWII, updated edition, Common Courage Press,
  Monroe, Maine.

  Borjesson, Kristina (editor). 2002. Into The Buzzsaw: Leading
  Journalists Expose the Myth of a Free Press, Prometheus Books,
  Amherst, New York.

  Broswimmer, Franz, J. 2002. Ecocide: A Short History of the Mass
  Extinction of Species, Pluto Press, London.

  Brown, Dee. 1970/1981. Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee: An Indian
  History of the American West, Washington Square Press, New York.

  Carey, Alex. 1995/1997. Taking the Risk Out of Democracy: Corporate
  Propaganda versus Freedom and Liberty, University of Illinois Press,
  Champaign.

  Cassirer, Ernst. 1944/1992. An Essay on Man, Yale University Press,
  New Haven and London.

  Chomsky, Noam. 1986/2002. Pirates and Emperors, Old and New:
  International Terrorism in the Real World, new edition, Pluto Press,
  London.

  Chomsky, Noam. 1983/1999. Fateful Triangle: The United States, Israel
  and the Palestinians, Pluto Press, London, updated edition.

  Chomsky, Noam. 1992. Deterring Democracy, Hill and Wang, New York.

  Chomsky, Noam. 2000. Rogue States: The Role of Force in World Affairs,
  Pluto Press, London.

  Chomsky, Noam. 2002. Understanding Power, edited by Peter R. Mitchell
  and John Schoeffel, The New Press, New York.

  Chomsky, Noam. 2003. Hegemony or Survival: America’s Quest for Global
  Dominance, Hamish Hamilton, London.

  Chomsky, Noam. 2006. Failed States: The Abuse of Power and The Assault
  on Democracy, Hamish Hamilton, London.

  Chomsky, Noam. 2007/2008. Interventions, Penguin Books, London.

  Chomsky, Noam. 2010. Hopes and Prospects, Hamish Hamilton, London.

  Chomsky, Noam and David Barsamian. 2005. Imperial Ambitions:
  Conversations With Noam Chomsky on the Post-9/11 World, Hamish
  Hamilton, London.

  Chomsky, Noam and Edward Herman. 1979. The Washington Connection and
  Third World Fascism: The Political Economy of Human Rights, Vol. 1,
  South End Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts.

  Cook, Jonathan. 2006. Blood and Religion: The Unmasking of the Jewish
  and Democratic State, Pluto Press, London.

  Cook, Jonathan. 2008. Disappearing Palestine: Israel’s Experiments in
  Human Despair, Zed Books, London.

  Cook, Jonathan. 2008. Israel and the Clash of Civilisations: Iraq,
  Iran and the Plan to Remake the Middle East, Pluto Press, London.

  Cromwell, Bryan. 2001. Bankhead: The Story of a Primary School at War,
  Clydeside Press, Glasgow.

  Cromwell, Bryan. 2008. Fighting the Bug: Disease, Diet and Education
  in Early Knightswood, Spiderwize, Clashnessie.

  Cromwell, David. 2001. Private Planet: Corporate Plunder and the Fight
  Back, Jon Carpenter, Charlbury.

  Cromwell, David and Mark Levene (editors). 2007. Surviving Climate
  Change: The Struggle to Avert Global Catastrophe, Pluto Press, London.

  Curran, James and Jean Seaton. 1981/1997. Power Without
  Responsibility: The Press and Broadcasting in Britain, Routledge,
  5^(th) edition, London.

  Curtis, Mark. 1995. The Ambiguities of Power: British Foreign Policy
  Since 1945, Zed Books, London.

  Curtis, Mark. 2003. Web of Deceit: Britain’s Real Role in the World,
  Vintage, London.

  Curtis, Mark. 2004. Unpeople: Britain’s Secret Human Rights Abuses,
  Vintage, London.

  Curtis, Mark. 2010. Secret Affairs: Britain’s Collusion with Radical
  Islam, Serpent’s Tail, London.

  The Dalai Lama and Howard C. Cutler. 1998. The Art of Happiness: A
  Handbook for Living, Coronet Books, London.

  The Dalai Lama and Howard C. Cutler. 2003. The Art of Happiness at
  Work, Hodder and Stoughton, London.

  Davidson, Richard J. and Anne Harrington (editors). 2002. Visions of
  Compassion: Western Scientists and Tibetan Buddhists Examine Human
  Nature, Oxford University Press, Oxford.

  Davies, Nick. 2006. Flat Earth News: An Award-winning Reporter Exposes
  Falsehood, Distortion and Propaganda in the Global Media, Vintage,
  London.

  de Waal, Frans. 2005. Our Inner Ape: The Best and Worst of Human
  Nature, Granta Books, London.

  Dinan, William and David Miller (editors). 2007. Thinker, Faker,
  Spinner, Spy: Corporate PR and the Assault on Democracy, Pluto Press,
  London.

  Douthwaite, Richard. 1999. The Growth Illusion: How Economic Growth
  Has Enriched the Few, Impoverished the Many, and Endangered the
  Planet, updated edition, Green Books, Totnes.

  Edwards, David. 1995. Free to be Human: Intellectual Self-Defence in
  an Age of Illusions, Green Books, Totnes.

  Edwards, David. 1998. The Compassionate Revolution: Radical Politics
  and Buddhism, Green Books, Totnes.

  Edwards, David and David Cromwell. 2006. Guardians of Power: The Myth
  of the Liberal Media, Pluto Press, London.

  Edwards, David and David Cromwell. 2009. Newspeak in the 21^(st)
  Century, Pluto Press, London.

  Einhorn, Stefan. 2005/2006. The Art of Being Kind, translated by Neil
  Smith, Sphere, London.

  Eldridge, John (editor). 1995. The Glasgow Media Group Reader, Volume
  1: News Content, Language and Visuals, Routledge, London.

  Ferguson, Thomas. 1995. Golden Rule: Investment Theory of Party
  Competition and the Logic of Money-driven Political Systems,
  University of Chicago Press, Chicago.

  Finkelstein, Norman G. 2000/2003. The Holocaust Industry: Reflections
  on the Exploitation of Jewish Suffering, Verso, London.

  Fisk, Robert. 2005. The Great War for Civilization: The Conquest of
  the Middle East, Fourth Estate, London.

  Fones-Wolf, Elizabeth. 1994. Selling Free Enterprise: The Business
  Assault on Labour and Liberalism, 1945-60, University of Illinois
  Press, Champaign.

  Fromm, Erich. 1942/2002. Fear of Freedom, Routledge, London.

  Fromm, Erich, 1947/2003. Man for Himself: An Enquiry into the
  Psychology of Ethics, Routledge, London.

  Fromm, Erich. 1973/1997. The Anatomy of Human Destructiveness,
  Pimlico, London.

  Fromm, Erich. 1993/2001. The Art of Being, Constable, London.

  Gelbspan, Ross. 1998. The Heat is On: The Climate Crisis, The
  Cover-up, The Prescription, Perseus Books, Reading.

  George, Susan. 1999. The Lugano Report: On Preserving Capitalism in
  the Twenty-first Century, Pluto Press, London.

  Gilbert, Paul. 2009/2010. The Compassionate Mind: A New Approach to
  Life’s Challenges, Constable & Robinson, London.

  Gold, Gerry and Paul Feldman. 2007. A House of Cards: From fantasy
  finance to global crash, Lupus Books, London.

  Goleman, Daniel. 2003. Destructive Emotions And How We Can Overcome
  Them: A Dialogue with the Dalai Lama, Bloomsbury, London.

  Gray, John. 2002/2003. Straw Dogs. Thoughts on Humans and Other
  Animals, Granta Books, London.

  Gyatso, Geshe Kelsang. 1990/1995. The Meditation Handbook, Tharpa
  Publications, London.

  Gyatso, Geshe Kelsang. 2000. Eight Steps to Happiness: The Buddhist
  Way of Loving Kindness, Tharpa, Thulverston.

  Haidt, Jonathan. 2006. The Happiness Hypothesis: Putting Ancient
  Wisdom and Philosophy To the Test of Modern Science, William
  Heinemann, London.

  Hansen, James. 2009. The Storms of my Grandchildren: The Truth About
  the Coming Climate Catastrophe and Our Last Chance to Save Humanity,
  Bloomsbury, London.

  Harman, Chris. 1998/2008. A People’s History of the World: From the
  Stone Age to the New Millennium, Verso, London.

  Harvey, David. 2005. A Brief History of Neoliberalism, Oxford
  University Press, Oxford.

  Harvey, David. 2010. The Enigma of Capital: And the Crises of
  Capitalism, Profile Books, London.

  Hasegawa, Tsuyoshi. 2005. Racing the Enemy: Stalin, Truman, and the
  Surrender of Japan, Harvard University Press, Cambridge,
  Massachusetts.

  Hasegawa, Tsuyoshi (editor). 2007. The End of the Pacific War:
  Reappraisals, Stanford University Press, Stanford.

  Herman, Edward. 1982. The Real Terror Network: Terrorism in Fact and
  Propaganda, South End Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts.

  Herman, Edward. 1992. Beyond Hypocrisy: Decoding the News in an Age of
  Propaganda, South End Press, Boston.

  Herman, Edward. 1995. Triumph of the Market: Essays on Economics,
  Politics and the Media, South End Press, Boston.

  Herman, Edward S. and Noam Chomsky. 1988/1994. Manufacturing Consent:
  The Political Economy of the Mass Media, Vintage, London.

  Herman, Edward S. and David Peterson. 2010. The Politics of Genocide,
  Monthly Review Press, New York.

  Hill, Christopher. 1972/1991. The World Turned Upside Down: Radical
  Ideas During the English Revolution, Penguin, London. Hind, Dan. 2007.
  The Threat To Reason: How the Enlightenment was hijacked and how we
  can reclaim it, Verso, London.

  Hind, Dan. 2010. The Return of the Public, Verso, London.

  Houghton, J.T.; Meira Filho, L.G.; Callander, B.A.; Harris, N.;
  Kattenberg, A., and Maskell, K. (editors). 1996. Climate Change 1995:
  The Science of Climate Change, Contribution of Working Group I to the
  Second Assessment Report of the Inter-governmental Panel on Climate
  Change, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge.

  Jay, Anthony (editor). 1996/1997. The Oxford Dictionary of Political
  Quotations, Oxford University Press, Oxford.

  Kasser, Tim. 2002. The High Price Of Materialism, The MIT Press,
  Cambridge, Massachusetts.

  Klaehn, Jeffery (editor). 2005. Filtering the News: Essays on Herman
  and Chomsky’s Propaganda Model, Black Rose Books, Montreal.

  Klaehn, Jeffery (editor). 2006. Bound By Power: Intended Consequences,
  Black Rose Books, Montreal.

  Klaehn, Jeffery (editor). 2010. The Political Economy of Media and
  Power, Peter Lang, New York.

  Klein, Naomi. 2007. Shock Doctrine: The Rise of Disaster Capitalism,
  Penguin, London.

  Knightley, Phillip. 1975/2000. The First Casualty: The War
  Correspondent as Hero and Myth-Maker from the Crimea to Kosovo, Prion
  Books, London.

  Kurlansky, Mark. 2006. Nonviolence: The History of a Dangerous Idea,
  Jonathan Cape, London.

  LaDuke, Winona with Sean Cruz. 2011. The Militarization of Indian
  Country, Honor the Earth, Minneapolis.

  Leggett, Jeremy. 1999. The Carbon War: Dispatches from the End of the
  Oil Century, Penguin, London.

  Lens, Sidney. 1971/2003. The Forging of the American Empire: From the
  Revolution to Vietnam: A History of U.S. Imperialism, Pluto Press,
  London.

  Lewis, Justin. 2001. Constructing Public Opinion: How Political Elites
  Do What They Like And Why We Seem To Go Along With It, Columbia
  University Press, New York.

  McChesney, Robert. 2000. Rich Media, Poor Democracy: Communication
  Politics in Dubious Times, The New Press, New York. McIntosh,
  Alastair. 2001/2002. Soil and Soul: People versus Corporate Power,
  Aurum Press, London.

  McIntosh, Alastair. 2008. Hell and High Water: Climate Change, Hope
  and the Human Condition, Birlinn, Edinburgh.

  McMurtry, John. 2002. Value Wars: The Global Market Versus the Life
  Economy, Pluto Press, London.

  Marable, Manning. 2011. Malcolm X: A Life of Reinvention, Allen Lane,
  London.

  Michie, David. 2008. Buddhism for Busy People: Finding Happiness in an
  Uncertain World, Snow Lion Publications, Ithaca, New York.

  Miller, David and William Dinan. 2008. A Century of Spin: How Public
  Relations Became the Cutting Edge of Corporate Power, Pluto Press,
  London.

  Monbiot, George. 2000. Captive State: The Corporate Takeover of
  Britain, MacMillan, London.

  Newsinger, John. 2006. The Blood Never Dried: A People’s History of
  the British Empire, Bookmarks Publications, London.

  Nietzsche, Friedrich. 1883-1885/1999. Thus Spake Zarathustra, Dover
  Publications, Mineola.

  Nietzsche, Friedrich. 1888/2003. Twilight of the Idols and The
  Anti-Christ, Penguin Classics, London.

  Osho. 2002/2004. The Book of Man, Penguin, New Dehli.

  Pappe, Ilan. 2006/2007. The Ethnic Cleansing of Palestine, Oneworld,
  Oxford.

  Perkins, John. 2004/2006. Confessions of an Economic Hit Man, Ebury
  Press, London.

  Philo, Greg and Mike Berry. 2011. More Bad News from Israel, Pluto
  Press, London.

  Pilger, John. 1986/2001. Heroes, Vintage, London.

  Pilger, John. 1998. Hidden Agendas, Vintage, London.

  Pilger, John. 2002. The New Rulers of the World, Verso, London.

  Pinker, Steven. 1997. How The Mind Works, Penguin, London.

  Pinker, Steven. 2002. The Blank Slate: The Modern Denial of Human
  Nature, Penguin, London.

  Prior, Michael. 1999. Zionism and the State of Israel: A moral
  inquiry, Routledge, London.

  Rai, Milan. 2002. War Plan Iraq: Ten Reasons Against War With Iraq,
  Arrow Publications, St Leonards-on-Sea.

  Rai, Milan. 2003. Regime Unchanged: Why the War on Iraq Changed
  Nothing, Pluto Press, London.

  Revel, Jean-François and Matthieu Ricard. 2000. The Monk and the
  Philosopher: A Father and Son Discuss the Meaning of Life, Schocken
  Books, Random House, New York.

  Ricard, Matthieu. 2003/2007. Happiness: A Guide To Developing Life’s
  Most Important Skill, Atlantic Books, London.

  Ritter, Scott and William Rivers Pitt. 2002. War On Iraq: What Team
  Bush Doesn’t Want You To Know, Profile Books, London.

  Sacco, Joe. 2003. Palestine, Jonathan Cape, London.

  Sacco, Joe. 2009. Footnotes in Gaza, Jonathan Cape, London.

  Said, Edward W. 2003. Culture and Resistance, interviews by David
  Barsamian, Pluto Press, London.

  Salzberg, Sharon. 1995. Lovingkindness: The Revolutionary Art of
  Happiness, Shambhala Publications, Boston.

  Schmidt, Jeff. 2000. Disciplined Minds: A Critical Look at Salaried
  Professionals and the Soul-Battering System that Shapes Their Lives,
  Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, Lanham.

  Schumacher, E. F. 1973/1974. Small is Beautiful: A Study of Economics
  as if People Mattered, Abacus, London.

  Scraton, Phil (editor). 2002. Beyond September 11: An Anthology of
  Dissent, Pluto Press, London.

  Seligman, Martin. 2003. Authentic Happiness: Using the New Positive
  Psychology to Realize Your Potential for Lasting Fulfillment, Nicholas
  Brealey Publishing, London.

  Seymour, Richard. 2008. The Liberal Defence of Murder, Verso, London.

  Shantideva’s Guide to the Bodhisattva’s Way of Life. 2002. Translated
  by Neil Elliott under guidance from Geshe Kelsang Gyatso, Tharpa
  Publications, Ulverston.

  Shutt, Harry. 1998/2009. The Trouble with Capitalism: An Enquiry into
  the Causes of Global Economic Failure, Pluto Press, London.

  Shutt, Harry. 2005. The Decline of Capitalism: Can a Self-Regulated
  Profits System Survive?, Zed Books, London.

  Shutt, Harry. 2010. Beyond the Profits System: Possibilities for a
  Post-Capitalist Era, Zed Books, London.

  Singer, Peter. 1981. The Expanding Circle: Ethics and Sociobiology,
  Clarendon Press, Oxford.

  Sober, Elliott and David Sloan Wilson. 1998. Unto Others: The
  Evolution and Psychology of Unselfish Behavior, Harvard University
  Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts.

  Solomon, Norman. 2003. Target Iraq: What The News Media Didn’t Tell
  You, Context Books, New York.

  Solomon, S., D. Qin, M. Manning, Z. Chen, M. Marquis, K.B. Averyt, M.
  Tignor and H.L. Miller (editors). 2007. Climate Change 2007: The
  Physical Science Basis, Contribution of Working Group I to the Fourth
  Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change,
  Cambridge University Press, Cambridge.

  Sponeck, Hans von. 2006. A Different Kind of War: The UN Sanctions
  Regime in Iraq, Berghahn Books, New York.

  Tanner, Michael. 2000. Nietzsche: A Very Short Introduction, Oxford
  University Press, Oxford.

  Taylor, Steve. 2004. The Fall: The Insanity of the Ego in Human
  History and The Dawning of a New Era, O-Books, Winchester.

  Taylor, Steve. 2010. Waking from Sleep: Why Awakening Experiences
  Occur and How to Make Them Permanent, Hay House, London.

  Theobald, John. 2004. The Media and the Making of History, Ashgate,
  Aldershot.

  Thomas, Claude Anshin. 2004. At Hell’s Gate: A Soldier’s Journey from
  War to Peace, Shambhala, Boston.

  Tolstoy, Leo. ca. 1905. What shall we do?, The Free Age Press, London;
  www.archive.org/details/whatshallwedo00tolsrich

  Tolstoy, Leo. 1990. Government is Violence: Essays on Anarchism and
  Pacifism, edited by David Stephens, Phoenix Press, London.

  United Nations Environment Programme Yearbook 2009, New Science and
  Developments in Our Changing Environment, UNEP, Nairobi, Kenya.

  Wallace, Danny. 2004. Join Me: The True Story of a Man Who Started a
  Cult by Accident, Ebury Press, London.

  Wills, Garry. 2010. Bomb Power: The Modern Presidency and the National
  Security State, The Penguin Press, New York.

  Wilson, Colin. 1956/2001. The Outsider, Phoenix, London. Wilson,
  Colin. 1957/1984. Religion and the Rebel, Ashgrove Press, Bath.

  Wilson, Colin. 1965. Beyond The Outsider: The Philosophy of the
  Future, Arthur Baker Limited, London.

  Wilson, Colin. 1966. Introduction to the New Existentialism,
  Hutchinson, London.

  Wilson, Colin. 1972. Poetry and Mysticism, Hutchinson & Co., London.

  Wright, Ronald. 2004/2006. A Short History of Progress, Canongate,
  Edinburgh.

  X, Malcolm, with Alex Haley. 1965/2001. The Autobiography of Malcolm
  X, Penguin Books, London.

  Zinn, Howard. 1980/1999. A People’s History of the United States:
  1492-Present, Perennial Classics edition, HarperCollins, New York.

  Zinn, Howard. 1990. The Politics of History, second edition,
  University of Illinois Press, Urbana.

  Zinn, Howard. 1997. The Zinn Reader: Writings on Disobedience and
  Democracy, Seven Stories Press, New York.

  Zinn, Howard. 2002. You Can’t Be Neutral on a Moving Train: A Personal
  History of Our Times, Beacon Press, Boston.

  Zinn, Howard. 2007. A Power Governments Cannot Suppress, City Lights
  Books, San Francisco.

[]

 

Contemporary culture has eliminated both the concept of the public and
the figure of the intellectual. Former public spaces – both physical and
cultural – are now either derelict or colonized by advertising. A
cretinous anti-intellectualism presides, cheerled by expensively
educated hacks in the pay of multinational corporations who reassure
their bored readers that there is no need to rouse themselves from their
interpassive stupor. The informal censorship internalized and propagated
by the cultural workers of late capitalism generates a banal conformity
that the propaganda chiefs of Stalinism could only ever have dreamt of
imposing. Zer0 Books knows that another kind of discourse – intellectual
without being academic, popular without being populist – is not only
possible: it is already flourishing, in the regions beyond the striplit
malls of so-called mass media and the neurotically bureaucratic halls of
the academy. Zer0 is committed to the idea of publishing as a making
public of the intellectual. It is convinced that in the unthinking,
blandly consensual culture in which we live, critical and engaged
theoretical reflection is more important than ever before.
